ee the pleasure it promises,” the guildmaster teased, scraping his hand over the barbed
tip of a single spike sticking out of a block of wood on the center of the room’s little
table.
Regis purposely curled his lips into a stupid smile, pretending to see the obvious logic
of Pook’s words.
“Just drop your palm onto it,” Pook coaxed, “then you will know the joy and will
again be part of our family.”
Regis searched for a way out of the trap. Once before he had used the ruse, the lie
within a lie, pretending to be caught under the magical charm’s inɻuence. He had
worked his act to perfection then, convincing an evil wizard of his loyalty, then turning
on the man at a critical moment to aid his friends.
This time, though, Regis had even surprised himself, escaping the ruby pendant’s
insistent, hypnotizing pull. Now, though, he was caught: A person truly duped by the
gem would gladly impale his hand on the barbed spike.
Regis brought his hand above his head and closed his eyes, trying to keep his visage
blank enough to carry out the dupe. He swung his arm down, meaning to follow through
on Pook’s suggestion.
At the last moment, his hand swerved away and banged harmlessly on the table.
Pook roared in rage, suspecting all along that Regis had somehow escaped the
pendant’s inɻuence. He grabbed the halɻing by the wrist and smashed his little hand
onto the spike, wiggling it as the spike went through. Regis’s scream multiplied tenfold
when Pook tore his hand back up the barbed instrument.
Then Pook let him go and slapped him across the face as Regis clutched his wounded
hand to his chest.
“Deceiving dog!” the guildmaster shouted, more angry with the pendant’s failure than
with Regis’s facade. He lined up for another slap but calmed himself and decided to
twist the haffling’s stubborn will back on Regis.
“A pity,” he teased, “for if the pendant had brought you back under control, I might
have found a place for you in the guild. Surely you deserve to die, little thief, but I have
not forgotten your value to me in the past. You were the ɹnest thief in Calimport, a
position I might have offered you once again.”
“Then no pity for the failure of the gem,” Regis dared to retort, guessing the teasing
game that Pook was playing, “for no pain outweighs the disgust I would feel at playing
lackey to Pasha Pook!”
Pook’s response was a heavy slug that knocked Regis oʃ his chair and onto the ɻoor.

The halfling lay curled up, trying to stem the blood from both his hand and his nose.
Pook rested back in his chair and clasped his hands behind his head. He looked at the
pendant, resting on the table in front of him. Only once before had it failed him, when
he had tried it on a will that would not be captured. Luckily, Artemis Entreri had not
realized the attempt that day, and Pook had been wise enough not to try the pendant on
the assassin again.
Pook shifted his gaze to Regis, now passed out from the pain. He had to give the little
halɻing credit. Even if Regis’s familiarity with the pendant had given him an edge in his
battle, only an iron will could resist the tempting pull.
“But it will not help you,” Pook whispered at the unconscious form. He sat back in his
chair again and closed his eyes, trying to envision still another torture for Regis.

The tan-robed arm slipped in through the tent’s ɻap and held the limp body of the red-
bearded dwarf upside down by the ankle. Sali Dalib’s ɹngers started their customary

twiddle, and he ɻashed the gold-and-ivory smile so wide that it seemed as if it would
take in his ears. His little goblin assistant jumped up and down at his side, squealing,
“Magic, magic, magic!”
Bruenor opened one eye and lifted an arm to push his long beard out of his face. “Ye
be likin’ what ye’re seeing?” the dwarf asked slyly.
Sali Dalib’s smile disappeared, and his fingers got all tangled together.
Bruenor’s bearer—Wulfgar, wearing the robe of one of the bandits—walked into the
tent. Catti-brie came in behind him.
“So ’twas yerself that set the bandits upon us,” the young woman growled.
Sali Dalib’s exclamation of shock came out as so much gibberish, and the wily
merchant spun away to ɻee... only to ɹnd a neat hole sliced into the back of his tent
and Drizzt Do’Urden standing within it, leaning on one scimitar while the other rested
easily on his shoulder. Just to heighten the merchant’s terror, Drizzt had again taken oʃ
the magical mask.
“Uh ... um, de bestest road?” the merchant stammered
“Bestest for yerself and yer friends!” Bruenor growled.
“So they thought,” Catti-brie was quick to put in.
Sali Dalib curled his smile sheepishly, but he had been in tight spots a hundred times
before and had always weaseled his way out. He lifted his palms, as if to say, “You
caught me,” but then jerked into a dizzying maneuver, pulling several small ceramic
globes out of one of his robe’s many pockets. He slammed them to the ɻoor at his feet.
Explosions of multicolored light left a thick, blinding smoke in their wake, and the
merchant dashed for the side of the tent.
Instinctively Wulfgar dropped Bruenor and jumped ahead, catching an armful of
emptiness. The dwarf plopped onto the ɻoor headɹrst and rolled to a sitting position,
his one-horned helm tilted to the side of his head. As the smoke thinned, the embarrassed

barbarian looked back to the dwarf, who just shook his head in disbelief and mumbled,
“Suren to be a long adventure.”
Only Drizzt, ever alert, had not been caught unawares. The drow had shielded his eyes
from the bursts, then watched the smoky silhouette of the merchant darting to the left.
Drizzt would have had him before he got out of the hidden ɻap in the tent, but Sali
Dalib’s assistant stumbled into the drow’s way. Barely slowing, Drizzt slammed
Twinkle’s hilt into the little goblin’s forehead, dropping the creature into
unconsciousness, then slipped the mask back on his face and jumped out to the streets of
Memnon.
Catti-brie rushed by to follow Drizzt, and Bruenor leaped to his feet. “After ’im, boy!”
the dwarf shouted at Wulfgar. The chase was on.
Drizzt caught sight of the merchant slipping into the throng of the streets. Even Sali
Dalib’s loud robe would blend well in the city’s myriad of colors, so Drizzt added a touch
of his own. As he had done to the invisible mage on the deck of the pirate ship, the drow
sent a purplish glowing outline of dancing flames over the merchant.
Drizzt sped oʃ in pursuit, weaving in and out of the crowd with amazing ease and
watching for the bobbing line of purple ahead.
Bruenor was less graceful. The dwarf cut ahead of Catti-brie and plunged headlong
into the throng, stomping toes and using his shield to bounce bodies out of his way.
Wulfgar, right behind, cut an even wider swath, and Catti-brie had an easy time
following in their wake.
They passed a dozen lanes and crashed through an open market, Wulfgar accidentally
overturning a cart of huge yellow melons. Shouts of protest erupted behind them as they
passed, but they kept their eyes ahead, each watching the person in front and trying not
to get lost in the overwhelming bustle.
Sali Dalib knew at once that he was too conspicuous with the ɹery outline to ever
escape in the open streets. To add to his disadvantage, the eyes and pointing ɹngers of
a hundred curious onlookers greeted him at every turn, signposts for his pursuers.
Grabbing at the single chance before him, the merchant cut down one lane and
scrambled through the doors of a large stone building.
Drizzt turned to make certain that his friends were still behind, then rushed through
the doors, skidding to a stop on the steam-slicked marble ɻoor of a public bathhouse.
Two huge eunuchs moved to block the clothed elf, but as with the merchant who had
come in just before, the agile Drizzt regained his momentum too quickly to be hindered.
He skated through the short entry corridor and into the main room, a large open bath,
thick with steam and smelling of sweat and perfumed soaps. Naked bodies crossed his
path at every step, and Drizzt had to he careful where he placed his hands as he slipped
through.
Bruenor nearly fell as he entered the slippery chamber, and the eunuchs, already out
of their positions, got in front of him.
“No clothes!” one of them demanded, but Bruenor had no time for idle discussions. He

stamped a heavy boot onto one of the giant’s bare feet, then crunched the other foot for
good measure. Wulfgar came in then and heaved the remaining eunuch aside.
The barbarian, leaning forward to gain speed, had no chance to stop or turn on the
slippery ɻoor, and as Bruenor turned to make his way along the perimeter of the bath,
Wulfgar slammed into him, knocking them both to the ɻoor and into a slide they could
not brake.
They bounced over the rim of the bath and plunged into the water, Wulfgar coming
up, waist deep, between two voluptuous and naked, giggling women.
The barbarian stammered an apology, ɹnding his tongue twisted within the conɹnes
of his mouth. A slap across the back of his head shook him back to his senses.
“Ye’re looking for the merchant, ye remember?” Catti-brie reminded him.
I am looking!” Wulfgar assured her.
“Then be lookin’ for the one lined in purple!” Catti-brie shot back.
Wulfgar, his eyes freed with the expectation of another smack, noticed the single horn
of a helmet poking out of the water at his side. Frantically he plunged his hand under,

catching Bruenor by the scruʃ of the neck and hoisting him out of the bath. The not-too-
happy dwarf came up with his arms crossed over his chest and shaking his head in

disbelief once again.
Drizzt got out the back door of the bathhouse and found himself in an empty alley, the
only unpopulated stretch he had seen since entering Memnon. Seeking a better vantage,
the drow scaled the side of the bathhouse and jogged along the roof.
Sali Dalib slowed his pace, thinking he had slipped the pursuit. The drow’s purple ɹre
died away, further adding to the merchant’s sense of security. He wound his way
through the back-alley maze. Not even the usual drunks leaned against the walls to
inform his pursuers. He moved a hundred twisting yards, then two, and ɹnally down an
alley that he knew would turn onto the largest marketplace in Memnon, where anyone
could become invisible in the blink of an eye.
As Sali Dalib approached the end of the alley, however, an elven form dropped in
front of him and two scimitars ɻashed out of their sheaths, crossing before the stunned
merchant, coming to rest on his collarbones, then drawing lines on either side of his
neck.
When the four friends returned to the merchant’s tent with their prisoner, they found,
to their relief, the little goblin lying where Drizzt had bopped him. Bruenor none too
gently pulled the unfortunate creature up behind Sali Dalib and tied the two back to
back. Wulfgar moved to help and wound up hooking a loop of the rope over Bruenor’s
forearm. The dwarf wiggled free and pushed the barbarian away.
“Should’ve stayed in Mithral Hall,” Bruenor grumbled. “Safer with the gray ones than
beside yerself and the girl!”
Wulfgar and Catti-brie looked to Drizzt for support, but the drow just smiled and
moved to the side of the tent.

“Ha ha ha ha ha,” Sali Dalib giggled nervously “No problem here. We deal? Many
riches, I have. What you need—”
“Shut yer mouth!” Bruenor snapped at him. The dwarf winked at Drizzt, indicating
that he meant to play the bad guy role in the encounter.
“I don’t be lookin’ for riches from one what’s tricked me,” Bruenor growled. “Me
heart’s for revenge!” He looked around at his friends. “Ye all saw his face when he
thought me dead. Suren was him that put the riding bandits on us.”
“Sali Dalib never—” the merchant stammered.
“I said, ‘Shut yer mouth!’” Bruenor shouted in his face, cowing him. The dwarf brought
his axe up and ready on his shoulder.
The merchant looked to Drizzt, confused, for the drow had replaced the mask and now
appeared as a surface elf once again. Sali Dalib guessed the truth of Drizzt’s identity,
ɹguring the black skin to be more ɹtting on the deadly elf, and he did not even think of
begging for mercy from Drizzt.
“Wait on it, then,” Catti-brie said suddenly, grabbing the handle of Bruenor’s weapon.
“May that there be a way for this dog to save his neck.”
“Bah! What would we want o’ him?” Bruenor shot back, winking at Catti-brie for
playing her part to perfection.
“He’ll get us to Calimport,” Catti-brie replied. She cast a steely gaze at Sali Dalib,
warning him that her mercy was not easily gotten. “Suren this time he’ll take us down
the true bestest road.”
“Yes, yes, ha ha ha ha ha,” Sali Dalib blurted. “Sali Dalib show you de way!”
“Show?” balked Wulfgar, not to be left out. “You will lead us all the way to
Calimport.”
“Very long way,” grumbled the merchant. “Five days or more. Sali Dalib cannot—”
Bruenor raised his axe.
“Yes, yes, of course,” the merchant erupted. “Sali Dalib take you there. Take you right
to de gate ... through de gate,” he corrected quickly. “Sali Dalib even get de water. We
must catch de caravan.”
“No caravan,” Drizzt interrupted, surprising even his friends. “We will travel alone.”
“Dangerous,” Sali Dalib replied. “Very, very. De Calim Desert be very full of monsters.
Dragons and bandits.”
“No caravan,” Drizzt said again in a tone that none of them dared question. “Untie
them, and let them get things ready.”
Bruenor nodded, then put his face barely an inch from Sali Dalib’s. “And I mean to be
watchin’ them meself,” he said to Drizzt, though he sent the message more pointedly to
Sali Dalib and the little goblin. “One trick and I’ll cut ’em in half!”
Less than an hour later, ɹve camels moved out of southern Memnon and into the
Calim Desert with ceramic water jugs clunking on their sides. Drizzt and Bruenor led the
way, following the signposts of the Trade Way. The drow wore his mask, but kept the

cowl of his cloak as low as he could, for the sizzling sunlight on the white sands burned
at his eyes, which had once been accustomed to the absolute blackness of the
underworld.
Sali Dalib, his assistant sitting on the camel in front of him, came in the middle, with
Wulfgar and Catti-brie bringing up the rear. Catti-brie kept Taulmaril across her lap, a
silver arrow notched as a continual reminder to the sneaky merchant.
The day grew hotter than anything the friends had ever experienced, except for Drizzt,
who had lived in the very bowels of the world. Not a cloud hindered the sun’s brutal
rays, and not a wisp of a breeze came to oʃer any relief. Sali Dalib, more used to the
heat, knew the lack of wind to be a blessing, for wind in the desert meant blowing and
blinding sand, the most dangerous killer of the Calim.
The night was better, with the temperature dropping comfortably and a full moon
turning the endless line of dunes into a silvery dreamscape, like the rolling waves of the
ocean. The friends set a camp for a few hours, taking turns watching over their
reluctant guides.
Catti-brie awoke sometime after midnight. She sat and stretched, ɹguring it to be her
turn on watch. She saw Drizzt, standing on the edge of the ɹrelight, staring into the
starry heavens.
Hadn’t Drizzt taken the first watch? she wondered.
Catti-brie studied the moon’s position to make certain of the hour. There could be no
doubt; the night grew long.
“Trouble?” she asked softly, going to Drizzt’s side. A loud snore from Bruenor
answered the question for Drizzt.
“Might I spell ye, then?” she asked. “Even a drow elf needs to sleep.”
“I can ɹnd my rest under the cowl of my cloak,” Drizzt replied, turning to meet her
concerned gaze with his lavender eyes, “when the sun is high.”
“Might I join ye, then?” Catti-brie asked. “Suren a wondrous night.”
Drizzt smiled and turned his gaze back to the heavens, to the allure of the evening sky
with a mystical longing in his heart as profound as any surface elf had ever experienced.
Catti-brie slipped her slender ɹngers around his and stood quietly by his side, not
wanting to disturb his enchantment further, sharing more than mere words with her
dearest of friends.

The heat was worse the next day, and even worse the following, but the camels
plodded on eʃortlessly, and the four friends, who had come through so many hardships,
accepted the brutal trek as just one more obstacle on the journey they had to complete.
They saw no other signs of life and considered that a blessing, for anything living in
that desolate region could only be hostile. The heat was enemy enough, and they felt as
if their skin would simply shrivel and crack away.
Whenever one of them felt like quitting, like the relentless sun and burning sand and

heat were simply too much to bear, he or she just thought of Regis.
What terrible tortures was the halɻing now enduring at the hands of his former
master?

rom the shadows of a doorway, Entreri watched Pasha Pook make his way up the
staircase to the exit of the guildhouse. It had been less than an hour since Pook had
regained his ruby pendant and already he was oʃ to put it to use. Entreri had to give
the guildmaster credit; he was never late for the dinner bell.
The assassin waited for Pook to clear the house altogether, then made his way
stealthily back to the top level. The guards outside the ɹnal door made no move to stop
him, though Entreri did not remember them from his earlier days in the guild. Pook must
have prudently put out the word of Entreri’s station in the guild, according him all the
privileges he used to enjoy.
Never late for the dinner bell.
Entreri moved to the door to his old room, where LaValle now resided, and knocked
softly.
“Come in, come in,” the wizard greeted him, hardly surprised that the assassin had
returned.
“It is good to be back,” Entreri said.
“And good to have you back,” replied the wizard sincerely. “Things have not been the
same since you left us, and they have only become worse in recent months.”
Entreri understood the wizard’s point. “Rassiter?”
LaValle grimaced. “Keep your back to the wall when that one is about.” A shudder
shook through him, but he composed himself quickly. “But with you back at Pook’s side,
Rassiter will learn his place.”
“Perhaps,” replied Entreri, “though I am not so certain that Pook was as glad to see
me.”
“You understand Pook,” LaValle chuckled. “Ever thinking as a guildmaster! He desired
to set the rules for your meeting with him to assert his authority. But that incident is far
behind us already.”
Entreri’s look gave the wizard the impression that he was not so certain.
“Pook will forget it,” LaValle assured him, “Those who pursued me should not so easily
be forgotten,” Entreri replied.
“Pook called upon Pinochet to complete the task,” said LaValle. “The pirate has never
failed.”
“The pirate has never faced such foes,” Entreri answered. He looked to the table and
LaValle’s crystal ball. “We should be certain.”
LaValle thought for a moment, then nodded his accord. He had intended to do some

scrying anyway. “Watch the ball,” he instructed Entreri. “I shall see if I can summon the
image of Pinochet.”
The crystal ball remained dark for a few moments, then ɹlled with smoke. LaValle had
not dealt often with Pinochet, but he knew enough of the pirate for a simple scrying. A
few seconds later, the image of a docked ship came into view—not a pirate vessel, but a
merchant ship. Immediately Entreri suspected something amiss.
Then the crystal probed deeper, beyond the hull of the ship, and the assassin’s guess
was conɹrmed, for in a sectioned corner of the hold sat the proud pirate captain, his
elbows on his knees and his head in his hands, shackled to the wall.
LaValle, stunned, looked to Entreri, but the assassin was too intent on the image to
offer any explanations. A rare smile had found its way onto Entreri’s face.
LaValle cast an enhancing spell at the crystal ball. “Pinochet,” he called softly.
The pirate lifted his head and looked around.
“Where are you?” LaValle asked.
“Oberon?” Pinochet asked. “Is that you, wizard?”
“Nay, I am LaValle, Pook’s sorcerer in Calimport. Where are you?”
“Memnon,” the pirate answered. “Can you get me out?”
“What of the elf and the barbarian?” Entreri asked LaValle, but Pinochet heard the
question directly.
“I had them!” the pirate hissed. “Trapped in a channel with no escape. But then a
dwarf appeared, driving the reins of a ɻying chariot of ɹre, and with him a woman
archer—a deadly archer.” He paused, ɹghting oʃ his distaste as he remembered the
encounter.
“To what outcome?” LaValle prompted, amazed at the development.
“One ship went running, one ship—my ship—sank, and the third was captured,”
groaned Pinochet. He locked his face into a grimace and asked again, more
emphatically, “Can you get me out?”
LaValle looked helplessly to Entreri, who now stood tall over the crystal hall,
absorbing every word. “Where are they?” the assassin growled, his patience worn away.
“Gone,” answered Pinochet. “Gone with the girl and the dwarf into Memnon.”
“How long?”
“Three days.”
Entreri signaled to LaValle that he had heard enough.
“I will have Pasha Pook send word to Memnon immediately,” LaValle assured the
pirate. “You shall be released.”
Pinochet sank into his original, despondent position. Of course he would be released;
that had already been arranged. He had hoped that LaValle could somehow magically
get him out of the Sea Sprite’s hold, thereby releasing him from any pledges he would be
forced to make to Deudermont when the captain set him free.

“Three days,” LaValle said to Entreri as the crystal darkened. “They could be halfway
here by now.”
Entreri seemed amused at the notion. “Pasha Pook is to know nothing of this,” he said
suddenly.
LaValle sank back in his chair. “He must be told.”
“No!” Entreri snapped. “This is none of his affair.”
“The guild may be in danger,” LaValle replied.
“You do not trust that I am capable of handling this?” Entreri asked in a low, grim
tone. LaValle felt the assassin’s callous eyes looking through him, as though he had
suddenly become just another barrier to be overcome.
But Entreri softened his glare and grinned. “You know of Pasha Pook’s weakness for
hunting cats,” he said, reaching into his pouch. “Give him this. Tell him you made it for
him.” He tossed a small black object across the table to the wizard. LaValle caught it, his
eyes widening as soon as he realized what it was.
Guenhwyvar.

On a distant plane, the great cat stirred at the wizard’s touch upon the statuette and
wondered if its master meant to summon it, finally, to his side.
But, after a moment, the sensation faded, and the cat put its head down to rest.
So much time had gone by.

“It holds an entity,” the wizard gasped, sensing the strength in the onyx statuette.
“A powerful entity,” Entreri assured him. “When you learn to control it, you will have
brought a new ally to the guild.”
“How can I thank—” LaValle began, but he stopped as he realized that he had already
been told the price of the panther. “Why trouble Pook with details that do not concern
him?” The wizard laughed, tossing a cloth over his crystal ball.
Entreri clapped LaValle on the shoulder as he passed toward the door. Three years had
done nothing to diminish the understanding the two men had shared.
But with Drizzt and his friends approaching, Entreri had more pressing business. He
had to go to the Cells of Nine and pay a visit to Regis.
The assassin needed another gift.

t is like looking into a mirror that paints the world with opposing colors: white hair to
black; black skin to white, light eyes to dark. What an intricate mirror it is to replace a
smile with a frown, and an expression of friendship with a seemingly perpetual scowl.
For that is how I view Artemis Entreri, this warrior who can compliment every
movement I make with similar precision and grace, the warrior who, in every way but
one, I would regard as my equal.
How diɽcult it was for me to stand with him in the depths of Mithral Hall, fighting
side by side for both our lives! Strangely, it was not any moral imperative that bothered
me about ɹghting in that situation. It was no belief that Entreri should die, had to die,
and that I, if I was not such a coward, would have killed him then and there, even if the
action cost me my own life as I tried to escape the inhospitable depths. No, nothing like
that.
What made it all so diɽcult for me was watching that man, that human assassin, and
knowing, without the slightest shred of doubt, that I very well might have been looking
at myself.
Is that who I would have become had I not found Zaknafein in those early years in
Menzoberranzan? Had I not discovered the example of one who so validated my own

beliefs that the ways of the drow were not right, morally and practically? Is that cold-
hearted killer who I would have become had it been my vicious sister Briza training me

instead of the more gentle Vierna?
I fear that it is, that I, despite all that I know to be true within the depths of my very
heart, would have been overwhelmed by the situation about me, would have succumbed
to the despair to a point where there remained little of compassion and justice. I would
have become an assassin, holding strong within my own code of ethics, but with that
code so horribly warped that I could no longer understand the truth of my actions, that I
could justify them with the sheerest cynicism.
I saw all of that when I looked upon Entreri, and thanked Mielikki profoundly for
those in my life, for Zaknafein, for Belwar Dissengulp and for Montolio, who helped me
to steer the correct course. And if I saw a potential for myself within Entreri, then I must
admit that there once was a potential for Entreri to become as I have become, to know
compassion and community, to know friends, good friends, and to know love.
I think about him a lot, as he, no doubt, thinks about me. While his obsession is based
in pride, in the challenge of overcoming me in battle, mine own is wrought of curiosity,
of seeking answers within myself by observing the actions of who I might have become.
Do I hate him?
Strangely, I do not. That lack of hatred is not based on the respect that I give the man

for his ɹghting prowess, for that measure of respect ends right there, at the edge of the
battleɹeld. No, I do not hate Artemis Entreri because I pity him, the events that led to
the wrong decisions he has made. There is true strength within him, and there is, or once
was, a substantial potential to do good in a world so in need of heroes. For, despite his
actions, I have come to understand that Entreri operates within a very strict code. In his
own warped view of the world, I believe that Entreri honestly believes that he never
killed anyone who did not deserve it. He held Catti-brie captive but did not rape her.
As for his actions concerning Regis ... well, Regis was, in reality, a thief, and though
he stole from another thief that does not excuse that crime. In Luskan, as in most cities
in the Realms, thieves lose their hands, or worse, and certainly a bounty hunter sent to
retrieve a stolen item, and the person who stole it, is well within the law to kill that
person, and anyone else who hinders his task.
In Calimport, Artemis Entreri operates among thieves and thugs, among the very edge
of civilization. In that capacity, he deals death, as did Zaknafein in the alleys of
Menzoberranzan. There is a diʃerence—certainly!—between the two, and I do not in
any way mean to excuse Entreri from his crimes. Neither will I consider him the simple
killing monster that was, say, Errtu.
No, there was once potential there, I know, though I fear he is far gone from that
road, for when I look upon Artemis Entreri, I see myself, I see the capacity to love, and
also the capacity to lose all of that and become cold.
So very cold.
Perhaps we will meet again and do battle, and if I kill him, I will shed no tears for
him. Not for who he is, at least, but quite possibly, I will cry for who this marvelous
warrior might have become.
If I kill him, I will be crying for myself.

—Drizzt Do’Urden

ntreri slipped through the shadows of Calimport’s bowels as quietly as an owl glided
through a forest at twilight. This was his home, the place he knew best, and all the
street people of the city would mark the day when Artemis Entreri again walked beside
them—or behind them.
Entreri couldn’t help but smile slightly whenever the hushed whispers commenced in
his wake—the more experienced rogues telling the newcomers that the king had
returned. Entreri never let the legend of his reputation—no matter how well earned—
interfere with the constant state of readiness that had kept him alive through the years.
In the streets, a reputation of power only marked a man as a target for ambitious
second-rates seeking, reputations of their own.
Thus, Entreri’s ɹrst task in the city, outside of his responsibilities to Pasha Pook, was
to reestablish the network of informants and associates that entrenched him in his
station. He already had an important job for one of them, with Drizzt and company fast
approaching, and he knew which one.
“I had heard you were back,” squeaked a diminutive chap appearing as a human boy
not yet into adolescence when Entreri ducked and entered his abode. “I guess most
have.”
Entreri took the compliment with a nod. “What has changed, my halfling friend?”
“Little,” replied Dondon, “and lots.” He moved to the table in the darkest corner of his
small quarters, the side room, facing the ally, in a cheap inn called the Coiled Snake.
“The rules of the street do not change, but the players do.” Dondon looked up from the
table’s unlit lamp to catch Entreri’s eyes with his own.
“Artemis Entreri was gone, after all,” the halɻing explained, wanting to make sure
that Entreri fully understood his previous statement. “The royal suite had a vacancy.”
Entreri nodded his accord, causing the halfling to relax and sigh audibly.
“Pook still controls the merchants and the docks,” said Entreri. “Who owns the
streets?”
“Pook, still,” replied Dondon, “at least in name. He found another agent in your stead.
A whole horde of agents.” Dondon paused for a moment to think. Again he had to be
careful to weigh every word before he spoke it. “Perhaps it would be more accurate to
say that Pasha Pook does not control the streets, but rather that he still has the streets
controlled.”
Entreri knew, even before asking, what the little halfling was leading to. “Rassiter,” he
said grimly.
“There is much to be said about that one and his crew,” Dondon chuckled, resuming his

efforts to light the lantern.
“Pook loosens his reins on the wererats, and the ruɽans of the street take care to stay
out of the guild’s way,” Entreri reasoned.
“Rassiter and his kind play hard.”
“And fall hard.”
The chill of Entreri’s tone brought Dondon’s eyes back up from the lantern, and for the
ɹrst time, the halɻing truly recognized the old Artemis Entreri, the human street ɹghter
who had built his shadowy empire one ally at a time. An involuntary shudder rippled up
Dondon’s spine, and he shifted uncomfortably on his feet.
Entreri saw the eʃect and quickly switched the subject. “Enough of this,” he said. “Let
it not concern you, little one. I have a job for you that is more in line with your talents.”
Dondon finally got the lantern’s wick to take, and he pulled up a chair, eager to please
his old boss.
They talked for more than an hour, until the lantern became a solitary defense against
the insistent blackness of the night. Then Entreri took his leave, through the window
and into the ally. He didn’t believe that Rassiter would be so foolish as to strike before
taking full measure of the assassin, before the wererat could even begin to understand
the dimensions of his enemy.
Then again, Entreri didn’t mark Rassiter high on any intelligence scale.
Perhaps it was Entreri, though, who didn’t truly understand his enemy, or how
completely Rassiter and his wretched minions had come to dominate the streets over the
last three years. Less than ɹve minutes after Entreri had gone, Dondon’s door swung
open again.
And Rassiter stepped through.
“What did he want?” the swaggering ɹghter asked, plopping comfortably into a chair
at the table.
Dondon moved away uneasily, noticing two more of Rassiter’s cronies standing guard
in the hall. After more than a year, the halfling still felt uncomfortable around Rassiter.
“Come, come now,” Rassiter prompted. He asked again, his tone more grim, “What did
he want?”
The last thing Dondon wanted was to get caught in a crossɹre between the wererats
and the assassin, but he had little choice but to answer Rassiter. If Entreri ever learned
of the double-cross, Dondon knew that his days would swiftly end.
Yet, if he didn’t spill out to Rassiter, his demise would be no less certain, and the
method less swift.
He sighed at the lack of options and spilled his story, detail by detail, to Rassiter.
Rassiter gave no countermand to Entreri’s instructions. He would let Dondon play out
the scenario exactly as Entreri had devised it. Apparently, the wererat believed he could
twist it into his own gains. He sat quietly for a long moment, scratching his hairless chin
and savoring the anticipation of the easy victory, his broken teeth gleaming even a

deeper yellow in the lamplight.
“You will run with us this night?” he asked the halɻing, satisɹed that the assassin
business was completed. “The moon will be bright.” He squeezed one of Dondon’s
cherublike cheeks. “The fur will be thick, eh?”
Dondon pulled away from the grasp. “Not this night,” he replied, a bit too sharply.
Rassiter cocked his head, studying Dondon curiously. He always had suspected that the
halɻing was not comfortable with his new station. Might this deɹance be linked to the
return of his old boss? Rassiter wondered.
“Tease him and die,” Dondon replied, drawing an even more curious look from the
wererat.
“You have not begun to understand this man you face,” Dondon continued, unshaken.
“Artemis Entreri is not to be toyed with—not by the wise. He knows everything. If a
half-sized rat is seen running with the pack, then my life is forfeit and your plans are
ruined.” He moved right up, in spite of his revulsion for the man, and set a grave visage
barely an inch from Rassiter’s nose.
“Forfeit,” he reiterated, “at the least.”
Rassiter spun out of the chair, sending it bouncing across the room. He had heard too
much about Artemis Entreri in a single day for his liking. Everywhere he turned,
trembling lips uttered the assassin’s name.
Don’t they know? he told himself once again as he strode angrily to the door. It is
Rassiter they should fear!
He felt the telltale itching on his chin, then the crawling sensation of tingling growth
swept through his body. Dondon backed away and averted his eyes, never comfortable
with the spectacle.
Rassiter kicked oʃ his boots and loosened his shirt and pants. The hair was visible
now, rushing out of his skin in scraggly patches and clumps. He fell back against the
wall as the fever took him completely. His skin bubbled and bulged, particularly around
his face. He sublimated his scream as his snout elongated, though the wash of agony was
no less intense this time—perhaps the thousandth time—than it had been during his
very first transformation.
He stood then before Dondon on two legs, as a man, but whiskered and furred and
with a long pink tail that ran out the back of his trousers, as a rodent.
“Join me?” he asked the halfling.
Hiding his revulsion, Dondon quickly declined. Looking at the ratman, the halɻing
wondered how he had ever allowed Rassiter to bite him, infecting him with his
lycanthropic nightmare. “It will bring you power!” Rassiter had promised.
But at what cost? Dondon thought. To look and smell like a rat? No blessing this, but a
disease.
Rassiter guessed at the halɻing’s distaste, and he curled his rat snout back in a
threatening hiss, then turned for the door.

He spun back on Dondon before exiting the room. “Keep away from this!” he warned
the halfling. “Do as you were bid and hide away!”
“No doubt to that,” Dondon whispered as the door slammed shut.

The aura that distinguished Calimport as home to so very many Calishites came across
as foul to the strangers from the North. Truly, Drizzt, Wulfgar, Bruenor, and Catti-brie
were weary of the Calim Desert when their ɹve-day trek came to an end, but looking
down on the city of Calimport made them want to turn around and take to the sands
once again.
It was wretched Memnon on a grander scale, with the divisions of wealth so blatantly
obvious that Calimport cried out as ultimately perverted to the four friends. Elaborate
houses, monuments to excess and hinting at wealth beyond imagination, dotted the
cityscape. Yet, right beside those palaces loomed lane after lane of decrepit shanties of
crumbling clay or ragged skins. The friends couldn’t guess how many people roamed the
place—certainly more than Waterdeep and Memnon combined!—and they knew at once
that in Calimport, as in Memnon, no one had ever bothered to count.
Sali Dalib dismounted, bidding the others do likewise, and led them down a ɹnal hill
and into the unwalled city. The friends found the sights of Calimport no better up close.
Naked children, their bellies bloated from lack of food, scrambled out of the way or were
simply trampled as gilded, slave-drawn carts rushed through the streets. Worse still were
the sides of those avenues, ditches mostly, serving as open sewers in the city’s poorest
sections. There were thrown the bodies of the impoverished, who had fallen to the
roadside at the end of their miserable days.
“Suren Rumblebelly never told of such sights when he spoke of home,” Bruenor
grumbled, pulling his cloak over his face to deɻect the awful stench. “Past me guessing
why he’d long for this place!”
“De greatest city in de world, dis be!” Sali Dalib spouted, lifting his arms to enhance
his praise.
Wulfgar, Bruenor, and Catti-brie shot him incredulous stares. Hordes of people begging
and starving was not their idea of greatness. Drizzt paid the merchant no heed, though.
He was busy making the inevitable comparison between Calimport and another city he
had known, Menzoberranzan. Truly there were similarities, and death was no less
common in Menzoberranzan, but Calimport somehow seemed fouler than the city of the
drow. Even the weakest of the dark elves had the means to protect himself, with strong
family ties and deadly innate abilities. The pitiful peasants of Calimport, though, and
more so their children, seemed helpless and hopeless indeed.
In Menzoberranzan, those on the lowest rungs of the power ladder could ɹght their
way to a better standing. For the majority of Calimport’s multitude, though, there would

only be poverty, a day-to-day squalid existence until they landed on the piles of buzzard-
pecked bodies in the ditches.

“Take us to the guildhouse of Pasha Pook,” Drizzt said, getting to the point, wanting to

be done with his business and out of Calimport, “then you are dismissed.”
Sali Dalib paled at the request. “Pasha Poop?” he stammered. “Who is dis?”
“Bah!” Bruenor snorted, moving dangerously close to the merchant. “He knows him.”
“Suren he does,” Catti-brie observed, “and fears him.”
“Sali Dalib not—” the merchant began.
Twinkle came out of its sheath and slipped to a stop under the merchant’s chin,
silencing the man instantly. Drizzt let his mask slip a bit, reminding Sali Dalib of the
drow’s heritage. Once again, his suddenly grim demeanor unnerved even his own
friends. “I think of my friend,” Drizzt said in a calm, low tone, his lavender eyes
absently staring into the city, “tortured even as we delay.”
He snapped his scowl at Sali Dalib. “As you delay! You will take us to the guildhouse
of Pasha Pook,” he reiterated, more insistently, “and then you are dismissed.”
“Pook? Oh, Pook,” the merchant beamed. “Sali Dalib know dis man, yes, yes.
Everybody know Pook. Yes, yes, I take you dere, den I go.”
Drizzt replaced the mask but kept the stern visage. “If you or your little companion try
to ɻee,” he promised so calmly that neither the merchant nor his assistant doubted his
words for a moment, “I will hunt you down and kill you.”
The drow’s three friends exchanged confused shrugs and concerned glances. They felt
conɹdent that they knew Drizzt to his soul, but so grim was his tone that even they
wondered how much of his promise was an idle threat.

It took more than an hour for them to twist and wind their way through the maze that
was Calimport, to the dismay of the friends, who wanted nothing more than to be oʃ
the streets and away from the fetid stench. Finally, to their relief, Sali Dalib turned a
ɹnal corner, to Rogues Circle, and pointed to the unremarkable wooden structure at its
end: Pasha Pook’s guildhouse.
“Dere be de Pook,” Sali Dalib said. “Now, Sali Dalib take his camels and be gone, back
to Memnon.”
The friends were not so quick to be rid of the wily merchant. “More to me guessin’ that
Sali Dalib be heading for Pook to sell some tales o’ four friends,” Bruenor growled.
“Well, we’ve a way beyond that,” said Catti-brie. She shot Drizzt a sly wink, then
moved up to the curious and frightened merchant, reaching into her pack as she went.
Her look went suddenly grim, so wickedly intense that Sali Dalib jerked back when her
hand came up to his forehead. “Hold yer place!” Catti-brie snapped at him harshly, and
he had no resistance to the power of her tone. She had a powder, a ɻourlike substance,
in her pack. Reciting some gibberish that sounded like an arcane chant, she traced a
scimitar on Sali Dalib’s forehead. The merchant tried to protest but couldn’t ɹnd his
tongue for his terror.
“Now for the little one,” Catti-brie said, turning to Sali Dalib’s goblin assistant. The
goblin squeaked and tried to dash away, but Wulfgar caught it in one hand and held it

out to Catti-brie, squeezing tighter and tighter until the thing stopped wiggling.
Catti-brie performed the ceremony again then turned to Drizzt. “They be linked to yer
spirit now,” she said. “Do ye feel them?”
Drizzt, understanding the bluff, nodded grimly and slowly drew his two scimitars.
Sali Dalib paled and nearly toppled over, but Bruenor, moving closer to watch his
daughter’s games, was quick to prop the terrified man up.
“Ah, let them go, then. Me witchin’s through,” Catti-brie told both Wulfgar and
Bruenor. “The drow’ll feel yer presence now,” she hissed at Sali Dalib and his goblin.
“He’ll know when ye’re about and when ye’ve gone. If ye stay in the city, and if ye’ve
thoughts o’ going to Pook, the drow’ll know, and he’ll follow yer feel—hunt ye down.”
She paused a moment, wanting the two to fully comprehend the horror they faced. “And
he’ll kill ye slow.”
“Take yer lumpy horses, then, and be gone!” Bruenor roared. “If I be seein’ yer stinkin’
faces again, the drow’ll have to get in line for his cuts!”
Before the dwarf had even ɹnished, Sali Dalib and the goblin had collected their
camels and were oʃ, away from Rogues Circle and back toward the northern end of the
city.
“Them two’re for the desert,” Bruenor laughed when they had gone. “Fine tricks, me
girl.”
Drizzt pointed to the sign of an inn, the Spitting Camel, halfway down the lane. “Get
us rooms,” he told his friends. “I will follow them to make certain they do indeed leave
the city.”
“Wastin’ yer time,” Bruenor called after him. “The girl’s got ’em running, or I’m a
bearded gnome!”
Drizzt had already started padding silently into the maze of Calimport’s streets.
Wulfgar, caught unawares by her uncharacteristic trickery and still not quite sure what
had just happened, eyed Catti-brie carefully. Bruenor didn’t miss his apprehensive look.
“Take note, boy,” the dwarf taunted. “Suren the girl’s got herself a nasty streak ye’ll
not want turned on yerself!”
Playing through for the sake of Bruenor’s enjoyment, Catti-brie glared at the big
barbarian and narrowed her eyes, causing Wulfgar to back oʃ a cautious step. “Witchin’
magic,” she cackled. “Tells me when yer eyes be ɹlled with the likings of another
woman!” She turned slowly, not releasing him from her stare until she had taken three
steps down the lane toward the inn Drizzt had indicated.
Bruenor reached high and slapped Wulfgar on the back as he started after Catti-brie.
“Fine lass,” he remarked to Wulfgar. “Just don’t be gettin’ her mad!”
Wulfgar shook the confusion out of his head and forced out a laugh, reminding himself
that Catti-brie’s “magic” had been only a dupe to frighten the merchant.
But Catti-brie’s glare as she had carried out the deception, and the sheer strength of
her intensity, followed him as he walked down Rogues Circle. Both a shudder and a

sweet tingle spread down his spine.

Half the sun had fallen below the western horizon before Drizzt returned to Rogues
Circle. He had followed Sali Dalib and his assistant far out into the Calim Desert, though
the merchant’s frantic pace gave no indications that he had any intentions of turning
back to Calimport. Drizzt simply wouldn’t take the chance; they were too close to
finding Regis and too close to Entreri.
Masked as an elf—Drizzt was beginning to realize how easily the disguise now came to
him—he made his way into the Spitting Camel and to the innkeeper’s desk. An
incredibly skinny, leather-skinned man, who kept his back always to a wall and his head
darting nervously in every direction, met him.
“Three friends,” Drizzt said gruffly. “A dwarf, a woman, and a golden-haired giant.”
“Up the stairs,” the man told him. “To the left. Two gold if you mean to stay the
night.” He held out his bony hand.
“The dwarf already paid you,” Drizzt said grimly, starting away.
“For himself, the girl, and the big the innkeeper started, grabbing Drizzt by the
shoulder. The look in Drizzt’s lavender eves, though, stopped the innkeeper cold.
“He paid,” the frightened man stuttered. “I remember. He paid.”
Drizzt walked away without another word.
He found the two rooms on opposite sides of the corridor at the far end of the
structure. He had meant to go straight in with Wulfgar and Bruenor and grab a short
rest, hoping to be out on the street when night fully fell, when Entreri would likely be
about. Drizzt found, instead, Catti-brie in her doorway, apparently waiting for him. She
motioned him into her chamber and closed the door behind him.
Drizzt settled on the very edge of one of the two chairs in the center of the room, his
foot tapping the floor in front of him.
Catti-brie studied him as she walked around to the other chair. She had known Drizzt
for years but never had seen him so agitated.
“Ye seem as though ye mean to tear yerself into pieces,” she said.
Drizzt gave her a cold look, but Catti-brie laughed it away. “Do ye mean to strike me,
then?”
That prompted the drow to settle back in his chair.
“And don’t ye be wearing that silly mask,” Catti-brie scolded.
Drizzt reached for the mask but hesitated.
“Take it oʃ!” Catti-brie ordered, and the drow complied before he had time to
reconsider
“Ye came a bit grim in the street afore ye left,” Catti-brie remarked, her voice
softening.
“We had to make certain,” Drizzt replied coldly. I do not trust Sali Dalib.”

“Nor meself,” Catti-brie agreed, “but ye’re still grim, by me seeing.”
“You were the one with the witching magic,” Drizzt shotback, his tone defensive. “It
was Catti-brie who showed herself grim then.”
Catti-brie shrugged. “A needed act,” she said. “An act I dropped when the merchant
had gone. But yerself,” she said pointedly, leaning forward and placing a comforting
hand on Drizzt’s knee. “Ye’re up for a fight.”
Drizzt started to jerk away but realized the truth of her observations and forced
himself to relax under her friendly touch. He looked away, for he found that he could
not soften the sternness of his visage.
“What’s it about?” Catti-brie whispered.
Drizzt looked back to her then and remembered all the times he and she had shared
back in Icewind Dale. In her sincere concern for him now, Drizzt recalled the ɹrst time
they had met, when the smile of the girl—for she was then but a girl—had given the
displaced and disheartened drow a renewed hope for his life among the surface
dwellers.
Catti-brie knew more about him than anyone alive, about those things that were
important to him, and made his stoic existence bearable. She alone recognized the fears
that lay beneath his black skin, the insecurity masked by the skill of his sword arm.
“Entreri,” he answered softly.
“Ye mean to kill him?”
“I have to.”
Catti-brie sat back to consider the words. “If ye be killing Entreri to free Regis,” she
said at length, “and to stop him from hurting anyone else, then me heart says it’s a good
thing.” She leaned forward again, bringing her face close to Drizzt’s, “but if ye’re
meaning to kill him to prove yerself or to deny what he is, then me heart cries.”
She could have slapped Drizzt and had the same eʃect. He sat up straight and cocked
his head, his features twisted in angry denial. He let Catti-brie continue but he could not
dismiss the importance of the observant woman’s perceptions.
“Suren the world’s not fair, me friend. Suren by the measure of hearts, ye been
wronged. But are ye after the assassin for yer own anger? Will killing Entreri cure the
wrong?
Drizzt did not answer, but his look turned stubbornly grim again.
“Look in the mirror, Drizzt Do’Urden,” Catti-brie said, “without the mask. Killin’
Entreri won’t change the color of his skin—or the color of yer own.”
Again Drizzt had been slapped, and this time it brought an undeniable ring of truth
with it. He fell back in his chair, looking upon Catti-brie as he had never looked upon
her before. Where had Bruenor’s little girl gone? Before him loomed a woman, beautiful
and sensitive and laying bare his soul with a few words. They had shared much, it was
true, but how could she know him so very well? And why had she taken the time?
“Ye’ve truer friends than ever ye’ll know,” Catti-brie said, “and not for the way ye

twirl a sword. Ye’ve others who would call themselves friend if only they could get
inside the length of yer arm—if only ye’d learn to look.”
Drizzt considered the words. He remembered the Sea Sprite and Captain Deudermont
and the crew, standing behind him even when they knew his heritage.
“And if only ye’d ever learned to love,” Catti-brie continued, her voice barely audible.
“Suren ye’ve let things slip past, Drizzt Do’Urden.”
Drizzt studied her intently, weighing the glimmer in her dark, saucerlike eyes. He tried
to fathom what she was getting at, what personal message she was sending to him.
The door burst open suddenly, and Wulfgar bounded into the room, a smile stretching
the length of his face and the eager look of adventure gleaming in his pale blue eyes.
“Good that you are back,” he said to Drizzt. He moved behind Catti-brie and dropped an
arm comfortably across her shoulders. “The night has come, and a bright moon peeks
over the eastern rim. Time for the hunt!”
Catti-brie put her hand on Wulfgar’s and ɻashed him an adoring smile. Drizzt was glad
they had found each other. They would grow together in a blessed and joyful life,
rearing children that would no doubt be the envy of all the northland.
Catti-brie looked back to Drizzt. “Just for yer thoughts, me friend,” she said quietly,
calmly. “Are ye more trapped by the way the world sees ye or by the way ye see the
world seein’ ye?”
The tension eased out of Drizzt’s muscles. If Catti-brie was right in her observations, he
would have a lot of thinking to do.
“Time to hunt!” Catti-brie cried, satisɹed that she had gotten her point across. She rose
beside Wulfgar and headed for the door, but she turned her head over her shoulder to
face Drizzt one ɹnal time, giving him a look that told him that perhaps he should have
asked for more from Catti-brie back in Icewind Dale, before Wulfgar had entered her
life.
Drizzt sighed as they left the room and instinctively reached for the magical mask.
Instinctively? he wondered.
Drizzt dropped the thing suddenly and fell back in the chair in thought, clasping his
hands behind his head. He glanced around, hoping, but the room had no mirror.

aValle held his hand within the pouch for a long moment, teasing Pook. They were
alone with the eunuchs, who didn’t count, in the central chamber of the top level.
LaValle had promised his master a gift beyond even the news of the ruby pendant’s
return, and Pook knew that the wizard would oʃer such a promise with great care. It
was not wise to disappoint the guildmaster.
LaValle had great conɹdence in his gift and had no trepidations about his grand
claims. He slid it out and presented it to Pook, smiling broadly as he did so.
Pook lost his breath, and sweat thickened on his palms at the onyx statuette’s touch.”
Magniɹcent,” he muttered, overwhelmed. “Never have I seen such craftsmanship, such
detail. One could almost pet the thing!”
“One can,” LaValle whispered under his breath. The wizard did not want to let on to
all of the gift’s properties at once, however, so he replied, “I am pleased that you are
pleased.”
“Where did you get it?”
LaValle shifted uneasily. “That is not important,” he answered. “It is for you, Master,
given with all of my loyalty.” He quickly moved the conversation along to prevent Pook
from pressing the point. “The workmanship of the statuette is but a fraction of its
value,” he teased, drawing a curious look from Pook.
“You have heard of such ɹgurines,” LaValle went on, satisɹed that the time to
overwhelm the guildmaster had come once again. “They can be magical companions to
their owners.”
Pook’s hands verily trembled at the thought. “This,” he stammered excitedly, “this
might bring the panther to life?”
LaValle’s sly smile answered the question.
“How? When might I—”
“Whenever you desire,” LaValle answered.
“Should we prepare a cage?” Pook asked.
“No need.”
“But at least until the panther understands who its master—” “You possess the
ɹgurine,” LaValle interrupted. “The creature you summon is wholly yours. It will follow
your every command exactly as you desire.”
Pook clutched the statuette close to his chest. He could hardly believe his fortune. The
great cats were his ɹrst and foremost love, and to have in his possession one with such
obedience, an extension of his own will, thrilled him as he had never been thrilled
before.

“Now,” he said. “I want to call the cat now. Tell me the words.”
LaValle took the statue and placed it on the ɻoor, then whispered into Pook’s ear,
taking care that his own uttering of the cat’s name didn’t summon Guenhwyvar and ruin
the moment for Pook.
“Guenhwyvar,” Pook called softly. Nothing happened at ɹrst, but both Pook and
LaValle could sense the link being completed to the distant entity.
“Come to me, Guenhwyvar!” Pook commanded.
His voice rolled through the tunnel gate in the Planes of existence, down the dark
corridor to the Astral Plane, the home of the entity of the panther. Guenhwyvar
awakened to the summons. Cautiously the cat found the path.
“Guenhwyvar,” the call came again, but the cat did not recognize the voice. It had
been many tendays since its master had brought it to the Prime Material Plane, and the
panther had had a well-deserved and much-needed rest, but one that had brought with it
a cautious trepidation. Now, with an unknown voice summoning it, Guenhwyvar
understood that something had definitely changed.
Tentatively, but unable to resist the summons, the great cat padded oʃ down the
corridor.
Pook and LaValle watched, mesmerized, as a gray smoke appeared, shrouding the
ɻoor around the ɹgurine. It swirled lazily for a few moments then took deɹnite shape,
solidifying into Guenhwyvar. The cat stood perfectly still, seeking some recognition of
its surroundings.
“What do I do?” Pook asked LaValle. The cat tensed at the sound of the voice—its
master’s voice.
“Whatever pleases you,” LaValle answered. “The cat will sit by you, hunt for you, walk
at your heel—kill for you.”
Some ideas popped into the guildmaster’s head at the last comment. “What are its
limits?”
LaValle shrugged. “Most magic of this kind will fade after a length of time, though you
can summon the cat again once it has rested,” he quickly added, seeing Pook’s
disheartened look. “It cannot be killed; to do so would only return it to its plane, though
the statue could be broken.”
Again Pook’s look soured. The item had already become too precious for him to
consider losing it.
“I assure you that destroying the statue would not prove an easy task,” LaValle
continued. “Its magic is quite potent. The mightiest smith in all the Realms could not
scratch it with his heaviest hammer!”
Pook was satisfied. “Come to me,” he ordered the cat, extending his hand.
Guenhwyvar obeyed and flattened its ears as Pook gently stroked the soft black coat.
“I have a task,” Pook announced suddenly, turning an excited glance at LaValle, “a
memorable and marvelous task! The first task for Guenhwyvar.”

LaValle’s eyes lit up at the pure pleasure stamped across Pook’s face.
“Fetch me Regis,” Pook told LaValle. “Let Guenhwyvar’s ɹrst kill be the halɻing I most
despise!”

Exhausted from his ordeal in the Cells of Nine, and from the various tortures Pook had
put him through, Regis was easily shoved ɻat to his face before Pook’s throne. The
halɻing struggled to his feet, determined to accept the next torture—even if it meant
death—with dignity.
Pook waved the guards out of the room. “Have you enoyed your stay with us?” he
teased Regis.
Regis brushed the mop of hair back from his face. “Acceptable,” he replied. “The
neighbors are noisy, though, growling and purring all the night through.”
“Silence!” Pook snapped He looked at LaValle, standing beside the great chair. “He
will find little humor here,” the guildmaster said with a venomous chuckle.
Regis had passed beyond fear, though, into resignation. “You have won,” he said
calmly, hoping to steal some of the pleasure from Pook. “I took your pendant and was
caught. If you believe that crime is deserving of death, then kill me.”
“Oh, I shall!” Pook hissed. “I had planned that from the start, but I knew not the
appropriate method.”
Regis rocked back on his heels. Perhaps he wasn’t as composed as he had hoped.
“Guenhwyvar,” Pook called.
“Guenhwyvar?” Regis echoed under his breath.
“Come to me, my pet.”

The halɻing’s jaw dropped to his chest when the magical cat slipped out of the half-
opened door to LaValle’s room.

“Wh-where did you get him?” Regis stuttered.
“Magniɹcent, is he not?” Pook replied. “But do not worry, little thief. You shall get a
closer look.” He turned to the cat.
“Guenhwyvar, dear Guenhwyvar,” Pook purred, “this little thief wronged your master.
Kill him, my pet, but kill him slowly. I want to hear his screams.”
Regis stared into the panther’s wide eyes. “Calm, Guenhwvvar,” he said as the cat took
a slow, hesitant stride his way. Truly it pained Regis to see the wondrous panther under
the command of one as vile as Pook. Guenhwyvar belonged with Drizzt.
But Regis couldn’t spend much time considering the implications of the cat’s
appearance. His own future became his primary concern.
“He is the one,” Regis cried to Guenhwyvar, pointing at Pook. “He commands the evil
one who took us from your true master, the evil one your true master seeks!”
“Excellent!” Pook laughed, thinking Regis to be grasping at a desperate lie to confuse
the animal. “This show may yet be worth the agony I have endured at your hands, thief

Regis!
LaValle shifted uneasily, understanding more of the truth to Regis’s words.
“Now, my pet!” Pook commanded. “Bring him pain!”
Guenhwyvar growled lowly, eyes narrowed.
“Guenhwyvar,” Regis said again, backing away a step. “Guenhwyvar, you know me.”
The cat showed no indication that it recognized the halɻing. Compelled by its master’s
voice, it crouched and inched across the floor toward Regis.
“Guenhwyvar!” Regis cried, feeling along the wall for an escape.
“That is the cat’s name,” Pook laughed, still not realizing the halɻing’s honest
recognition of the beast. “Good-bye, Regis. Take comfort in knowing that I shall
remember this moment for the rest of my life!”
The panther ɻattened its ears and crouched lower, tamping down its back paws for
better balance. Regis rushed to the door, though he had no doubt that it was locked, and
Guenhwyvar leaped, impossibly quick and accurate. Regis barely realized that the cat
was upon him.
Pasha Pook’s ecstacy, though, proved short-lived. He jumped from his chair, hoping for
a better view of the action, as Guenhwyvar buried Regis. Then the cat vanished, slowly
fading away.
The halfling, too, was gone.
“What?” Pook cried. “That is it? No blood?” He spun on LaValle. “Is that how the thing
kills?”
The wizard’s horriɹed expression told Pook a diʃerent tale. Suddenly the guildmaster
recognized the truth of Regis’s banterings with the cat. “It took him away!” Pook roared.
He rushed around the side of the chair and pushed his face into LaValle’s. “Where? Tell
me!”
LaValle nearly fell from his trembling. “Not possible.” He gasped. “The cat must obey
its master, the possessor.”
“Regis knew the cat!” Pook cried.
“Impossible loyalties,” LaValle replied, truly dumbfounded.
Pook composed himself and settled back in his chair. “Where did you get it?” he asked
LaValle.
“Entreri,” the wizard replied immediately, not daring to hesitate.
Pook scratched his chin. “Entreri,” he echoed. The pieces started failing into place.
Pook understood Entreri well enough to know that the assassin would not give away so
valuable an item without getting something in return. “It belonged to one of the
halɻing’s friends,” Pook reasoned, remembering Regis’s references to the cat’s true
master.
“I did not ask,” replied LaValle.
“You did not have to ask!” Pook shot back. “It belonged to one of the halɻing’s friends

—perhaps one of those Oberon spoke of. Yes. And Entreri gave it to you in exchange for
...” He tossed a wicked look LaValle’s way.
“Where is the pirate, Pinochet?” he asked slyly.
LaValle nearly fainted, caught in a web that promised death wherever he turned.
“Enough said,” said Pook, understanding everything from the wizard’s paled
expression “Ah, Entreri,” he mused, “ever you prove a headache, however well you serve
me. And you,” he breathed at LaValle. “Where have they gone?”
LaValle shook his head. “The cat’s plane,” he blurted, “the only possibility.”
“And can the cat return to this world?”
“Only if summoned by the possessor of the statue.”
Pook pointed to the statue lying on the ɻoor in front of the door. “Get that cat back,”
he ordered. LaValle rushed for the figurine.
“No, wait.” Pook reconsidered. “Let me ɹrst have a cage built for it. Guenhwyvar will
be mine in time. She will learn discipline.”
LaValle continued over and picked up the statue, not really knowing where to begin.
Pook grabbed him as he passed the throne.
“But the halɻing,” Pook growled, pressing his nose ɻat against LaValle’s. “On your
life, wizard, get that halfling back to me!”
Pook shoved LaValle back and headed for the door to the lower levels. He would have
to open some eyes in the streets, to learn what Artemis Entreri was up to and to learn
more about those friends of the halɻing, whether they still lived or had died in Asavir’s
Channel.
If it had been anyone other than Entreri, Pook would have put his ruby pendant to
use, but that option was not feasible with the dangerous assassin.
Pook growled to himself as he exited the chamber. He had hoped, on Entreri’s return,
that he would never have to take this route again, but with LaValle so obviously tied
into the assassin’s games, Pook’s only option was Rassiter.

“You want him removed?” the wererat asked, liking the beginnings of this assignment
as well as any that Pook had ever given him.
“Do not ɻatter yourself,” Pook shot back. “Entreri is none of your aʃair, Rassiter, and
beyond your power.”
“You underestimate the strength of my guild.”
“You underestimate the assassin’s network—probably numbering many of those you
errantly call comrades,” Pook warned. “I want no war within my guild.”
“Then what?” the wererat snapped in obvious disappointment.
At Rassiter’s antagonistic tone, Pook began to ɹnger the ruby pendant hanging around
his neck. He could put Rassiter under its enchantment, he knew, but he preferred not to.
Charmed individuals never performed as well as those acting of their own desires, and if

Regis’s friends had truly escaped Pinochet, Rassiter and his cronies would have to be at
their very best to defeat them.
“Entreri may have been followed to Calimport,” Pook explained. “Friends of the
halfling, I believe, and dangerous to our guild.”
Rassiter leaned forward, feigning surprise. Of course, the wererat had already learned
from Dondon of the Northerners’ approach.
“They will be in the city soon,” Pook continued. “You haven’t much time.”
They are already here, Rassiter answered silently, trying to hide his smile. “You want
them captured?”
“Eliminated,” Pook corrected. “This group is too mighty. No chances.”
“Eliminated,” Rassiter echoed. “Ever my preference.”
Pook couldn’t help but shudder. “Inform me when the task is complete,” he said,
heading for the door.
Rassiter silently laughed at his master’s back. “Ah, Pook,” he whispered as the
guildmaster left, “how little you know of my inɻuences.” The wererat rubbed his hands
together in anticipation. The night grew long, and the Northerners would soon be on the
streets—where Dondon would find them.

erched in his favorite corner, across Rogues Circle from the Spitting Camel, Dondon
watched as the elf, the last of the four, moved into the inn to join his friends. The
halɻing pulled out a little pocket mirror to check his disguise—all the dirt and scruʃ
marks seemed in the right places; his clothes were far too large, like those a waif would
pull oʃ an unconscious drunk in an ally; and his hair was appropriately tousled and
snarled, as if it hadn’t been combed in years.
Dondon looked longingly to the moon and inspected his chin with his ɹngers. Still
hairless but tingling, he thought. The halɻing took a deep breath, and then another, and
fought back the lycanthropic urges. In the year he had joined Rassiter’s ranks, he had
learned to sublimate those ɹendish urges fairly well, but he hoped that he could ɹnish
his business quickly this night. The moon was especially bright.
People of the street, locals, gave an approving wink as they passed the halɻing,
knowing the master con artist to be on the prowl once more. With his reputation,
Dondon had long become ineʃective against the regulars of Calimport’s streets, but
those characters knew enough to keep their mouths shut about the halɻing to strangers.
Dondon always managed to surround himself with the toughest rogues of the city, and
blowing his cover to an intended victim was a serious crime indeed!
The halɻing leaned back against the corner of a building to observe as the four friends
emerged from the Spitting Camel a short time later.
For Drizzt and his companions, Calimport’s night proved as unnatural as the sights
they had witnessed during the day. Unlike the northern cities, where nighttime activities
were usually relegated to the many taverns, the bustle of Calimport’s streets only
increased after the sun went down. Even the lowly peasants took on a diʃerent
demeanor, suddenly mysterious and sinister.
The only section of the lane that remained uncluttered by the hordes was the area in
front of the unmarked structure on the back side of the circle: the guildhouse. As in the
daylight, bums sat against the building’s walls on either side of its single door, but now
there were two more guards farther off to either side.
“If Regis is in that place, we’ve got to find our way in,” Catti-brie observed.
“No doubt that Regis is in there,” Drizzt replied. “Our hunt should start with Entreri.”
“We’ve come to ɹnd Regis,” Catti-brie reminded him, casting a disappointed glance his
way. Drizzt quickly clarified his answer to her satisfaction.
“The road to Regis lies through the assassin,” he said. “Entreri has seen to that. You
heard his words at the chasm of Garumn’s Gorge. Entreri will not allow us to ɹnd Regis
until we have dealt with him.”

Catti-brie could not deny the drow’s logic. When Entreri had snatched Regis from them
back in Mithral Hall, he had gone to great pains to bait Drizzt into the chase, as though
his capture of Regis was merely part of a game he was playing against Drizzt.
“Where to begin?” Bruenor huʃed in frustration. He had expected the street to be
quieter, oʃering them a better opportunity to scope out the task before them. He had
hoped that they might even complete their business that very night.
“Right where we are,” Drizzt replied, to Bruenor’s amazement.
“Learn the smell of the street,” the drow explained. “Watch the moves of its people
and hear their sounds. Prepare your mind for what is to come.”
“Time, elf!” Bruenor growled back. “Me heart tells me that Rumblebelly’s liken to have
a whip at his back as we stand here smelling the stinkin’ street!”
“We need not seek Entreri,” Wulfgar cut in, following Drizzt’s line of thinking. “The
assassin will find us.”
Almost on cue, as if Wulfgar’s statement had reminded them all of their dangerous
surroundings, the four of them turned their eyes outward from their little huddle and
watched the bustle of the street around them. Dark eyes peered at them from every
corner; each person that ambled past cast them a sidelong glance. Calimport was not
unaccustomed to strangers—it was a trading port, after all—but these four would stand
out clearly on the streets of any city in the Realms. Recognizing their vulnerability,
Drizzt decided to get them moving. He started oʃ down Rogues Circle, motioning for the
others to follow.
Before Wulfgar, at the tail of the forming line, had even taken a step, however, a
childish voice called out to him from the shadows of the Spitting Camel.
“Hey,” it beckoned, “are you looking for a hit?”
Wulfgar, not understanding, moved a bit closer and peered into the gloom. There
stood Dondon, seeming a young, disheveled human boy.
“What’re yer fer?” Bruenor asked, moving beside Wulfgar.
Wulfgar pointed to the corner.
“What’re yer fer?” Bruenor asked again, now targeting the diminutive, shadowy
figure.
“Looking for a hit?” Dondon reiterated, moving out from the gloom.
“Bah!” Bruenor snorted, waving his hand “Just a boy. Get ye gone, little one. We’ve no
time for play!” He grabbed Wulfgar’s arm and turned away.
“I can set you up,” Dondon said after them.
Bruenor kept right on walking, Wulfgar beside him, but now Drizzt had stopped,
noticing his companions’ delay, and had heard the boy’s last statement.
“Just a boy!” Bruenor explained to the drow as he approached.
“A street boy,” Drizzt corrected, stepping around Bruenor and Wulfgar and starting
back, “with eyes and ears that miss little.”

“How can you set us up?” Drizzt whispered to Dondon while moving close to the
building, out of sight of the too curious hordes.
Dondon shrugged. “There is plenty to steal; a whole bunch of merchants came in
today. What are you looking for?”
Bruenor, Wulfgar, and Catti-brie took up defensive positions around Drizzt and the
boy, their eyes outward to the streets but their ears trained on the suddenly interesting
conversation.
Drizzt crouched low and led Dondon’s gaze with his own toward the building at the
end of the circle.
“Pook’s house,” Dondon remarked offhandedly. “Toughest house in Calimport.”
“But it has a weakness,” Drizzt prompted.
“They all do,” Dondon replied calmly, playing perfectly the role of a cocky street
survivor.
“Have you ever been in there?”
“Maybe I have.”
“Have you ever seen a hundred gold pieces?”
Dondon let his eyes light up, and he purposely and pointedly shifted his weight from
one foot to the other.
“Get him back in the rooms,” Catti-brie said. “Ye be drawing too many looks out here.”
Dondon readily agreed, but he shot Drizzt a warning in the form of an icy stare and
proclaimed, “I can count to a hundred!”
When they got back to the room, Drizzt and Bruenor fed Dondon a steady stream of
coins while the halɻing laid out the way to a secret back entrance to the guildhouse.
“Even the thieves,” Dondon proclaimed, “do not know of it!”
The friends gathered closely, eager for the details.
Dondon made the whole operation sound easy.
Too easy.
Drizzt rose and turned away, hiding his chuckle from the informant. Hadn’t they just
been talking about Entreri making contact? Barely minutes before this enlightening boy
so conveniently arrived to guide them.
“Wulfgar, take oʃ his shoes,” Drizzt said. His three friends turned to him curiously.
Dondon squirmed in his chair.
“His shoes,” Drizzt said again, turning back and pointing to Dondon’s feet. Bruenor, so
long a friend of a halɻing, caught the drow’s reasoning and didn’t wait for Wulfgar to
respond. The dwarf grabbed at Dondon’s left boot and pulled it oʃ, revealing a thick
patch of foot hair—the foot of a halfling.
Dondon shrugged helplessly and sank back in his chair. The meeting was taking the
exact course that Entreri had predicted.
“He said he could set us up,” Catti-brie remarked sarcastically, twisting Dondon’s

words into a more sinister light.
“Who sent ye?” Bruenor growled.
“Entreri,” Wulfgar answered for Dondon. “He works for Entreri, sent here to lead us
into a trap.” Wulfgar leaned over Dondon, blocking out the candlelight with his huge
frame.
Bruenor pushed the barbarian aside and took his place. With his boyish looks, Wulfgar
simply could not be as imposing as the pointy-nosed, red-bearded, ɹre-eyed dwarven
ɹghter with the battered helm. “So, ye little sneakster,” Bruenor growled into Dondon’s
face. “Now we deal for yer stinkin’ tongue! Wag it the wrong way, and I’ll be cutting it
out!”
Dondon paled—he had that act down pat—and began to tremble visibly.
“Calm yerself,” Catti-brie said to Bruenor, playing out a lighter role this time. “Suren
ye’ve scared the little one enough.”
Bruenor shoved her back, turning enough away from Dondon to toss her a wink.
“Scared him?” the dwarf balked. He brought his axe up to his shoulder. “More than
scarin’ him’s in me plans!”
“Wait! Wait!” Dondon begged, groveling as only a halɻing could. “I was just doing
what the assassin made me do, and paid me to do.”
“You know Entreri?” Wulfgar asked.
“Everybody knows Entreri,” Dondon replied. “And in Calimport, everybody heeds
Entreri’s commands!”
“Forget Entreri!” Bruenor growled in his face. “Me axe’ll stop that one from hurting
yerself.”
“You think you can kill Entreri?” Dondon shot back, though he knew the true meaning
of Bruenor’s claim.
“Entreri can’t hurt a corpse,” Bruenor replied grimly. “Me axe’ll beat him to yer head!”
“It is you he wants,” Dondon said to Drizzt, seeking a calmer situation.
Drizzt nodded, but remained silent. Something came across as out of place in this out
of place meeting.
“I choose no sides,” Dondon pleaded to Bruenor, seeing no relief forthcoming from
Drizzt. “I only do what I must to survive.”
“And to survive now, ye’re going to tell us the way in,” Bruenor said. “The safe way
in.”
“The place is a fortress,” Dondon shrugged. “No way is safe.” Bruenor started slipping
closer, his scowl deepening.
“But, if I had to try,” the halfling blurted, “I would try through the sewers.”
Bruenor looked around at his friends.
“It seems correct,” Wulfgar remarked.
Drizzt studied the halɻing a moment longer, searching for some clue in Dondon’s

darting eyes. “It is correct,” the drow said at length.
“So he saved his neck,” said Catti-brie, “but what are we to do with him? Take him
along?”
“Ayuh,” said Bruenor with a sly look. “He’ll be leading!”
“No,” replied Drizzt, to the amazement of his companions. “The halɻing did as we
bade. Let him leave.”
“And go straight off to tell Entreri what has happened?” Wulfgar said.
“Entreri would not understand,” Drizzt replied. He looked Dondon in the eye, giving
no indication to the halɻing that he had ɹgured out his little ploy within a ploy. “Nor
would he forgive.”
“Me heart says we take him,” Bruenor remarked.
“Let him go,” Drizzt said calmly. “Trust me.”
Bruenor snorted and dropped his axe to his side, grumbling as he moved to open the
door. Wulfgar and Catti-brie exchanged concerned glances but stepped out of the way.
Dondon didn’t hesitate, but Bruenor stepped in front of him as he reached the door. “If
I see yer face again,” the dwarf threatened, “or any face ye might be wearin’, I’ll chop
ye down!”
Dondon slipped around and backed into the hall, never taking his eyes oʃ the
dangerous dwarf, then he darted down the hall, shaking his head at how perfectly
Entreri had described the encounter, at how well the assassin knew those friends,
particularly the drow.
Suspecting the truth about the entire encounter, Drizzt understood that Bruenor’s ɹnal
threat carried little weight to the wily halɻing. Dondon had faced them down through
both lies without the slightest hint of a slip.
But Drizzt nodded approvingly as Bruenor, still scowling, turned back into the room,
for the drow also knew that the threat, if nothing else, had made Bruenor feel more
secure.
On Drizzt’s suggestion, they all settled down for some sleep. With the clamor of the
streets, they would never be able to slip unnoticed into one of the sewer grates. But the
crowds would likely thin out as the night waned and the guard changed from the
dangerous rogues of evening to the peasants of the hot day.
Drizzt alone did not ɹnd sleep. He sat propped by the door of the room, listening for
sounds of any approach and lulled into meditations by the rhythmic breathing of his
companions. He looked down at the mask hanging around his neck. So simple a lie, and
he could walk freely throughout the world.
But would he then be trapped within the web of his own deception? What freedom
could he find in denying the truth about himself?
Drizzt looked over at Catti-brie, peacefully slumped in the room’s single bed, and
smiled. There was indeed wisdom in innocence, a vein of truth in the idealism of
untainted perceptions.

He could not disappoint her.
Drizzt sensed a deepening of the outside gloom. The moon had set. He moved to the
room’s window and peeked out into the street. Still the night people wandered, but they
were fewer now, and the night neared its end. Drizzt roused his companions; they could
not aʃord any more delays. They stretched away their weariness, checked their gear,
and moved back down to the street.
Rogues Circle was lined with several iron sewer grates that looked as though they were
designed more to keep the ɹlthy things of the sewers underground than as drains for the
sudden waters of the rare but violent rainstorms that hit the city. The friends chose one
in the alley beside their inn, out of the main way of the street but close enough to the
guildhouse that they could probably ɹnd their underground way without too much
trouble.
“The boy can lift it,” Bruenor remarked, waving Wulfgar to the spot. Wulfgar bent low
and grasped the iron.

“Not yet,” Drizzt whispered, glancing around for suspicious eyes. He motioned Catti-
brie to the end of the ally, back along Rogues Circle, and he darted oʃ down the darker

side. When he was satisɹed that all was clear, he waved back to Bruenor. The dwarf
looked to Catti-brie, who nodded her approval.
“Lift it, boy,” Bruenor said, “and be quiet about it!”
Wulfgar grasped the iron tightly and sucked in a deep draft of air for balance. His
huge arms pumped red with blood as he heaved, and a grunt escaped his lips. Even so,
the grate resisted his tugging.
Wulfgar looked at Bruenor in disbelief, then redoubled his eʃorts, his face now
ɻushing red. The grate groaned in protest, but came up only a few inches from the
ground.
“Suren somethings holdin’ it down,” Bruenor said, leaning over to inspect it.
A “clink” of snapping chain was the dwarf’s only warning as the grate broke free,
sending Wulfgar sprawling backward. The lifting iron clipped Bruenor’s forehead,
knocking his helmet oʃ and dropping him on the seat of his pants. Wulfgar, still
clutching the grate, crashed heavily and loudly into the wall of the inn.
“Ye blasted, foolheaded ...” Bruenor started to grumble, but Drizzt and Catti-brie,
rushing to his aid, quickly reminded him of the secrecy of their mission.
“Why would they chain a sewer grate?” Catti-brie asked.
Wulfgar dusted himself oʃ. “From the inside,” he added. “It seems that something
down there wants to keep the city out.”
“We shall know soon enough,” Drizzt remarked. He dropped down beside the open
hole, slipping his legs in. “Prepare a torch,” he said. “I will summon you if all is clear.”
Catti-brie caught the eager gleam in the drow’s eyes and looked at him with concern.
“For Regis,” Drizzt assured her, “and only for Regis.” Then he was gone, into the
blackness. Black like the lightless tunnels of his homeland.

The other three heard a slight splash as he touched down, then all was quiet.
Many anxious moments passed. “Put a light to the torch,” Bruenor whispered to
Wulfgar.
Catti-brie caught Wulfgar’s arm to stop him. “Faith,” she said to Bruenor.
“Too long,” the dwarf muttered. “Too quiet.”
Catti-brie held on to Wulfgar’s arm for another second, until Drizzt’s soft voice drifted
up to them. “Clear,” the drow said. “Come down quickly.”
Bruenor took the torch from Wulfgar. “Come last,” he said, “and slide the grate back
behind ye. No need in tellin’ the world where we went!”

The ɹrst thing the companions noticed when the torchlight entered the sewer was the
chain that had held the grate down. It was fairly new, without doubt, and fastened to a
locking box constructed on the sewer’s wall.
“Me thinking’s that we’re not alone,” Bruenor whispered.
Drizzt glanced around, sharing the dwarf’s uneasiness. He dropped the mask from his
face, a drow again in an environ suited for a drow. “I will lead,” he said, “at the edge of
the light. Keep ready.” He padded away, picking his silent steps along the edge of the
murky stream of water that rolled slowly down the center of the tunnel.
Bruenor came next with the torch, then Catti-brie and Wulfgar. The barbarian had to
stoop low to keep his head clear of the slimy ceiling. Rats squeaked and scuttled away
from the strange light, and darker things took silent refuge under the shield of the
water. The tunnel meandered this way and that, and a maze of side passages opened up
every few feet. Sounds of trickling water only worsened the confusion, leading the
friends for a moment, then coming louder at their side, then louder still from across the
way.
Bruenor shook the diversions clear of his thoughts, ignored the muck and the fetid
stench, and concentrated on keeping his track straight behind the shadowy ɹgure that
darted in and out at the front edge of his torchlight. He turned a confusing,
multicornered intersection and caught sight of the figure suddenly off to his side.
Even as he turned to follow, he realized that Drizzt still had to be up front.
“Ready!” Bruenor called, tossing the torch to a dry spot beside him and taking up his
axe and shield. His alertness saved them all, for only a split second later, not one, but
two cloaked forms emerged from the side tunnel, swords raised and sharp teeth
gleaming under twitching whiskers.
They were man-sized, wearing the clothes of men and holding swords. In their other
form, they were indeed humans and not always vile, but on the nights of the bright
moon they took on their darker form, the lycanthrope side. They moved like men but
were mantled with the trappings—elongated snout, bristled brown fur, and pink tail—of
sewer rats.
Lining them up over the top of Bruenor’s helm, Catti-brie launched the ɹrst strike. The

silvery ɻash of her killing arrow illuminated the side tunnel like a lightning bolt,
showing many more sinister figures making their way toward the friends.
A splash from behind caused Wulfgar to spin about to face a rushing gang of the
ratmen. He dug his heels into the mud as well as he could and slapped Aegis-fang to a
ready position.
“They was layin’ on us, elf!” Bruenor shouted.
Drizzt had already come to that conclusion. At the dwarf’s ɹrst shout, he had slipped
farther from the torch to use the advantage of darkness. Turning a bend brought him
face to face with two ɹgures, and he guessed their sinister nature before he ever got the
blue light of Twinkle high enough to see their furry brows.
The wererats, though, certainly did not expect what they found standing ready before
them. Perhaps it was because they believed that their enemies were solely in the area
with the torchlight, but more likely it was the black skin of a drow elf that sent them
back on their heels.
Drizzt didn’t miss the opportunity, slicing them down in a single ɻurry before they
ever recovered from their shock. The drow then melted again into the blackness, seeking
a back route to ambush the ambushers.
Wulfgar kept his attackers at bay with long sweeps of Aegis-fang. The hammer blew
aside any wererat that ventured too near, and smashed away chunks of the muck on the
sewer walls every time it completed an arc. But as the wererats came to understand the
power of the mighty barbarian, and came in at him with less enthusiasm, the best that
Wulfgar could accomplish was a stalemate—a deadlock that would only last as long as
the energy in his huge arms.
Behind Wulfgar, Bruenor and Catti-brie fared better. Catti-brie’s magical bow—loosing
arrows over the dwarf’s head—decimated the ranks of the approaching wererats, and
those few that reached Bruenor, oʃ-balance and ducking the deadly arrows of the
woman behind him, proved easy prey for the dwarf.
But the odds were fully against the friends, and they knew that one mistake would cost
them dearly.
The wererats, hissing and spitting, backed away from Wulfgar. Realizing that he had
to initiate more decisive fighting, the barbarian strode forward.
The ratmen parted ranks suddenly, and down the tunnel, at the very edge of the
torchlight, Wulfgar saw one of them level a heavy crossbow and fire.
Instinctively the big man ɻattened against the wall, and he was agile enough to get
out of the missile’s path, but Catti-brie, behind him and facing the other way, never saw
the bolt coming.
She felt a sudden searing burst of pain, then the warmth of her blood pouring down
the side of her head. Blackness swirled about the edges of her vision, and she crumbled
against the wall.

Drizzt slipped through the dark passages as silently as death. He kept Twinkle
sheathed, fearing its revealing light, and led the way with his other magical blade. He
was in a maze, but ɹgured that he could pick his route well enough to rejoin his friends.
Every tunnel he picked, though, lit up at its other end with torchlight as still more
wererats made their way to the fighting.
The darkness was certainly ample for the stealthy drow to remain concealed, but
Drizzt got the uneasy feeling that his moves were being monitored, even anticipated.
Dozens of passages opened up all around him, but his options came fewer and fewer as
wererats appeared at every turn. The circuit to his friends was growing wider with each
step, but Drizzt quickly realized that he had no choice but to go forward. Wererats had
filled the main tunnel behind him, following his route.
Drizzt stopped in the shadows of one dark nook and surveyed the area about him,
recounting the distance he had covered and noting the passages behind him that now
ɻickered in torchlight. Apparently there weren’t as many wererats as he had originally
ɹgured; those appearing at every turn were probably the same groups from the previous
tunnels, running parallel to Drizzt and turning into each new passage as Drizzt came
upon it at the other end.
But the revelation of wererat numbers came as little comfort to Drizzt. He had no
doubts to his suspicions now. He was being herded.

Wulfgar turned and started toward his fallen love, his Catti-brie, but the wererats
came in on him immediately. Fury now drove the mighty barbarian. He tore into his
attackers’ ranks, smashing and squashing them with bone-splitting chops of his
warhammer or reaching out with a bare hand to twist the neck of any who had slipped
in beside him. The ratmen managed a few retreating stabs, but nicks and little wounds
wouldn’t slow the enraged barbarian.
He stomped on the fallen as he passed, grinding his booted heels into their dying
bodies. Other wererats scrambled in terror to get out of his way.
At the end of their line, the crossbowman struggled to reload his weapon, a job made
more diɽcult by his inability to keep his eyes oʃ the spectacle of the approaching
barbarian and made doubly diɽcult by his knowledge that he was the focus of the
powerful man’s rage.
Bruenor, with the wererat ranks dissipated in front of him, had more time to tend to
Catti-brie. He bent over the young woman, his face ashen as he pulled her thick mane of
auburn hair, thicker now with the wetness of her blood, from her fair face.
Catti-brie looked up at him through stunned eyes. “But an inch more, and me life’d be
at its end,” she said with a wink and a smile.
Bruenor scrambled to inspect the wound, and found, to his relief, that his daughter was
correct in her observations. The quarrel had gouged her wickedly, but it was only a
grazing shot.
“I’m all right,” Catti-brie insisted, starting to rise.

Bruenor held her down. “Not yet,” he whispered.
The ɹght’s not done,” Catti-brie replied, still trying to plant her feet under her.
Bruenor led her gaze down the tunnel, to Wulfgar and the bodies piling all about him.
“There’s our chance,” he chuckled “Let the boy think ye’re down.”
Catti-brie bit her lip in astonishment of the scene. A dozen ratmen were down and still
Wulfgar pounded through, his hammer tearing away those unfortunates who couldn’t
flee out of his way.
Then a noise from the other direction turned Catti-brie away. With her bow down, the
wererats from the front had returned.
“They’re mine,” Bruenor told her. “Keep yerself down!”
“If ye get into trouble—”
“If I need ye, then be there,” Bruenor agreed, “but for now, keep yerself down! Give
the boy something to fight for!”

Drizzt tried to double back along his route, but the ratmen quickly closed oʃ all of the
tunnels. Soon his options had been cut down to one, a wide, dry side passage moving in
the opposite direction from where he had hoped to go.
The ratmen were closing on him fast, and in the main tunnel he would have to ɹght
them oʃ from several diʃerent directions. He slipped into the passage and ɻattened
against the wall.
Two ratmen shuʀed up to the tunnel entrance and peered into the gloom, calling a
third, with a torch, to join them. The light they found was not the yellow ɻicker of a
torch, but a sudden line of blue as Twinkle came free of its scabbard. Drizzt was upon
them before they could raise their weapons in defense, thrusting a blade clean through
one wererat’s chest and spinning his second blade in an arc across the other’s neck.
The torchlight enveloped them as they fell, leaving the drow standing there, revealed
both his blades dripping blood. The nearest wererats shrieked; some even dropped their
weapons and ran, but more of them came up, blocking all of the tunnel entrances in the
area, and the advantage of sheer numbers soon gave the ratmen a measure of
conɹdence. Slowly, looking to each other for support with every step, they closed in on
Drizzt.
Drizzt considered rushing a single, group, hoping to cut through their ranks and be out
of the ring of the trap, but the ratmen were at least two deep at every passage, three or
even four deep at some. Even with his, skill and agility, Drizzt could never get through
them fast enough to avoid attacks at his back.
He darted back into the side passage and summoned a globe of darkness inside its
entrance, then he sprinted beyond the area of the globe to take up a ready position just
behind it.
The ratmen, quickening their charge as Drizzt disappeared back into the tunnel,
stopped short when they turned into the area of unbreakable darkness. At ɹrst, they

thought that their torches must have gone out, but so deep was the gloom that they soon
realized the truth of the drow’s spell. They regrouped out in the main tunnel, then came
back in, cautiously.
Even Drizzt, with his night eyes, could not see into the pitch blackness of his spell, but
positioned clear of the other side, he did make out a sword tip, and then another,
leading the two front ratmen down the passage. They hadn’t even broken from the
darkness when the drow struck, slapping their swords away and reversing the angle of
his cuts to drive his scimitars up the lengths of their arms and into their bodies. Their
agonized screams sent the other ratmen scrambling back out into the main corridor, and
gave Drizzt another moment to consider his position.

The crossbowman knew his time was up when the last two of his companions shoved
him aside in their desperate flight from the enraged giant. He at last fumbled the quarrel
back into position and brought his bow to bear.
But Wulfgar was too close. The barbarian grabbed the crossbow as it swung about and
tore it from the wererat’s hands with such ferocity that it broke apart when it slammed
into the wall. The wererat meant to ɻee, but the sheer intensity of Wulfgar’s glare froze
him in place. He watched, horrified, as Wulfgar clasped Aegis-fang in both hands.
Wulfgar’s strike was impossibly fast. The wererat never comprehended that the death
blow had even begun. He only felt a sudden explosion on top of his head.
The ground rushed up to meet him; he was dead before he ever splatted into the muck.
Wulfgar, his eyes rimmed with tears, hammered on the wretched creature viciously until
its body was no more than a lump of undefinable waste.
Spattered with blood and muck and black water, Wulfgar ɹnally slumped back against
the wall. As he released himself from the consuming rage, he heard the ɹghting behind
and spun to ɹnd Bruenor beating back two of the ratmen, with several more lined up
behind them.
And behind the dwarf, Catti-brie lay still against the wall. The sight refueled Wulfgar’s
ɹre. “Tempus!” he roared to his god of battle, and he pounded through the muck, back
down the tunnel. The wererats facing Bruenor tripped over themselves trying to get
away, giving the dwarf the opportunity to cut down two more of them—he was happy
to oblige. They fled back into the maze of tunnels.
Wulfgar meant to pursue them, to hunt each of them down and vent his vengeance,
but Catti-brie rose to intercept him. She leaped into his chest as he skidded in surprise,
wrapped her arms around his neck, and kissed him more passionately than he had ever
imagined he could be kissed.
He held her at arm’s length, gawking and stuttering in confusion until a joyful smile
spread wide and took all other emotions out of his face. Then he hugged her back for
another kiss.
Bruenor pulled them apart. “The elf?” he reminded them. He scooped up the torch,
now halfcovered with mud and burning low, and led them off down the tunnel.

They didn’t dare turn into one of the many side passages, for fear of getting lost. The
main corridor was the swiftest route, wherever it might take them, and they could only
hope to catch a glimpse or hear a sound that would direct them to Drizzt.
Instead they found a door.
“The guild?” Catti-brie whispered.
“What else could it be?” Wulfgar replied.” Only a thieves’ house would keep a door to
the sewers.”
Above the door, in a secret cubby, Entreri eyed the three friends curiously. He had
known that something was amiss when the wererats had begun to gather in the sewers
earlier that night. Entreri had hoped they would move out into the city, but it had soon
become apparent that the wererats meant to stay.
Then these three showed up at the door without the drow.
Entreri put his chin in his palm and considered his next course of action.
Bruenor studied the door curiously. On it, at about eye level for a human, was nailed a
small wooden box. Having no time to play with riddles, the dwarf boldly reached up
and tore the box free, bringing it down and peeking over its rim.
The dwarf’s face twisted with even more confusion when he saw inside. He shrugged
and held the box out to Wulfgar and Catti-brie.
Wulfgar was not so confused. He had seen a similar item before, back on the docks of
Baldur’s Gate. Another gift from Artemis Entreri—another halfling’s finger.
“Assassin!” he roared, and he slammed his shoulder into the door. It broke free of its
hinges, and Wulfgar stumbled into the room beyond, holding the door out in front of
him. Before he could even toss it aside, he heard the crash behind him and realized how
foolish the move had been. He had fallen right into Entreri’s trap.

A portcullis had dropped in the entranceway, separating him from Bruenor and Catti-
brie.

The tips of long spears led the wererats back through Drizzt’s globe of darkness. The
drow still managed to take one of the lead ratmen down, but he was backed up by the
press of the group that followed. He gave ground freely, ɹghting oʃ their thrusts and
jabs with defensive swordwork. Whenever he saw an opening, he was quick enough to
strike a blade home.
Then a singular odor overwhelmed even the stench of the sewer. A syrupy sweet smell
that rekindled distant memories in the drow. The ratmen pressed him on even harder, as
if the scent had renewed their desire to fight.
Drizzt remembered. In Menzoberranzan, the city of his birth, some drow elves had
kept as pets creatures that exuded such an odor. Sundews, these monstrous beasts were
called, lumpy masses of raglike, sticky tendrils that simply engulfed and dissolved
anything that came too near.
Now Drizzt fought for every step. He had indeed been herded, to face a horrid death or

perhaps to be captured, for the sundew devoured its victims so very slowly, and certain
liquids could break its hold.
Drizzt felt a ɻutter and glanced back over his shoulder. The sundew was barely ten
feet away, already reaching out with a hundred sticky fingers.
Drizzt’s scimitars weaved and dived, spun and cut, in as magniɹcent a dance as he had
ever fought. One wererat was hit ɹfteen times before it even realized that the ɹrst blow
had struck home.
But there were simply too many of the ratmen for Drizzt to hold his ground, and the
sight of the sundew urged them on bravely.
Drizzt felt the tickle of the ɻicking tendrils only inches from his back. He had no room
to maneuver now; the spears would surely drive him into the monster.
Drizzt smiled, and the eager ɹres burned brighter in his eyes. “Is this how it ends?” he
whispered aloud. The sudden burst of his laughter startled the wererats.
With Twinkle leading the way, Drizzt spun on his heels and dived at the heart of the
sundew.

ulfgar found himself in a square, unadorned room of worked stone. Two torches
burned low in wall sconces, revealing another door before him, across from the
portcullis. He tossed aside the broken door and turned back to his friends. “Guard my
back,” he told Catti-brie, but she had already ɹgured her part out and had brought her
bow up level with the door across the room.
Wulfgar rubbed his hands together in preparation for his attempt to lift the portcullis.
It was a massive piece indeed, but the barbarian did not think it beyond his strength. He
grasped the iron, then fell back, dismayed, even before he had attempted to lift.
The bars had been greased.
“Entreri, or I’m a bearded gnome,” Bruenor grumbled. “Ye put yer face in deep, boy.”
“How are we to get him out?” Catti-brie asked.
Wulfgar looked back over his shoulder at the unopened door. He knew that they could
accomplish nothing by standing there, and he feared that the noise of the dropping
portcullis must have attracted some attention—attention that could only mean danger
for his friends.
“Ye can’t be thinking to go deeper,” Catti-brie protested.
“What choice have I?” Wulfgar replied. “Perhaps there is a crank in there.”
“More likely an assassin,” Bruenor retorted, “but ye have to try it.”
Catti-brie pulled her bowstring tight as Wulfgar moved to the door. He tried the handle
but found it locked. He looked back to his friends and shrugged, then spun and kicked
with his heavy boot. The wood shivered and split apart, revealing yet another room, this
one dark.
“Get a torch,” Bruenor told him.
Wulfgar hesitated. Something didn’t feel right, or smell right. His sixth sense, that
warrior instinct, told him he would not ɹnd the second room as empty as the ɹrst, but
with no other place to go, he moved for one of the torches.
Intent on the situation within the room, Bruenor and Catti-brie did not notice the dark
ɹgure drop from the concealed cubby on the wall a short distance down the tunnel.
Entreri considered the two of them for a moment. He could take them out easily, and
perhaps quietly, but the assassin turned away and disappeared into the darkness.
He had already picked his target.

Rassiter stooped over the two bodies lying in front of the side passage. Reverting
halfway through the transformation between rat and human, they had died in the

excruciating agony that only a lycanthrope could know. Just like the ones farther back
down the main tunnel, these had been slashed and nipped with expert precision, and if
the line of bodies didn’t mark the path clearly enough, the globe of darkness hanging in
the side passage certainly did. It appeared to Rassiter that his trap had worked, though
the price had certainly been high.
He dropped to the lower corner of the wall and crept along, nearly tripping over still
more bodies of his guildmates as he came through the other side.
The wererat shook his head in disbelief as he moved down the tunnel, stepping over a
wererat corpse every few feet. How many had the master swordsman killed?
“A drow!” Rassiter balked in sudden understanding as he turned the ɹnal bend. Bodies
of his comrades were piled deep there, but Rassiter looked beyond them. He would
willingly pay such a price for the prize he saw before him, for now he had the dark
warrior in hand, a drow elf for a prisoner! He would gain Pasha Pook’s favor and rise
above Artemis Entreri once and for all.
At the end of the passage, Drizzt leaned silently against the sundew, draped by a
thousand tendrils. He still held his two scimitars, but his arms hung limply at his sides
and his head drooped down, his lavender eyes closed.
The wererat moved down the passage cautiously, hoping the drow was not already
dead. He inspected his waterskin, ɹlled with vinegar, and hoped he had brought enough
to dissolve the sundew’s hold and free the drow. Rassiter dearly wanted this trophy
alive.
Pook would appreciate the present more that way.
The wererat reached out with his sword to prod at the drow, but recoiled in pain as a
dagger ɻashed by, slicing across his arm. He spun back around to see Artemis Entreri,
his saber drawn and a murderous look in his dark eyes.
Rassiter found himself caught in his own trap; there was no other escape from the
passage. He fell ɻat against the wall, clutching his bleeding arm, and started inching his
way back up the passage.
Entreri followed the ratman’s progress without a blink.
“Pook would never forgive you,” Rassiter warned.
“Pook would never know,” Entreri hissed back.
Terriɹed, Rassiter darted past the assassin, expecting a sword in his side as he passed.
But Entreri cared nothing about Rassiter; his eyes had shifted down the passage to the
specter of Drizzt Do’Urden, helpless and defeated.
Entreri moved to recover his jeweled dagger, undecided as to whether to cut the drow
free or let him die a slow death in the sundew’s clutches.
“And so you die,” he whispered at length, wiping the slime from his dagger.

With a torch out before him, Wulfgar gingerly stepped into the second room. Like the
ɹrst, it was square and unadorned, but one side was blocked halfway across by a ɻoor-

to-ceiling screen. Wulfgar knew that danger lurked behind the screen, knew it to be a
part of the trap Entreri had set out and into which he had blindly rushed.
He didn’t have the time to berate himself for his lack of judgment. He positioned
himself in the center of the room, still in sight of his friends, and laid the torch at his
feet, clutching Aegis-fang in both hands.
But when the thing rushed out, the barbarian still found himself gawking, amazed.
Eight serpentlike heads interwove in a tantalizing dance, like the needles of frenzied
women knitting at a single garment. Wulfgar saw no humor in the moment, though, for
each mouth was filled with row upon row of razor-sharp teeth.
Catti-brie and Bruenor understood that Wulfgar was in trouble when they saw him
shuʀe back a step. They expected Entreri, or a host of soldiers, to confront him. Then
the hydra crossed the open doorway.
“Wulfgar!” Catti-brie cried in dismay, loosing an arrow. The silver bolt blasted a deep
hole into a serpentine neck, and the hydra roared in pain and turned one head to
consider the stinging attackers from the side.
Seven other heads struck out at Wulfgar.

“You disappoint me, drow,” Entreri continued. I had thought you my equal, or nearly
so. The bother, and risks, I took to guide you here so we could decide whose life was the
lie! To prove to you that those emotions you cling to so dearly have no place in the
heart of a true warrior.
“But now I see that I have wasted my eʃorts,” the assassin lamented. “The question
has already been decided, if it ever was a question. Never would I have fallen into such
a trap!”
Drizzt peeked out from one half-opened eye and raised his head to meet Entreri’s gaze.
“Nor would I,” he said, shrugging oʃ the limp tendrils of the dead sundew. “Nor would
I!”
The wound became apparent in the monster when Drizzt moved out. With a single
thrust, the drow had killed the sundew.
A smile burst across Entreri’s face. “Well done!” he cried, readying his blades.
“Magnificent!”
“Where is the halfling?” Drizzt snarled.
“This does not concern the halfling,” Entreri replied, “or your silly toy, the panther.”
Drizzt quickly sublimated the anger that twisted his face.
“Oh, they are alive,” Entreri taunted, hoping to distract his enemy with anger.
“Perhaps, though perhaps not.”
Unbridled rage often aided warriors against lesser foes, but in an equal battle of
skilled swordsmen, thrusts had to be measured and defenses could not be let down.
Drizzt came in with both blades thrusting. Entreri deɻected them aside with his saber

and countered with a jab of his dagger.
Drizzt twirled out of danger’s way, coming around a full circle and slicing down with
Twinkle. Entreri caught the weapon with his saber, so that the blades locked hilt to hilt
and brought the combatants close.
“Did you receive my gift in Baldur’s Gate?” the assassin chuckled.
Drizzt did not ɻinch. Regis and Guenhwyvar were out of his thoughts now. His focus
was Artemis Entreri.
Only Artemis Entreri.
The assassin pressed on. “A mask?” he questioned with a wide smirk. “Put it on, drow.
Pretend you are what you are not!”
Drizzt heaved suddenly, throwing Entreri back.
The assassin went with the move, just as happy to continue the battle from a distance.
But when Entreri tried to catch himself, his foot hit a mud-slicked depression in the
tunnel floor and he slipped to one knee.
Drizzt was on him in a ɻash, both scimitars wailing away. Entreri’s hands moved
equally fast, dagger and saber twisting and turning to parry and deɻect. His head and
shoulders bobbed wildly, and remarkably, he worked his foot back under him.
Drizzt knew that he had lost the advantage. Worse, the assault had left him in an
awkward position with one shoulder too close to the wall. As Entreri started to rise,
Drizzt jumped back.
“So easy?” Entreri asked him as they squared oʃ again. “Do you think that I sought
this fight for so long, only to die in its opening exchanges?”
“I do not ɹgure anything where Artemis Entreri is concerned,” Drizzt came back. “You
are too foreign to me, assassin. I do not pretend to understand your motives, nor do I
have any desire to learn of them.”
“Motives?” Entreri balked. “I am a ɹghter—purely a ɹghter. I do not mix the calling of
my life with lies of gentleness and love!” He held the saber and dagger out before him.
“These are my only friends, and with them—”
“You are nothing,” Drizzt cut in. “Your life is a wasted lie.”
“A lie?” Entreri shot back. “You are the one who wears the mask, drow. You are the
one who must hide.”
Drizzt accepted the words with a smile. Only a few days before, they might have stung
him, but now, after the insight Catti-brie had given him, they rang hollowly in Drizzt’s
ears. “You are the lie, Entreri,” he replied calmly. “You are no more than a loaded
crossbow, an unfeeling weapon, that will never know life.” He started walking toward
the assassin, jaw firm in the knowledge of what he must do.
Entreri strode in with equal confidence.
“Come and die, drow,” he spat.

Wulfgar backed quickly, snapping his warhammer back and forth in front of him to
parry the hydra’s dizzying attacks. He knew that he couldn’t hold the incessant thing oʃ
for long. He had to find a way to strike back against its offensive fury.
But against the seven snapping maws, weaving a hypnotic dance and lunging out
singly or all together, Wulfgar had no time to prepare an attack sequence.
With her bow, beyond the range of the heads, Catti-brie had more success. Tears
rimmed her eyes in fear for Wulfgar, but she held them back with a grim determination
not to surrender. Another arrow blasted into the lone head that had turned her way,
scorching a hole right between the eyes. The head shuddered and jerked back, then
dropped to the floor with a thud, quite dead.
The attack, or the pain from it, seemed to paralyze the rest of the hydra for just a
second, and the desperate barbarian did not miss the opportunity. He rushed forward a
step and slammed Aegis-fang with all of his might into the snout of another head,
snapping it back. It, too, dropped lifelessly to the floor.
“Keep it in front of the door!” Bruenor called. “And don’t ye be coming through
without a shout. Suren the girl’d cut’ ye down!”
If the hydra was a stupid beast, it at least understood hunting tactics. It turned its body
at an angle to the open door, preventing any chance for Wulfgar to get by. Two heads
were down, and another silver arrow, and then another, sizzled in, this time catching
the bulk of the hydra’s body. Wulfgar, working frantically and just ɹnished with the
furious battle against the wererats, was beginning to tire.
He missed the parry as one head came in, and powerful jaws closed around his arm,
cutting gashes just below his shoulder.
The hydra attempted to shake its neck and tear the man’s arm oʃ, its usual tactic, but
it had never encountered one of Wulfgar’s strength before. The barbarian locked his arm
tight against his side, grimacing away the pain, and held the hydra in place. With his
free hand Wulfgar grasped Aegis-fang just under the hammer’s head and jabbed the butt
end into the hydra’s eye. The beast loosened its grip and Wulfgar tore himself free and
fell back, just in time to avoid five other snapping attacks.
He could still fight, but the wound would slow him even more.
“Wulfgar!” Catti-brie cried again, hearing his groan.
“Get out o’ there, boy!” Bruenor yelled.
Wulfgar was already moving. He dived toward the back wall and rolled around the
hydra. The two closest heads followed his movement and dipped in to snap him up.
Wulfgar rolled right to his feet and reversed his momentum, splitting one jaw wide
open with a mighty chop. Catti-brie, witnessing Wulfgar’s desperate ɻight, put an arrow
into the other head’s eye.
The hydra roared in agony and rage and spun about, now having four lifeless heads
bouncing across the floor.
Wulfgar, backing across to the other side of the room, got an angle to see what lay

behind the screen. “Another door!” he cried to his friends.
Catti-brie got in one more shot as the hydra crossed over to pursue Wulfgar. She and
Bruenor heard the crack as the door split free of its hinges, then a sliding bang as yet
another portcullis dropped behind the big man.

Entreri carried the latest attack, whipping his saber across at Drizzt’s neck while
simultaneously thrusting low with his dagger. A daring move, and if the assassin had not
been so skilled with his weapons, Drizzt would surely have found an opening to drive a
blade through Entreri’s heart. The drow had all he could handle, though, just raising one
scimitar to block the saber and lowering the other to push the dagger aside.
Entreri went through a series of similar double attack routines, and Drizzt turned him
away each, time, showing only one small cut on the shoulder before Entreri ɹnally was
forced to back away.
“First blood is mine,” the assassin crowed. He ran a ɹnger down the blade of his saber,
pointedly showing the drow the red stain.
“Last blood counts for more,” Drizzt retorted as he came in with blades leading. The
scimitars cut at the assassin from impossible angles, one dipping at a shoulder, the other
rising to find the ridge under the rib cage.
Entreri, like Drizzt, foiled the attacks with perfect parries.

“Are ye alive, boy?” Bruenor called. The dwarf heard the renewed fighting back behind
him in the corridors, to his relief, for the sound told him that Drizzt was still alive.
“I am safe,” Wulfgar replied, looking around the new room he had entered. It was
furnished with several chairs and one table which had been recently used, it appeared,
for gambling. Wulfgar had no doubt now that he was under a building, most probably
the thieves’ guildhouse.
“The path is closed behind me,” he called to his friends. “Find Drizzt and get back to
the street. I will find my way to meet you there!”
“I’ll not leave ye!” Catti-brie replied.
“I shall leave you,” Wulfgar shot back.
Catti-brie glared at Bruenor. “Help him,” she begged.
Bruenor’s look was equally stern.
“We have no hope in staying where we are,” Wulfgar called. “Surely I could not
retrace my steps, even if I managed to lift this portcullis and defeat the hydra. Go, my
love, and take heart that we shall meet again!”
“Listen to the boy,” Bruenor said. “Yer heart’s telling ye to stay, but ye’ll be doing no
favors for Wulfgar if ye follow that course. Ye have to trust in him.”
Grease mixed with the blood on Catti-brie’s head as she leaned heavily on the bars
before her. Another demolished door sounded from deeper within the complex of rooms,

like a hammer driving a stake into her heart. Bruenor grabbed her elbow gently. “Come,
girl,” he whispered. “The drow’s afoot and needin’ our help. Trust in Wulfgar.”
Catti-brie pulled herself away and followed Bruenor down the tunnel.

Drizzt pressed the attack, studying the assassin’s face as he went. He had succeeded in
sublimating his hatred of the assassin, heeding Catti-brie’s words and remembering the
priorities of the adventure. Entreri became to him just another obstacle in the path to
freeing Regis. With a cool head, Drizzt focused on the business at hand, reacting to his
opponent’s thrusts and counters as calmly as if he were in a practice gym in
Menzoberranzan.
The visage of Entreri, the man who proclaimed superiority as a ɹghter because of his
lack demotions, often twisted violently, bordering on explosive rage. Truly Entreri hated
Drizzt. For all of the warmth and friendships the drow had found in his life, he had
attained perfection with his weapons. Every time Drizzt foiled Entreri’s attack routine
and countered with an equally skilled sequence, he exposed the emptiness of the
assassin’s existence.
Drizzt recognized the boiling anger in Entreri and sought a way to exploit it. He
launched another deceptive sequence but was again deterred.
Then he came in a straight double-thrust, his scimitars side by side and only an inch
apart.
Entreri blew them both oʃ to the side with a sweeping saber parry, grinning at
Drizzt’s apparent mistake. Growling wickedly, Entreri launched his dagger arm through
the opening, toward the drow’s heart.
But Drizzt had anticipated the move—had even set the assassin up. He dipped and
angled his front scimitar even as the saber came in to parry it, sliding it under Entreri’s
blade and cutting back a reverse swipe. Entreri’s dagger arm came thrusting out right in
the scimitar’s path, and before the assassin could poke his blade into Drizzt’s heart,
Drizzt’s scimitar gashed into the back of his elbow.
The dagger dropped to the muck. Entreri grabbed his wounded arm, grimaced in pain,
and rushed back from the battle. His eyes narrowed on Drizzt, angry and confused.
“Your hunger blurs your ability,” Drizzt said to him, taking a step forward. “We have
both looked into a mirror this night. Perhaps you did not I enjoy the sight it showed to
you.”
Entreri fumed but had no retort. “You have not won yet,” he spat deɹantly, but he
knew that the drow had gained an overwhelming advantage.
“Perhaps not,” Drizzt shrugged, “but you lost many years ago.”
Entreri smiled evilly and bowed low, then took flight back through the passage.
Drizzt was quick to pursue, stopping short, though, when he reached the edge of the
globe of blackness. He heard shuʀing on the other side and braced himself. Too loud for
Entreri, he reasoned, and he suspected that some wererat had returned.

“Are ye there, elf?” came a familiar voice.
Drizzt dashed through the blackness and side-stepped his astonished friends. “Entreri?”
he asked, hoping that the wounded assassin had not escaped unseen.
Bruenor and Catti-brie shrugged curiously and turned to follow as Drizzt ran oʃ into
the darkness.

ulfgar, nearly overcome by exhaustion and by the pain in his arm, leaned heavily
against the smooth wall of an upward-sloping passage. He clutched the wound
tightly, hoping to stem the flow of his lifeblood.
How alone he felt.
He knew that he had been right in sending his friends away. They could have done
little to help him, and standing there, in the open of the main corridor right in front of
the very spot Entreri had chosen for his trap, left them too vulnerable. Wulfgar now had
to move along by himself, probably into the heart of the infamous thieves’ guild.
He released his grip on his biceps and examined the wound. The hydra had bitten him
deeply, but he found that he could still move his arm. Gingerly he took a few swings
with Aegis-fang.
He then leaned back against the wall once more, trying to ɹgure a course of action in
a cause that seemed truly hopeless.

Drizzt slipped from tunnel to tunnel, sometimes slowing his pace to listen for faint
sounds that would aid his pursuit. He didn’t really expect to hear anything; Entreri could
move as silently as he. And the assassin, like Drizzt, moved along without a torch, or
even a candle.
But Drizzt felt conɹdent in the turns he took, as if he were being led along by the same
reasoning that guided Entreri. He felt the assassin’s presence, knew the man better than
he cared to admit, and Entreri could no more escape him than he could Entreri. Their
battle had begun in Mithral Hall months before—or perhaps theirs was only the present
embodiment in the continuation of a greater struggle that was spawned at the dawn of
time—but, for Drizzt and Entreri, two pawns in the timeless struggle of principles, this
chapter of the war could not end until one claimed victory.
Drizzt noted a glimmer down to the side—not the ɻickering yellow of a torch, but a
constant silvery stream. He moved cautiously and found an open grate, with the
moonlight streaming in and highlighting the wet iron rungs of a ladder bolted into the
sewer wall. Drizzt glanced around quickly—too quickly—and rushed to the ladder.
The shadows to his left exploded into motion, and Drizzt caught the telltale shine of a
blade just in time to turn his back from the angle of the blow. He staggered forward,
feeling a burning across his shoulder blades and then the wetness of his blood rolling
down under his cloak.
Drizzt ignored the pain, knowing that any hesitation would surely result in his death,
and spun around, slamming his back into the wall and sending the curved blades of both

his scimitars into a defensive spin before him.
Entreri issued no taunts this time. He came in furiously, cutting and slicing with his
saber, knowing that he had to ɹnish Drizzt before the shock of the ambush wore oʃ.
Viciousness replaced finesse, engulfing the injured assassin in a frenzy of hatred.
He leaped into Drizzt, locking one of the drow’s arms under his own wounded limb
and trying to use brute strength to drive his saber into his opponent’s neck.
Drizzt steadied himself quickly enough to control the initial assault. He surrendered his
one arm to the assassin’s hold, concentrating solely on getting his free scimitar up to
block the strike. The blade’s hilt again locked with that of Entreri’s saber, holding it
motionless in midswing halfway between the combatants.
Behind their respective blades, Drizzt and Entreri eye-balled each other with open
hatred, their grimaces only inches apart.
“How many crimes shall I punish you for, assassin?” Drizzt growled. Reinforced by his
own proclamation, Drizzt pushed the saber back an inch, shifting the angle of his own
deadly blade down more threateningly toward Entreri.
Entreri did not answer, nor did he seem alarmed at the slight shift in the blades’
momentum. A wild, exhilarated look came into his eyes, and his thin lips widened into
an evil grin.
Drizzt knew that the killer had another trick to play.
Before the drow could ɹgure the game, Entreri spat a mouthful of ɹlthy sewer water
into his lavender eyes.

The sound of renewed ɹghting led Bruenor and Catti-brie along the tunnels. They
caught sight of the moonlit forms struggling just as Entreri played his wicked card.
“Drizzt!” Catti-brie shouted, knowing that she couldn’t get to him, even get her bow
up, in time to stop Entreri.
Bruenor growled and bolted forward with only one thought on his mind: If Entreri
killed Drizzt, he would cut the dog in half!

The sting and shock of the water broke Drizzt’s concentration, and his strength, for
only a split second, but he knew that even a split second was too long against Artemis
Entreri. He jerked his head to the side desperately.
Entreri snapped his saber down, slicing a gash across Drizzt’s forehead and crushing
the drow’s thumb between the twisting hilts. “I have you!” he squealed, hardly believing
the sudden turn of events.
At that horrible moment, Drizzt could not disagree with the observation, but the drow’s
next move came more on instinct than on any calculations, and with agility that
surprised even Drizzt. In the instant of a single, tiny hop, Drizzt snapped one foot
behind Entreri’s ankle and tucked the other under him against the wall. He pushed away

and twisted as he went. On the slick ɻoor, Entreri had no chance to dodge the trip, and
he toppled backward into the murky stream, Drizzt splashing down on top of him.
The weight of Drizzt’s heavy fall jammed the crosspiece of his scimitar into Entreri’s
eye. Drizzt recovered from the surprise of his own movement faster than Entreri, and he
did not miss the opportunity. He spun his hand over on the hilt and reversed the ɻow of
the blade, pulling it free of Entreri’s and swinging a short cut back and down, with the
tip of the scimitar diving in at the assassin’s ribs. In grim satisfaction, Drizzt felt it begin
to cut in.
It was Entreri’s turn for a move wrought of desperation. Having no time to bring his
saber to bear, the assassin punched straight out, slamming Drizzt’s face with the butt of
his weapon. Drizzt’s nose splattered onto his cheek, ɻashes of color exploded before his
eyes, and he felt himself lifted and dropped oʃ to the side before his scimitar could
finish its work.
Entreri scrambled out of reach and pulled himself from the murky water. Drizzt, too,
rolled away, struggling against the dizziness to regain his feet. When he did, he found
himself facing Entreri once again, the assassin even worse off than he.
Entreri looked over the drow’s shoulder, to the tunnel and the charging dwarf and to
Catti-brie and her killer bow, coming up level with his face. He jumped to the side, to
the iron rungs, and started up to the street.
Catti-brie followed his motion in a ɻuid movement, keeping him dead in her sights. No
one, not even Artemis Entreri, could escape once she had him cleanly targeted.
“Get him, girl!” Bruenor yelled.
Drizzt had been so involved in the battle that he hadn’t even noticed the arrival of his
friends. He spun around to see Bruenor rolling in, and Catti-brie just about to loose her
arrow.
“Hold!” Drizzt growled in a tone that froze Bruenor in his tracks and sent a shiver
through Catti-brie’s spine. They both gawked, open-mouthed, at Drizzt.
“He is mine!” the drow told them.
Entreri didn’t hesitate to consider his good fortune. Out in the open streets, his streets,
he might find his sanctuary.
With no retort forthcoming from either of his unnerved friends, Drizzt slapped the
magical mask up over his face and was just as quick to follow.

The realization that his delay might bring danger to his friends—for they had gone
rushing oʃ to search for some way to meet him back on the street—spurred Wulfgar to
action. He clasped Aegis-fang tightly in the hand of his wounded arm, forcing injured
muscles to respond to his commands.
Then he thought of Drizzt, of that quality his friend possessed to completely sublimate
fear in the face of impossible odds and replace it with pointed fury.
This time, it was Wulfgar’s eyes that burned with an inner ɹre. He stood wide-legged

in the corridor, his breath rasping out as low growls, and his muscles ɻexing and
relaxing in a rhythmic pattern that honed them to fighting perfection.
The thieves’ guild, the strongest house in Calimport, he thought.
A smile spread over the barbarian’s face. The pain was gone now, and the weariness
had flown from his bones. His smile became a heartfelt laugh as he rushed off.
Time to fight.
He took note of the ascending slope of the tunnel as he jogged along and knew the
next door he went through would be at or near street level. He soon came upon, not
one, but three doors: one at the end of the tunnel and one on either side. Wulfgar hardly
slowed, ɹguring the direction he was traveling to be as good as any, and barreled
through the door at the corridor’s end, crashing into an octagonal-shaped guard room
complete with four very surprised guards.
“Hey!” the one in the middle of the room blurted as Wulfgar’s huge ɹst slammed him
to the ɻoor. The barbarian spotted another door directly across from the one he had
entered, and cut a beeline for it, hoping to get through the room without a drawn-out
fight.
One of the guards, a puny, dark-haired little rogue, proved the quickest. He darted to
the door, inserted a key, and ɻipped the lock, then he turned to face Wulfgar, holding
the key out before him and grinning a broken-toothed smile.
“Key,” he whispered, tossing the device to one of his comrades to the side.
Wulfgar’s huge hand grabbed his shirt, taking out more than a few chest hairs, and the
little rogue felt his feet leave the floor.
With one arm, Wulfgar threw him through the door.
“Key,” the barbarian said, stepping over the kindling—and thief pile.
Wulfgar hadn’t nearly outrun the danger, though. The next room was a great meeting
hall, with dozens of chambers directly oʃ it. Cries of alarm followed the barbarian as he
sprinted through, and a well-rehearsed defense plan went into execution all around him.
The human thieves, Pook’s original guild members, ɻed for the shadows and the safety
of their rooms, for they had been relieved of the responsibilities of dealing with
intruders more than a year before—since Rassiter and his crew had joined the guild.
Wulfgar rushed to a short ɻight of stairs and leaped up them in a single bound,
smashing through the door at the top. A maze of corridors and open chambers loomed
before him, a treasury of artworks—statues, paintings, and tapestries—beyond any
collection the barbarian had ever imagined. Wulfgar had little time to appreciate the
artwork. He saw the forms chasing him. He saw them off to the side and gathering down
the corridors before him to cut him oʃ. He knew what they were; he had just been in
their sewers.
He knew the smell of wererats.

Entreri had his feet ɹrmly planted, ready for Drizzt as he came up through the open

grate. When the drow’s form began to exit onto the street, the assassin cut down
viciously with his saber.
Drizzt, running up the iron rungs in perfect balance, had his hands free, however.
Expecting such a move, he had crossed his scimitars up over his head as he came
through. He caught Entreri’s saber in he wedge and pushed it harmlessly aside.
Then they were faced off on the open street.
The ɹrst hints of dawn cracked over the eastern horizon, the temperature had already
begun to soar, and the lazy city awakened around them.
Entreri came in with a rush, and Drizzt fought him back with wicked counters and
sheer strength. The drow did not blink, his features locked in a determined grimace.
Methodically he moved at the assassin, both scimitars cutting with even, solid strokes.
His left arm useless and his left eye seeing no more than a blur, Entreri knew that he
could not hope to win. Drizzt saw it, too, and he picked up the tempo, slapping again
and again at the slowing saber in an effort to further weary Entreri’s only defense.
But as Drizzt pressed into the battle, his magical mask once again loosened and
dropped from his face.
Entreri smirked, knowing that he had once again dodged certain death. He saw his
out.
“Caught in a lie?” he whispered wickedly.
Drizzt understood.
“A drow!” Entreri shrieked to the multitude of people he knew to be watching the
battle from nearby shadows. “From the Forest of Mir! A scout, a prelude to an army! A
drow!”
Curiosity now pulled a throng from their concealments. The battle had been
interesting enough before, but now the street people had to come closer to verify
Entreri’s claims. Gradually a circle began to form around the combatants, and Drizzt
and Entreri heard the ring of swords coming free of scabbards.
“Good-bye, Drizzt Do’Urden,” Entreri whispered under the growing tumult and the
cries of “drow!” springing up throughout the area. Drizzt could not deny the
eʃectiveness of the assassin’s ploy. He glanced around nervously, expecting an attack
from behind at any moment.
Entreri had the distraction he needed. As Drizzt looked to the side again, he broke
away and stumbled off through the crowd, shouting, “Kill the drow! Kill him!”
Drizzt swung around, blades ready, as the anxious mob cautiously moved in. Catti-brie
and Bruenor came up onto the street then and saw at once what had happened, and
what was about to happen. Bruenor rushed to Drizzt’s side and Catti-brie notched an
arrow.
“Back away!” the dwarf grumbled. “Suren there be no evil here, except for the one ye
fools just let get away!”
One man approached boldly, his spear leading the way.

A silver explosion caught the weapon’s shaft, severing its tip. Horriɹed, the man
dropped the broken spear and looked to the side, to where Catti-brie had already
notched another arrow.
“Get away,” she growled at him. “Leave the elf in peace, or me next shot won’t be
lookin’ for yer weapon!”
The man backed away, and the crowd seemed to lose its heart for the ɹght as quickly
as it had found it. None of them ever really wanted to tangle with a drow elf anyway,
and they were more than happy now to believe the dwarf’s words, that this one wasn’t
evil.
Then a commotion down the lane turned all heads. Two of the guards posing as bums
outside the thieves’ guild pulled open the door—to the sound of ɹghting—and charged
inside, slamming the door behind them.
“Wulfgar!” shouted Bruenor, roaring down the road. Catti-brie started to follow but
turned back to consider Drizzt.
The drow stood as if torn, looking one way, to the guild, and the other, to where the
assassin had run. He had Entreri beaten; the injured man could not possibly stand up
against him.
How could he just let Entreri go?
“Yer friends need ye,” Catti-brie reminded him. “If not for Regis, then for Wulfgar.”
Drizzt shook his head in self-reproach. How could he even have considered abandoning
his friends at that critical moment? He rushed past Catti-brie, chasing Bruenor down the
road.

Above Rogues Circle, the dawn’s light had already found Pasha Pook’s lavish
chambers. LaValle moved cautiously toward the curtain at the side of his room and
pushed it aside. Even he, a practiced wizard, would not dare to approach the device of
unspeakable evil before the sun had risen, the Taros Hoop, his most powerful—and
frightening—device.
He grasped its iron frame and slid it out of the tiny closet. On its stand and rollers, it
was taller than he, with the worked hoop, large enough for a man to walk through, fully
a foot oʃ the ɻoor. Pook had remarked that it was similar to the hoop the trainer of his
great cats had used.
But any lion jumping through the Taros Hoop would hardly land safely on the other
side.
LaValle turned the hoop to the side and faced it fully, examining the symmetrical
spider web that filled its interior. So fragile the webbing appeared, but LaValle knew the
strength in its strands, a magical power that transcended the very planes of existence.
LaValle slipped the instrument’s trigger, a thin scepter capped with an enormous black
pearl, into his belt and wheeled the Taros Hoop out into the central room of the level.
He wished that he had the time to test his plan, for he certainly didn’t want to

disappoint his master again, but the sun was nearly full in the eastern sky and Pook
would not be pleased with any delay.
Still in his nightshirt, Pook dragged himself out into the central chamber at LaValle’s
call. The guildmaster’s eyes lit up at the sight of the Taros Hoop, which he, not a wizard
and not understanding the dangers involved with such an item, thought a simply
wonderful toy.
LaValle, holding the scepter in one hand and the onyx ɹgurine of Guenhwyvar in the
other, stood before the device. “Hold this,” he said to Pook, tossing him the statuette.
“We can get the cat later; I’ll not need the beast for the task at hand.”
Pook absently dropped the statuette into a pocket.
“I have scoured the planes of existence,” the wizard explained. I knew the cat to be of
the Astral Plane, but I wasn’t certain that the halɻing would remain there—if he could
find his way out and of course, the Astral Plane is very extensive.”
“Enough!” ordered Pook. “Be on with it! What have you to show me?”
“Only this,” LaValle replied, waving the scepter in front of the Taros Hoop. The
webbing tingled with power and lit up in tiny ɻashes of lightning. Gradually the light
became more constant, ɹlling in the area between strands, and the image of the
webbing disappeared into the background of cloudy blue.
LaValle spoke a command word, and the hoop focused in on a bright, well-lit
grayness, a scene in the Astral Plane. There sat Regis, leaning comfortably against the
limned image of a tree, a starlight sketch of an oak, with his hands tucked behind his
head and his feet crossed out in front of him.
Pook shook the grogginess from his head. “Get him,” he coughed. “How can we get
him?”
Before LaValle could answer, the door burst open and Rassiter stumbled into the room.
“Fighting, Pook,” he gasped, out of breath, “in the lower levels. A giant barbarian.”
“You promised me that you would handle it,” Pook growled at him.
“The assassin’s friends—” Rassiter began, but Pook had no time for explanations. Not
now.
“Shut the door,” he said to Rassiter.
Rassiter quieted and did as he was told. Pook was going to be angry enough with him
when he learned of the disaster in the sewers—no need to press the point.
The guildmaster turned back to LaValle, this time not asking. “Get him,” he said.
LaValle chanted softly and waved the scepter in front of the Taros Hoop again, then
he reached through the glassy curtain separating the planes and caught the sleepy Regis
by the hair.
“Guenhwyvar!” Regis managed to shout, but then LaValle tugged him through the
portal and he tumbled on the floor, rolling right up to the feet of Pasha Pook.
“Uh ... hello,” he stammered, looking up at Pook apologetically. “Can we talk about
this?”

Pook kicked him hard in the ribs and planted the butt of his walking stick on Regis’s
chest. “You will cry out for death a thousand times before I release you from this world,”
the guild-master promised.
Regis did not doubt a word of it.

ulfgar dodged and ducked, slipping into the midst of lines of statues or behind heavy
tapestries as he went. There were simply too many of the wererats, closing in all
about him, for him to even hope to escape.
He passed one corridor and saw a group of three ratmen rushing down toward him.
Feigning terror, the barbarian sprinted beyond the opening, then pulled up short and
put his back tight against the corner. When the ratmen rushed into the room, Wulfgar
smashed them down with quick chops of Aegis-fang.
He then retraced their steps back down the passage, hoping that he might confuse the
rest of his pursuers.
He came into a wide room with rows of chairs and a high ceiling—a stage area for
Pook’s private showings by performing troupes. A massive chandelier, thousands of
candles burning within its sconces, hung above the center of the room, and marble
pillars, delicately carved into the likenesses of famed heroes and exotic monsters, lined
the walls. Again Wulfgar had no time to admire the decorations. He noticed only one
feature in the chamber: a short staircase along one side that led up to a balcony.
Ratmen poured in from the room’s numerous entrances. Wulfgar looked back over his
shoulder, down the passage, but saw that it, too, was blocked. He shrugged and sprinted
up the stairs, ɹguring that that route would at least allow him to ɹght oʃ his attackers
in a line rather than a crowd.
Two wererats rushed up right on his heels, but when Wulfgar made the landing and
turned on them, they realized their disadvantage. The barbarian would have towered
over them on even footing. Now, three steps up, his knees ran level with their eyes.
It wasn’t such a bad position for oʃense; the wererats could poke at Wulfgar’s
unprotected legs. But when Aegis-fang descended in that tremendous arc, neither of the
ratmen could possibly slow its momentum. And on the stairs, they didn’t have much
room to move out of the way.
The warhammer cracked onto the skull of one ratman with enough force to break his
ankles, and the other, blanching under his brown fur, leaped over the side of the
staircase.
Wulfgar nearly laughed aloud.
Then he saw the spears being readied.
He rushed into the balcony for the cover the railings and the chairs might provide and
hoping for another exit. The wererats flooded onto the staircase in pursuit.
Wulfgar found no other doors. He shook his head, realizing that he was trapped, and
slapped Aegis-fang to the ready.

What was it that Drizzt had told him about luck? That a true warrior always seemed to
find the proper route—the one open path that casual observers might consider lucky?
Now Wulfgar did laugh out loud. He had killed a dragon once by dislodging an icicle
above its back. He wondered what a huge chandelier with a thousand burning candles
might do to a room full of ratmen.
“Tempus !” the barbarian roared to his battle god, seeking a measure of deity-inspired
luck to aid his way—Drizzt did not know everything, after all! He launched Aegis-fang
with all his strength, breaking into a dead run after the warhammer.
Aegis-fang twirled across the room as precisely as every throw Wulfgar had ever made
with it. It blasted through the chandelier’s supports, bringing a fair measure of the
ceiling down with it. Ratmen scrambled and dived oʃ to the side as the massive ball of
crystal and flames exploded onto the floor.
Wulfgar, still in stride, planted a foot atop the balcony railing and leaped.

Bruenor growled and brought his axe up over his head, meaning to chop the door to
the guildhouse down in a single stroke, but as the dwarf pounded through the ɹnal
strides to the place, an arrow whistled over his shoulder, scorching a hole around the
latch, and the door swung free.
Unable to break his momentum, Bruenor barreled through the opening and tumbled
head over heels down the stairs inside, taking the two surprised guards along with him.
Dazed, Bruenor pulled himself to his knees and looked back up the stairs, to see Drizzt
sprinting down five steps at a stride and Catti-brie just cresting the top to follow.
“Durn ye, girl!” the dwarf roared. “I told ye to tell me when ye was meaning to do
that!”
“No time,” Drizzt interrupted. He leaped the last seven steps—and clear over the
kneeling dwarf—to intercept two wererats coming in on Bruenor’s back.
Bruenor scooped up his helmet, plopped it back in place, and turned to join the fun,
but the two wererats were long dead before the dwarf ever got back to his feet, and
Drizzt was rushing away to the sounds of a larger battle farther in the complex. Bruenor
oʃered Catti-brie his arm as she came charging past, so that he could proɹt from her
momentum in the pursuit.

Wulfgar’s huge legs brought him clear over the mess of the chandelier, and he tucked
his head under his arms as he dropped into a group of ratmen, knocking them every
which way. Dazed but still coherent enough to mark his direction, Wulfgar barreled
through a door and stumbled into another wide chamber. An open door loomed before
him, leading into yet another maze of chambers and corridors.
But Wulfgar couldn’t hope to get there with a score of wererats blocking his way. He
slipped over to the side of the room and put his back to a wall.
Thinking him unarmed, the ratmen rushed in, shrieking in glee. Then Aegis-fang

magically returned to Wulfgar’s hands and he swatted the ɹrst two aside. He looked
around, searching for another dose of luck.
Not this time.
Wererats hissed at him from every side, nipping with their ravaging teeth. They didn’t
need Rassiter to explain the power such a giant—a wererat giant—could add to their
guild.
The barbarian suddenly felt naked in his sleeveless tunic as each bite narrowly missed
its mark. Wulfgar had heard enough legends concerning such creatures to understand
the horrid implications of a lycanthrope’s bite, and he fought with every ounce of
strength he could muster.
Even with his adrenaline pumping in his terror, the big man had spent half the night
in battle and had suʃered many wounds, most notably the gash on his arm from the
hydra, opened again by his leap from the balcony. His swipes were beginning to slow.
Normally Wulfgar would have fought to the end with a song on his lips as he racked
up a pile of dead enemies at his feet and smiled in the knowledge that he had died a
true warrior. But now, knowing his cause to be hopeless, with implications much worse
than death, he scanned the room for a certain method of killing himself.
Escape was impossible. Victory even more so. Wulfgar’s only thought and desire at
that moment was to be spared the indignity and anguish of lycanthropy.
Then Drizzt entered the room.
He came in on the back of the wererat ranks like a sudden tornado dropping onto an
unprepared village. His scimitars ɻashed blood red in seconds; and patches of fur ɻew
about the room. Those few ratmen in his path who managed to escape put their tails
between themselves and the killer drow and fled from the room.
One wererat turned and got his sword up to parry, but Drizzt lopped oʃ his arm at the
elbow and drove a second blade through the beast’s chest. Then the drow was beside his
giant friend, and his appearance gave Wulfgar renewed courage and strength. Wulfgar
grunted in exhilaration, catching one attacker full in the chest with Aegis-fang and
driving the wretched beast right through a wall. The ratman lay, quite dead, on his back
in one room, but his legs, looped at the knees through the room’s newest window,
twitched grotesquely for his comrades to witness.
The ratmen glanced nervously at each other for support and came at the two warriors
tentatively.
If their morale was sinking, it ɻew away altogether a moment later, when the roaring
dwarf pounded into the room, led by a volley of silver-streaking arrows that cut the rats
down with unerring accuracy. For the ratmen, it was the sewer scenario all over again,
where they had lost more than two dozen of their comrades earlier that same night.
They had no heart to face the four friends united, and those that could flee, did.
Those that remained had a difficult choice: hammer, blade, axe, or arrow.

Pook sat back in his great chair, watching the destruction through an image in the
Taros Hoop. It did not pain the guild-master to see wererats dying—a few well-placed
bites out in the streets could replenish the supply of the wretched things—but Pook
knew that the heroes cutting their way through his guild would eventually wind up in
his face.
Regis, held oʃ the ground by the seat of his pants by one of Pook’s hill giant eunuchs,
watched, too. The mere sight of Bruenor, whom Regis had believed killed in Mithral
Hall, brought tears to the halɻing’s eyes. And the thought that his dearest friends had
traveled the breadth of the Realms to rescue him and were now ɹghting for his sake as
mightily as he had ever witnessed, overwhelmed him. All of them bore wounds,
particularly Catti-brie and Drizzt, but all of them ignored the pain as they tore into
Pook’s militia. Watching them felling foes with every cut and thrust, Regis had little
doubt that they would win through to get to him.
Then the halɻing looked to the side of the Taros Hoop, where LaValle stood,
unconcerned, his arms crossed over his chest and his pearl-tipped scepter tapping on
one shoulder.
“Your followers do not fare so well, Rassiter,” the guildmaster remarked. “One might
even note their cowardice.”
Rassiter shuffled uneasily from one foot to the other.
“Is it that you cannot hold to your part of our arrangement?”
“My guild ɹghts mighty enemies this night,” Rassiter stammered. “They ... we have
not been able ... the fight is not yet lost!”
“Perhaps you should see to it that your rats fare better,” Pook said calmly, and Rassiter
did not miss the command’s—the threat’s—tone. He bowed low and rushed out of the
chamber, slamming the door behind him.
Even the demanding guildmaster could not hold the wererats wholly responsible for
the disaster at hand.
“Magniɹcent,” he muttered as Drizzt fought oʃ two simultaneous thrusts and sliced
down both wererats with individual, yet mystically intertwined counters. “Never have I
seen such grace with a blade.” He paused for a moment to consider that thought.
“Perhaps once!”
Surprised at the revelation, Pook looked at LaValle, who nodded in accord.
“Entreri,” LaValle inferred. “The resemblance is unmistakable. We know now why the
assassin coaxed this group to the south.”
“To ɹght the drow?” Pook mused. “At last, a challenge for the man without peer?” “So
it would seem.”
“But, where is he, then? Why has he not made his appearance?”
“Perhaps he already has,” LaValle replied grimly.
Pook paused to consider the words for a long moment; they were too unconscionable
for him to believe. “Entreri beaten?” He gasped. “Entreri dead?”

The words rang like sweet music to Regis, who had watched the rivalry between the
assassin and Drizzt with horror from its inception. All along, Regis had suspected that
those two would fall into a duel that only one could survive. And all along, the halɻing
had feared for his drow friend.
The thought of Entreri gone put a new perspective on the battle at hand for Pasha
Pook. Suddenly he needed Rassiter and his cohorts again; suddenly the carnage he
watched through the Taros Hoop had a more direct impact on his guild’s immediate
power.
He leaped from his seat and ambled over to the evil device. “We must stop this,” he
snarled at LaValle. “Send them away to a dark place!”
The wizard grinned wickedly and shuʀed oʃ to retrieve a huge book, bound in black
leather. Opening it to a marked page, LaValle walked before the Taros Hoop and began
the initial chantings of an ominous incantation.

Bruenor was ɹrst out of the room, searching for a likely route to Regis—and for more
wererats to chop down. He stormed along a short corridor and kicked open a door,
ɹnding, not wererats, but two very surprised human thieves. Holding a measure of
mercy in his battle-hardened heart—after all, he was the invader—Bruenor held back his
twitching axe hand and shield-slammed the two rogues to the ground. He then rushed
back out into the corridor and fell in line with the rest of his friends.
“Watch yer right!” Catti-brie cried out, noting some movement behind a tapestry near
the front of the line, beside Wulfgar. The barbarian pulled the heavy tapestry down with
a single heave, revealing a tiny man, barely more than a halɻing, crouched and poised
to spring. Exposed, the little thief quickly lost his heart for the ɹght and just shrugged
apologetically as Wulfgar slapped his puny dagger away.
Wulfgar caught him up by the back of the neck, hoisting the little man into the air and
putting his nose to the thief’s. “What manner are you?” Wulfgar scowled. “Man or rat?”
“Not a rat!” the terriɹed thief shrieked. He spat on the ground to emphasize his point.
“Not a rat!”
“Regis?” Wulfgar demanded. “You know of him?”
The thief nodded eagerly.
“Where can I ɹnd Regis?” Wulfgar roared, his bellow draining the blood from the
thief’s face.
“Up,” the little man squeaked. “Pook’s rooms. All the way up.” Acting solely on
instinct for survival, and having no real intentions to do anything but get away from
the monstrous barbarian, the thief slipped one hand to a hidden dagger tucked in the
back of his belt.
Bad judgment.
Drizzt slapped a scimitar against the thief’s arm, exposing the move to Wulfgar.
Wulfgar used the little man to open the next door.

Again the chase was on. Wererats darted in and out of the shadows to the sides of the
four companions, but few stood to face them. Those that did wound up in their path
more often by accident than design!
More doors splintered and more rooms emptied, and a few minutes later, a stairway
came into view. Broad and lavishly carpeted, with ornate banisters of shining
hardwood, it could only be the ascent to the chambers of Pasha Pook.
Bruenor roared in glee and charged on. Wulfgar and Catti-brie eagerly followed. Drizzt
hesitated and looked around, suddenly fearful.
Drow elves were magical creatures by nature, and Drizzt now sensed a strange and
dangerous tingle, the beginnings of a spell aimed at him. He saw the walls and ɻoor
around him waver suddenly, as if they had become somehow less tangible.
Then he understood. He had traveled the Planes before, as companion to Guenhwyvar,
his magical cat, and he knew now that someone, or something, was pulling him from his
place on the Prime Material Plane. He looked ahead to see Bruenor and the others now
similarly confused.
“Join hands!” the drow cried, rushing to get to his friends before the dweomer
banished them all.

In hopeless horror, Regis watched his friends huddle together. Then the scene in the
Taros hoop shifted from the lower levels of the guildhouse to a darker place, a place of
smoke and shadows, of ghouls and demons.
A place where no sun shone.
“No!” the halɻing cried out, realizing the wizard’s intent. LaValle paid him no heed,
and Pook only snickered at him. Seconds later, Regis saw his friends in their huddle
again, this time in the swirling smoke of the dark plane.
Pook leaned heavily on his walking stick and laughed. “How I love to foil hopes!” he
said to his wizard. “Once more you prove your inestimable worth to me, my precious
LaValle!”
Regis watched as his friends turned back to back in a pitiful attempt at defense.
Already, dark shapes swooped about them or hovered over them—beings of great power
and great evil.
Regis dropped his eyes, unable to watch.
“Oh, do not look away, little thief,” Pook laughed at him. “Watch their deaths and be
happy for them, for I assure you that the pain they are about to suʃer will not compare
to the torments I have planned for you.”
Regis, hating the man and hating himself for putting his friends in such a predicament,
snapped a vile glare at Pook. They had come for him. They had crossed the world for
him. They had battled Artemis Entreri and a host of wererats, and most probably many
other adversaries. All of it had been for him.
“Damn you,” Regis spat, suddenly no longer afraid. He swung himself down and bit

the eunuch hard on the inner thigh. The giant shrieked in pain and loosened his grip,
dropping Regis to the floor.
The halɻing hit the ground running. He crossed before Pook, kicking out the walking
stick the guildmaster was using for support, while very deftly slipping a hand into
Pook’s pocket to retrieve a certain statuette. He then went on to LaValle.
The wizard had more time to react and had already begun a quick spell when Regis
came at him, but the halɻing proved the quicker. He leaped up, putting two ɹngers into
LaValle’s eyes, disrupting the spell, and sending the wizard stumbling backward.
As the wizard struggled to hold his balance, Regis jerked the pearl-tipped scepter away
and ran up to the front of the Taros Hoop. He glanced around at the room a ɹnal time,
wondering if he might find an easier way.
Pook dominated the vision. His face blood red and locked into a grimace, the
guildmaster had recovered from the attack and now twirled his walking stick as a
weapon, which Regis knew from experience to be deadly.
“Please give me this one,” Regis whispered to whatever god might be listening. He
gritted his teeth and ducked his head, lurching forward and letting the scepter lead him
into the Taros Hoop.

moke, emanating from the very ground they stood upon, wafted by drearily and rolled
around their feet. By the angle of its roll, the way it fell away below them only a foot
or two oʃ to either side, only to rise again in another cloud, the friends saw that they
were on a narrow ledge, a bridge across some endless chasm.
Similar bridges, none more than a few feet wide, crisscrossed above and below them,
and for what they could see, those were the only walkways in the entire plane. No solid
land mass showed itself in any direction, only the twisting, spiraling bridges.
The friends’ movements were slow, dreamlike, ɹghting against the weight of the air.
The place itself, a dim, oppressive world of foul smells and anguished cries, exuded evil.
Vile, misshapen monsters swooped over their heads and around the gloomy emptiness,
crying out in glee at the unexpected appearance of such tasty morsels. The four friends,
so indomitable against the perils of their own world, found themselves without courage.
“The Nine Hells?” Catti-brie whispered in a tiny voice, afraid that her words might
shatter the temporary inaction of the multitudes gathering in the ever-present shadows.
“Hades,” Drizzt guessed, more schooled in the known planes. “The domain of Chaos.”
Though he was standing right beside his friends, his words rang out as distant as had
Catti-brie’s.
Bruenor started to growl out a retort, but his voice faded away when he looked at
Catti-brie and Wulfgar, his children, or so he considered them. Now there was nothing
he could possibly do to help them.
Wulfgar looked to Drizzt for answers. “How can we escape?” he pressed bluntly. “Is
there a door? A window back to our own world?”
Drizzt shook his head. He wanted to reassure them, to keep their spirits up in the face
of the danger. This time, though, the drow had no answers for them. He could see no
escape, no hope.
A bat-winged creature, doglike, but with a face grotesquely and unmistakably human,
dived at Wulfgar, putting a filthy talon in line with the barbarian’s shoulder.
“Drop!” Catti-brie yelled to Wulfgar at the last possible second. The barbarian didn’t
question the command. He fell to his face, and the creature missed its mark. It swerved
around in a loop and hung in midair for a split second as it made a tight turn, then it
came back again, hungry for living flesh.
Catti-brie was ready for it this time, though, and as it neared the group, she loosed an
arrow. It reached out lazily toward the monster, cutting a dull gray streak instead of the
usual silver. The magic arrow blasted in with the customary strength, though, scorching
a wicked hole in the dog fur and unbalancing the monster’s ɻight. It rolled in just above

them, trying to right itself, and Bruenor chopped it down, dropping it in a spiraling
descent into the gloom below them.
The friends could hardly be pleased with the minor victory. A hundred similar beasts
ɻitted in and out of their vision above, below, and to the sides, many of them ten times
larger than the one Bruenor and Catti-brie had felled.
“We can’t be staying here,” Bruenor muttered. “Where do we go, elf?”
Drizzt would have been just as content staying where they were, but he knew that
marching out a course would comfort his friends and give them at least some feeling
that they were making progress against their dilemma. Only the drow understood the
depth of the horror they now faced. Only Drizzt knew that wherever they might travel
on the dark plane, the situation would prove to be the same: no escape.
“This way,” he said after a moment of mock contemplation. “If there is a door, I sense
that it is this way.” He took a step down the narrow bridge but stopped abruptly as the
smoke heaved and swirled before him.
Then it rose in front of him.
Humanoid in shape, it was tall and slender, with a bulbous, froglike head and long,
three-ɹngered hands that ended in claws. Taller even than Wulfgar, it towered over
Drizzt. “Chaos, dark elf?” it lisped in a guttural, foreign voice. “Hades?”

Twinkle glowed eagerly in Drizzt’s hand, but his other blade, the one forged with ice-
magic, nearly leaped out at the monster.

“Err, you do,” the creature croaked.
Bruenor rushed up beside Drizzt. “Get yerself back, demon,” he growled.
“Not demon,” said Drizzt, understanding the creature’s references and remembering
more of the many lessons he had been taught about the Planes during his years in the
city of drow. “Demodand.”
Bruenor looked up at him curiously.
“And not Hades,” Drizzt explained. “Tarterus.”
“Good, dark elf,” croaked the demodand. “Knowing of the lower planes are your
people.”
“Then you understand of the power of my people,” Drizzt bluʃed, “and you know how
we repay even demon lords who cross us.”
The demodand laughed, if that’s what it was, for it sounded more like the dying gurgle
of a drowning man. “Dead drow avenge do not. Far from home are you!” It reached a
lazy hand toward Drizzt.
Bruenor rushed by his friend. “Moradin!” he cried, and he swiped at the demodand
with his mithral axe. The demodand was faster than the dwarf had expected, though,
and it easily dodged the blow, countering with a clubbing blow of its arm that sent
Bruenor skidding on his face farther down the bridge.
The demodand reached down at the passing dwarf with its wicked claws.
Twinkle cut the hand in half before it ever reached Bruenor.

The demodand turned on Drizzt in amazement. “Hurt me you did, dark elf,” it croaked,
though no hint of pain rang out in its voice, “but better you must do!” It snapped the
wounded hand out at Drizzt, and as he reɻexively dodged it, the demodand sent its
second hand out to ɹnish the task of the ɹrst, cutting a triple line of gashes down the
sprawled dwarf’s shoulder.

“Blast and bebother!” Bruenor roared, getting back to his knees. “Ye ɹlthy, slime-
covered ...” he grumbled, launching a second unsuccessful attack.

Behind Drizzt, Catti-brie bobbed and ducked, trying to get a clear shot with Taulmaril.
Beside her, Wulfgar stood at the ready, having no room on the narrow bridge to move
up beside the drow.
Drizzt moved sluggishly, his scimitars awkwardly twisting through an uneven
sequence. Perhaps it was because of the weariness of a long night of ɹghting or the
unusual weight of the air in the plane, but Catti-brie, looking on curiously, had never
seen the drow so lackluster in his efforts.
Still on his knees farther down the bridge, Bruenor swiped more with frustration than
his customary lust for battle.
Catti-brie understood. It wasn’t weariness or the heavy air. Hopelessness had befallen
the friends.
She looked to Wulfgar, to beg him to intervene, but the sight of the barbarian beside
her gave her no comfort. His wounded arm hung limply at his side, and the heavy head
of Aegis-fang dipped below the low-riding smoke. How many more battles could he
ɹght? How many of these wretched demodand would he be able to put down before he
met his end?
And what end would a victory bring in a plane of unending battles? she wondered.
Drizzt felt the despair most keenly. For all the trials of his hard life, the drow had held
faith for ultimate justice. He had believed, though he never dared to admit it, that his
unyielding faith in his precious principles would bring him the reward he deserved.
Now, there was this, a struggle that could only end in death, where one victory brought
only more conflict.
“Damn ye all!” Catti-brie cried. She didn’t have a safe shot, but she ɹred anyway. Her
arrow razed a line of blood across Drizzt’s arm, but then exploded into the demodand,
rocking it back and giving Bruenor the chance to scramble back to Drizzt’s side.
“Have ye lost yer fight, then?” Catti-brie scolded them.
“Easy, girl,” Bruenor replied somberly, cutting low at the demodand’s knees. The
creature hopped over the blade gingerly and started another attack, which Drizzt
deflected.
“Easy yerself, Bruenor Battlehammer!” Catti-brie shouted. “Ye’ve the gall to call yerself
king o’ yer clan. Ha! Garumn’d be tossin’ in his grave to see ye fightin’ so!”
Bruenor turned a wicked glare on Catti-brie, his throat too choked for him to spit out a
reply.

Drizzt tried to smile. He knew what the young woman, that wonderful young woman,
was up to. His lavender eyes lit up with the inner ɹre. “Go to Wulfgar,” he told Bruenor.
“Secure our backs and watch for attacks from above.”
Drizzt eyed the demodand, who had noted his sudden change in demeanor.
“Come, farastu,” the drow said evenly, remembering the name given to that particular
type of creature. “Farastu,” he taunted, “the least of the demodand kind. Come and feel
the cut of a drow’s blade.”
Bruenor backed away from Drizzt, almost laughing. Part of him wanted to say,
“What’s the point?” but a bigger part, the side of him that Catti-brie had awakened with
her biting references to his proud history, had a diʃerent message to speak. “Come on
and ɹght, then!” he roared into the shadows of the endless chasm. “We’ve enough for
the whole damn world of ye!”
In seconds, Drizzt was fully in command. His movements remained slowed with the
heaviness of the plane, but they were no less magniɹcent. He feinted and cut, sliced and
parried, in harmony to offset every move the demodand made.
Instinctively Wulfgar and Bruenor started in to help him, but stopped to watch the
display.
Catti-brie turned her gaze outward, plucking oʃ a bowshot whenever a foul form ɻew
from the hanging smoke. She took a quick bead on one body as it dropped from the
darkness high above.
She pulled Taulmaril away at the last second in absolute shock.
“Regis!” she cried.
The halɻing ended his half-speed plummet, plopping with a soft puʃ into the smoke of
a second bridge a dozen yards across the emptiness from friends. He stood and managed
to hold his ground against a wave of dizziness and disorientation.
“Regis!” Catti-brie cried again. “How did ye get yerself here?”
“I saw you in that awful hoop,”’ the halɻing explained. “Thought you might need my
help.”
“Bah! More that ye got yerself thrown here, Rumblebelly,” Bruenor replied.
“Good to see you, too,” Regis shot back, “but this time you are mistaken. I came of my
own choice.” He held the pearl-tipped scepter up for them to see. “To bring you this.”
Truly Bruenor had been glad to see his little friend even before Regis had refuted his
suspicion. He admitted his error by bowing low to Regis, his beard dipping under the
smoky swirl.
Another demodand rose up, this one across the way, on the same bridge as Regis. The
halɻing showed his friends the scepter again. “Catch it,” he begged, winding up to
throw. “This is your only chance to get out of here!” He mustered up his nerve—there
would only be one chance—and heaved the scepter as powerfully as he could. It spun
end over end, tantalizingly slow in its journey toward the three sets of outstretched
hands.

It could not cut a swift enough path through the heavy air, though, and it lost its speed
short of the bridge.
“No!” Bruenor cried, seeing their hopes falling away.
Catti-brie growled in denial, unhitching her laden belt and dropping Taulmaril in a
single movement.
She dived for the scepter.
Bruenor dropped ɻat to his chest desperately to grab her ankles, but she was too far
out. A contented look came over her as she caught the scepter. She twisted about in
midair and threw it back to Bruenor’s waiting hands, then she plummeted from sight
without a word of complaint.

LaValle studied the mirror with trembling hands. The image of the friends and the
plane of Tarterus had faded into a dark blur when Regis had jumped through with the
scepter. But that was the least of the wizard’s concerns now. A thin crack, detectable
only at close inspection, slowly etched its way down the center of the Taros Hoop.
LaValle spun on Pook, charging his master and grabbing at the walking stick. Too
surprised to fight the wizard off, Pook surrendered the cane and stepped back curiously.
LaValle rushed back to the mirror. “We must destroy its magic!” he screamed and he
smashed the cane into the glassy image.
The wooden stick, sundered by the device’s power, splintered in his hands, and LaValle
was thrown across the room. “Break it! Break it!” he begged Pook, his voice a pitiful
whine.
“Get the halɻing back!” Pook retorted, still more concerned with Regis and the
statuette.
“You do not understand!” LaValle cried. “The halɻing has the scepter! The portal
cannot be closed from the other side !”
Pook’s expression shifted from curiosity to concern as the gravity of his wizard’s fears
descended over him. “My dear LaValle,” he began calmly, “are you saying that we have
an open door to Tarterus in my living quarters?”
LaValle nodded meekly.
“Break it! Break it!” Pook screamed at the eunuchs standing beside him. “Heed the
wizard’s words! Smash that infernal hoop to pieces!”
Pook picked up the broken end of his walking stick, the silver-shod, meticulously
crafted cane he had been given personally by the Pasha of Calimshan.
The morning sun was still low in the eastern sky, but already the guildmaster knew
that it would not be a good day.

Drizzt, trembling with anguish and anger, roared toward the demodand, his every
thrust aimed at a critical spot. The creature, agile and experienced, dodged the initial

assault, but it could not stay the enraged drow. Twinkle cut a blocking arm oʃ at the
elbow, and the other blade dived into the demodand’s heart. Drizzt felt a surge of power
run through his arm as his scimitar sucked the life-force out of the wretched creature, but
the drow contained the strength, burying it within his own rage, and held on stubbornly.
When the thing lay lifeless, Drizzt turned to his companions.
“I did not ...” Regis stammered from across the chasm. “She ... I ...”
Neither Bruenor nor Wulfgar could answer him. They stood frozen, staring into the
empty darkness below.
“Run!” Drizzt called, seeing a demodand closing in behind the halɻing. “We shall get
to you!”
Regis tore his eyes from the chasm and surveyed the situation. “No need!” he shouted
back. He pulled out the statuette and held it up for Drizzt to see. “Guenhwyvar will get
me out of here, or perhaps the cat could aid—”
“No!” Drizzt cut him short, knowing what he was about to suggest. “Summon the
panther and be gone!”
“We will meet again in a better place,” Regis oʃered, his voice breaking in sniʀes. He
placed the statuette down before him and called out softly.
Drizzt took the scepter from Bruenor and put a comforting hand on his friend’s
shoulder. He then held the magic item to his chest, attuning his thoughts to its magical
emanations.
His guess was conɹrmed; the scepter was indeed the key to the portal back to their

own plane, a gate that Drizzt sensed was still open. He scooped up Taulmaril and Catti-
brie’s belt. “Come,” he told his two friends, still staring at the darkness. He pushed them

along the bridge, gently but firmly.

Guenhwyvar sensed the presence of Drizzt Do’Urden as soon as it came into the plane
of Tarterus. The great cat moved with hesitancy when Regis asked it to take him away,
but the halɻing now possessed the statuette and Guenhwyvar had always known Regis
as a friend. Soon Regis found himself in the swirling tunnel of blackness, drifting toward
the distant light that marked Guenhwyvar’s home plane.
Then the halfling knew his error.
The onyx statuette, the link to Guenhwyvar, still lay on the smoky bridge in Tarterus.
Regis turned himself about, struggling against the pull of the planar tunnel’s currents.
He saw the darkness at the back end of the tunnel and could guess the risks of reaching
through. He could not leave the statuette, not only for fear of losing his magnificent
feline friend, but in revulsion at the thought of some foul beast of the lower planes
gaining control over Guenhwyvar. Bravely he poked his three-ɹngered hand through the
closing portal.
All of his senses jumbled. Overwhelming bursts of signals and images from two planes
rushed at him in a nauseating wave. He blocked them away, using his hand as a focal

point and concentrating all of his thoughts and energies on the sensations of that hand.
Then his hand dropped upon something hard, something vividly tangible. It resisted
his tug, as though it were not meant to pass through such a gate.
Regis was fully stretched now, his feet held straight down the tunnel by the incessant
pull, and his hand stubbornly latched to the statuette he would not leave behind. With a
ɹnal heave, with all the strength the little halɻing had ever summoned—and just a tiny
bit more—he pulled the statuette through the gate.
The smooth ride of the planar tunnel transformed into a nightmarish bounce and skip,
with Regis hurtling head over heels and deɻecting oʃ the walls, which twisted suddenly,
as if to deny him passage. Through it all, Regis clutched at only one thought: keep the
statuette in his grasp.
He felt he would surely die. He could not survive the beating, the dizzying swirl.
Then it died away as abruptly as it had begun, and Regis, still holding the statuette,
found himself sitting beside Guenhwyvar with his back to an astral tree. He blinked and
looked around, hardly believing his fortune.
“Do not worry,” he told the panther. “Your master and the others will get back to their
world.” He looked down at the statuette, his only link to the Prime Material Plane. “But
how shall I?”
While Regis ɻoundered in despair, Guenhwyvar reacted diʃerently. The panther spun
about in a complete circuit and roared mightily into the starry vastness of the plane.
Regis watched the cat’s actions in amazement as Guenhwyvar leaped about and roared
again, then bounded away into the astral nothingness.
Regis, more confused than ever, looked down at the statuette. One thought, one hope
overrode all others at that moment.
Guenhwyvar knew something.

With Drizzt taking a ferocious lead, the three friends charged along, cutting down
everything that dared to rise in their path. Bruenor and Wulfgar fought wildly, thinking
that the drow was leading them to Catti-brie.
The bridge wound along a curving and rising route, and when Bruenor realized its
ascending grade, he grew concerned. He was about to protest, to remind the drow that
Catti-brie had fallen below them, but when he looked back, he saw that the area they
had started from was clearly above them. Bruenor was a dwarf accustomed to lightless
tunnels, and he could detect the slightest grade unerringly.
They were going up, more steeply now than before, and the area they had left
continued to rise above them.
“How, elf?” he cried. “Up and up we go, but down by what me eyes be telling me.”
Drizzt looked back and quickly understood what Bruenor was talking about. The drow
didn’t have time for philosophical inquiries; he was merely following the emanations of
the scepter that would surely lead them to a gate. Drizzt did pause, though, to consider

one possible quirk of the directionless, and apparently circular, plane.
Another demodand rose up before them, but Wulfgar swatted it from the bridge before
it could even ready a strike. Blind rage drove the barbarian now, a third burst of
adrenaline that denied his wounds and his weariness. He paused every few steps to look
about, searching for something vile to hit, then he rushed back to the front, beside
Drizzt, to get the first whack at anything trying to block their path.
The swirling smoke parted before them suddenly, and they faced a lighted image,
blurry, but clearly of their own plane.
“The gate,” Drizzt said. “The scepter has kept it open. Bruenor will pass through first.”
Bruenor looked at Drizzt in blank amazement. “Leave?” he asked breathlessly. “How
can ye ask me to leave, elf? Me girl’s here.”
“She is gone, my friend,” Drizzt said softly.
“Bah!” Bruenor snorted, though it sounded as more of a sniʀe. “Don’t ye be so quick
to make such a claim!”
Drizzt looked upon him with sincere sympathy, but refused to relinquish the point or
change his course.
“And if she were gone, I’d stay as well,” Bruenor proclaimed, “to ɹnd her body and
carry it from this eternal hell!”
Drizzt grabbed the dwarf by the shoulders and squared up to face him. “Go, Bruenor,
back to where we all belong,” he said. “Do not diminish the sacriɹce that Catti-brie has
made for us. Do not steal the meaning from her fall.”
“How can ye ask me to leave?” Bruenor said with a sniʀe that he did not mask.
Wetness glistened the edges of his gray eyes. “How can ye—”
“Think not of what has passed!” Drizzt said sharply. “Beyond that gate is the wizard
that sent us here, the wizard that sent Catti-brie here!”
It was all Bruenor Battlehammer needed to hear. Fire replaced the tears in his eyes,
and with a roar of anger he dived through the portal, his axe leading the way.
“Now—” Drizzt began, but Wulfgar cut him short.
“You go, Drizzt,” the barbarian replied. “Avenge Catti-brie and Regis. Finish the quest
we undertook together. For myself, there will be no rest. My emptiness will not fade.”
“She is gone,” Drizzt said again.
Wulfgar nodded. “As am I,” he said quietly.
Drizzt searched for some way to refute the argument, but truly Wulfgar’s grief seemed
too profound for him to ever recover.
Then Wulfgar’s gaze shot up, and his mouth gaped in horriɹed—and elated—disbelief.
Drizzt spun about, not as surprised, but still overwhelmed, by the sight before him.
Catti-brie fell limply and slowly from the dark sky above them.
It was a circular plane.
Wulfgar and Drizzt leaned together for support. They could not determine if Catti-brie

was alive or dead. She was wounded gravely, at the least, and even as they watched, a
winged demodand swooped down and grabbed at her leg with its huge talons.
Before a conscious thought had time to register in Wulfgar’s mind, Drizzt had
Taulmaril bent and sent a silver arrow into ɻight. It thundered into the side of the
demodand’s head just as the creature took hold of the young woman, blasting the thing
from life.
“Go!” Wulfgar yelled at Drizzt, taking one stride. “I see my quest now! I know what I
must do!”
Drizzt had other ideas. He slipped a foot through Wulfgar’s legs and dropped in a spin,
driving his other leg into the back of the barbarian’s knees and tripping Wulfgar down
to the side, toward the portal. Wulfgar understood the drow’s intentions at once, and he
scrambled to regain his balance.
Again Drizzt was the quicker. The point of a scimitar nicked in under Wulfgar’s
cheekbone, keeping him moving in the desired direction. As he neared the portal, just
when Drizzt expected him to try some desperate maneuver, the drow drove a boot under
his shoulder and kicked him hard.
Betrayed, Wulfgar tumbled into Pasha Pook’s central chamber. He ignored his
surroundings, grabbed at the Taros Hoop and shook it with all his strength.
“Traitor!” he yelled. “Never will I forget this, cursed drow!”
“Take your place!” Drizzt yelled back at him from across the planes. “Only Wulfgar
has the strength to hold the gate open and secure. Only Wulfgar! Hold it, son of
Beornegar. If you care for Drizzt Do’Urden, and if ever you loved Catti-brie, hold the
gate!”
Drizzt could only pray that he had appealed to the small part of rationale accessible in
the enraged barbarian. The drow turned from the portal, tucking the scepter into his
belt and slinging Taulmaril over his shoulder. Catti-brie was below him now, still
falling, still unmoving.
Drizzt drew out both his scimitars. How long would it take him to pull Catti-brie to a
bridge and ɹnd his way back to the portal? he wondered. Or would he, too, be caught in
an endless, doomed, fall?
And how long could Wulfgar hold the gate open?
He brushed away the questions. He had no time to speculate on their answers.
The ɹres gleamed in his lavender eyes, Twinkle glowed in one hand, and he felt the
urgings of his other blade, pleading for a demodand’s heart to bite.
With all the courage that had marked Drizzt Do’Urden’s existence coursing through his
veins, and with all the fury of his perceptions of injustice focused on the fate of that
beautiful and broken woman failing endlessly in a hopeless void, he dived into the
gloom.

ruenor had come into Pook’s chambers cursing and swinging, and by the time his
initial momentum had worn away, he was far across the room from the Taros Hoop
and from the two hill giant eunuchs that Pook had on guard. The guildmaster was
closest to the raging dwarf, looking at him more in curiosity than terror.
Bruenor paid Pook no mind whatsoever. He looked beyond the plump man, to a robed
form sitting against a wall: the wizard who had banished Catti-brie to Tarterus.
Recognizing the murderous hate in the red-bearded dwarf’s eyes, LaValle rolled to his
feet and scrambled through the door to his own room. His racing heart calmed when he
heard the click of the door behind him, for it was a magic doorway with several holding
and warding spells in place. He was safe—or so he thought.
Often wizards were blinded by their own considerable strength to other—less
sophisticated, perhaps, but equally strong—forms of power. LaValle could not know the
boiling cauldron that was Bruenor Battlehammer, and could not anticipate the brutality
of the dwarf’s rage.
His surprise was complete when a mithral axe, like a bolt of his own lightning,
sundered his magically barred door to kindling and the wild dwarf stormed in.

Wulfgar, oblivious to the surroundings and wanting only to return to Tarterus and
Catti-brie, came through the Taros Hoop just as Bruenor exited the room. Drizzt’s call
from across the planes, though, begging him to hold the portal open, could not be
ignored. However the barbarian felt at that moment, for Catti-brie or Drizzt, he could
not deny that his place was in guarding the mirror.
Still, the image of Catti-brie falling through the eternal gloom of that horrid place
burned at his heart, and he wanted to spring right back through the Taros Hoop to rush
to her aid.
Before the barbarian could decide whether to follow his heart or his thoughts, a huge
ɹst slammed into the side of his head, dropping him to the ɻoor. He ɻopped facedown
between the tree trunk legs of two of Pook’s hill giants. It was a diɽcult way to enter a
fight, but Wulfgar’s rage was every bit as intense as Bruenor’s.
The giants tried to drop their heavy feet on Wulfgar, but he was too agile for such a
clumsy maneuver. He sprang up between them and slammed one square in the face with
a huge ɹst. The giant stared blankly at Wulfgar for a long moment, disbelieving that a
human could deliver such a punch, then it hopped backward weirdly and dropped
limply to the floor.

Wulfgar spun on the other, shattering its nose with the butt end of Aegis-fang. The
giant clutched its face in both hands and reeled. For it, the fight was already over.
Wulfgar couldn’t take the time to ask. He kicked the giant in the chest, launching it
halfway across the room.
“Now, there is only me,” came a voice. Wulfgar looked across the room to the huge
chair that served as the guildmaster’s throne, and to Pasha Pook, standing behind it.
Pook reached down behind the chair and pulled out a neatly concealed heavy
crossbow, loaded and ready. “And I may be fat like those two,” Pook chuckled, “but I am
not stupid.” He leveled the crossbow on the back of the chair.
Wulfgar glanced around. He was caught, fully, with no chance to dodge away.
But maybe he didn’t have to.
Wulfgar ɹrmed his jaw and puʃed out his chest. “Right here, then,” he said without
ɻinching, tapping his ɹnger over his heart. “Shoot me down.” He cast a glance over his
shoulder, to where the image in the Taros Hoop now showed the shadows of gathering
demodands. “And you defend the entrance to the plane of Tarterus.”
Pook eased his finger off the trigger.
If Wulfgar’s point had made an impression, it was driven home a second later when
the clawed hand of a demodand reached through the portal and latched onto Wulfgar’s
shoulder.

Drizzt moved as if swimming in his descent through the gloom, the pumping actions
gaining him ground on Catti-brie. He was vulnerable, though, and he knew it.
So did a winged demodand watching him fall by.
The wretched creature hopped oʃ its perch as soon as Drizzt had passed, ɻapping its
wings at an awkward angle to gain momentum in its dive. Soon it was overtaking the
drow, and it reached out its razor-sharp claws to tear at him as it passed.
Drizzt noticed the beast at the last moment. He twisted over wildly and spun about,
trying to get out of the diving thing’s path and struggling to ready his scimitars.
He should have had no chance. It was the demodand’s environment, and it was a
winged creature, more at home in flight than on the ground.
But Drizzt Do’Urden never played the odds.
The demodand strafed past, its wicked talons ripping yet another tear in Drizzt’s ɹne
cloak. Twinkle, as steady as ever even in midfall, lopped oʃ one of the creature’s wings.
The demodand fluttered helplessly to the side and continued down in a tumble. It had no
heart left for battle against the drow elf, and no wing left to catch him anyway.
Drizzt paid it no heed. His goal was in reach.
He caught Catti-brie in his arms, locking her tightly against his chest. She was cold, he
noted grimly, but he knew that he had too far to go to even think about that. He wasn’t
certain if the planar gate was still open, and he had no idea of how he could stop his

eternal fall.
A solution came to him in the form of another winged demodand, one that cut an
intercepting path at him and Catti-brie. The creature did not mean to attack yet, Drizzt
could see; its route seemed more of a ɻyby, where it would pass under them to better
inspect its foe.
Drizzt didn’t let the chance go. As the creature passed under, the dark elf snapped
himself downward, extending to his limit with one blade-wielding hand. Not aimed to
kill, the scimitar found its mark, digging into the creature’s backside. The demodand
shrieked and dived away, pulling free of the blade.
Its momentum, though, had tugged Drizzt and Catti-brie along, angling their descent
enough to line them up with one of the intersecting smoky bridges.
Drizzt twisted and turned to keep them in line, holding out his cloak with his free arm
to catch a draft, or tucking it in tightly to lessen the drag. At the last moment, he spun
himself under Catti-brie to shield her from the impact. With a heavy thud and a whoosh
of smoke, they landed.
Drizzt crawled out and forced himself to his knees, trying to find his breath.
Catti-brie lay below him, pale and torn, a dozen wounds visible, most vividly the gash
from the wererat’s quarrel. Blood soaked much of her clothing and matted her hair, but
Drizzt’s heart did not drop at the gruesome sight, for he had noted one other event when
they had plopped down.
Catti-brie had groaned.

LaValle scrambled behind his little table. “Keep you back, dwarf,” he warned, “I am a
wizard of great powers.”
Bruenor’s terror was not apparent. He drove his axe through the table, and a blinding
explosion of smoke and sparks filled the room.
When LaValle recovered his sight a moment later, he found himself facing Bruenor, the
dwarf’s hands and beard trailing wisps of gray smoke, the little table broken ɻat, and
his crystal ball severed clean in half.
“That the best ye got?” Bruenor asked.
LaValle couldn’t get any words past the lump in his throat.
Bruenor wanted to cut him down, to drive his axe right between the man’s bushy
eyebrows, but it was Catti-brie, his beautiful daughter, who truly abhorred killing with
all of her heart, whom he meant to avenge. Bruenor would not dishonor her memory.
“Drats!” he groaned, slamming his forehead into LaValle’s face. The wizard thumped
up against the wall and stayed there, dazed and motionless, until Bruenor closed a hand
on his chest, tearing out a few hairs for good measure, and threw him facedown on the
ɻoor. “Me friends might be needin’ yer help, wizard,” the dwarf growled, “so crawl! And
know in yer heart that if ye make one turn I don’t be liking, me axe’ll cleave yer head
down the middle!”

In his semiconscious state, LaValle hardly heard the words, but he fathomed the
dwarf’s meaning well enough and forced himself to his hands and knees.

Wulfgar braced his feet against the iron stand of the Taros Hoop and locked his own
iron grip onto the demodand’s elbow, matching the creature’s mighty pull. In his other
hand the barbarian held Aegis-fang ready, not wanting to swing through the planar
portal but hoping for something more vulnerable than an arm to come through to his
world.
The demodand’s claws cut deep wounds in his shoulder, ɹlthy wounds that would be
long in healing, but Wulfgar shrugged away the pain. Drizzt had told him to hold the
gate if ever he had loved Catti-brie.
He would hold the gate.
Another second passed and Wulfgar saw his hand slipping dangerously close to the
portal. He could match the demodand’s strength, but the demodand’s power was
magical, not physical, and Wulfgar would grow weary long before his foe.
Another inch, and his hand would cross through to Tarterus, where other hungry
demodands no doubt waited.
A memory ɻashed in Wulfgar’s mind, the ɹnal image of Catti-brie, torn and falling.
“No!” he growled, and he forced his hand back, pulling savagely until he and the
demodand were back to where they had started. Then Wulfgar dropped his shoulder
suddenly, tugging the demodand down instead of out.
The gamble worked. The demodand lost its momentum altogether and stumbled down,
its head poking through the Taros Hoop and into the Prime Material Plane for just a
second, long enough for Aegis-fang to shatter its skull.
Wulfgar jumped back a step and slapped his warhammer into both hands. Another
demodand started through, but the barbarian blasted it back into Tarterus with a
powerful swipe.
Pook watched it all from behind his throne, his crossbow still aimed to kill. Even the
guildmaster found himself mesmerized by the sheer strength of the giant man, and when
one of his eunuchs recovered and stood up, Pook waved it away from Wulfgar, not
wanting to disturb the spectacle before him.
A shuʀe oʃ to the side forced him to look away, though, as LaValle came crawling out
of his room, the axe-wielding dwarf walking right behind.
Bruenor saw at once the perilous predicament that Wulfgar faced and knew that the
wizard would only complicate things. He grabbed LaValle by the hair and pulled him up
to his knees, walking around to face the man.
“Good day for sleepin’,” the dwarf commented, and he slammed his forehead again
into the wizard’s, knocking LaValle into blackness. He heard a click behind him as the
wizard slumped, and he reɻexively swung his shield between himself and the noise, just
in time to catch Pook’s crossbow quarrel. The wicked dart drove a hole through the

foaming mug standard and barely missed Bruenor’s arm as it poked through the other
side.
Bruenor peeked over the rim of his treasured shield, stared at the bolt, and then looked
dangerously at Pook. “Ye shouldn’t be hurtin’ me shield!” he growled, and he started
forward.
The hill giant was quick to intercept.
Wulfgar caught the action out of the corner of his eye, and would have loved to join in
—especially with Pook busy reloading his heavy crossbow—but the barbarian had
troubles of his own. A winged demodand swooped through the gate in a sudden rush and
flashed by Wulfgar.
Fine-tuned reɻexes saved the barbarian, for he snapped a hand out and caught the
demodand by a leg. The monster’s momentum staggered Wulfgar backward, but he
managed to hold on. He slammed the demodand down beside him and drove it into the
floor with a single chop of his warhammer.
Several arms reached through the Taros Hoop, shoulders and heads poked through,
and Wulfgar, swinging Aegis-fang furiously, had all he could handle simply keeping the
wretched things at bay.

Drizzt ran along the smoky bridge, Catti-brie draped limply over one shoulder. He met
no further resistance for many minutes and understood why when he at last reached the
planar gate.
Huddled around it, and blocking his passage, was a score of demodands.
The drow, dismayed, dropped to one knee and laid Catti-brie gently beside him. He
considered putting Taulmaril to use, but realized that if he missed, if an arrow somehow
found its way through the horde, it would pass through the gate and into the room
where Wulfgar stood. He couldn’t take that chance.
“So close,” he whispered helplessly, looking down to Catti-brie. He held her tightly in
his arms and brushed a slender hand across her face. How cool she seemed. Drizzt
leaned low over her, meaning only to discern the rhythm of her breathing, but he found
himself too close to her, and before he even realized his actions, his lips were to hers in
a tender kiss. Catti-brie stirred but did not open her eyes.
Her movement brought new courage to Drizzt. “Too close,” he muttered grimly, “and
you’ll not die in this foul place!” He scooped Catti-brie up over his shoulder, wrapping
his cloak tightly around her to secure her to him. Then he took up his scimitars in tight
grips, rubbing his sensitive ɹngers across the intricate craftings of their hilts, becoming
one with his weapons, making them the killing extensions of his black arms. He took a
deep breath and set his visage.
He charged, as silently as only a drow elf could be, at the back of the wretched horde.

Regis rose uncomfortably as the black silhouettes of hunting cats darted in and out of

the starlight surrounding him. They did not seem to threaten him—not yet—but they
were gathering. He knew beyond doubt that he was their focal point.
Then Guenhwyvar bounded up and stood before him, the great cat’s head level with
his own.
“You know something,” Regis said, reading the excitement in the panther’s dark eyes.
Regis held up the statuette and examined it, noting the cat’s tenseness at the sight of the
figurine.
“We can get back with this,” the halɻing said in sudden revelation. “This is the key to
the journey, and with it, we can go wherever we desire!” He glanced around and
considered some very interesting possibilities. “All of us?”
If cats could smile, Guenhwyvar did.

utta me way, ye overstuffed bag o’ blubber!” Bruenor roared.
The giant eunuch planted its legs wide apart and reached down at the dwarf with a
huge hand—which Bruenor promptly bit.
“They never listen,” he grumbled, He stooped low and dashed between the giant’s legs,
then straightened quickly, the single horn on his helmet putting the poor eunuch up on
its toes. For the second time that day, its eyes crossed and it tumbled, this time its hands
low to hold its newest wound.
A killing rage evident in his gray eyes, Bruenor turned back to Pook. The guildmaster,
though, seemed unconcerned, and in truth, the dwarf hardly, noticed the man. He
concentrated instead on the crossbow again, which was loaded and leveled at him.

Drizzt’s single emotion as he came in was anger, anger at the pain the wretched
creatures of Tarterus had caused to Catti-brie.
His goal, too, was singular: the little patch of light in the gloom, the planar gate back
to his own world.
His scimitars led the way, and Drizzt grinned at the thought of tearing through the
demodand ɻesh, but the drow slowed as he came in, his anger tempered by the sight of
his goal. He could whirl in on the demodand horde in an attacking frenzy and probably
manage to slip through the gate, but could Catti-brie take the punishment the mighty
creatures would surely inflict before Drizzt got her through?
The drow saw another way. As he inched in on the back of the demodand line, he
reached out wide to either side with his blades, tapping the back two demodands on
their outside shoulders. As the creatures reɻexively turned to look back over their
shoulders, Drizzt darted between them.
The drow’s blades became a whirring prow, nicking away the hands of any other
demodands that tried to catch him. He felt a tug on Catti-brie and whirled quickly, his
rage doubled. He couldn’t see his target, but he knew that he had connected on
something when he brought Twinkle down and heard a demodand shriek.
A heavy arm clubbed him on the side of the head, a blow that should have felled him,
but Drizzt spun back again and saw the light of the gate only a few feet ahead—and the
silhouette of a single demodand, standing to block his passage.
The dark tunnel of demodand ɻesh began to close about him. Another large arm
wheeled in, but Drizzt was able to duck beneath its arc.
If the demodand delayed him a single second, he would be caught and slaughtered.
Again it was instinct, faster than thought, that carried Drizzt through. He slapped the

demodand’s arms wide apart with his scimitars and ducked his head, slamming into the
demodand’s chest, his momentum forcing the creature backward through the gate.

The dark head and shoulders came through into Wulfgar’s sights, and he hammered
Aegis-fang home. The mighty blow snapped the demodand’s backbone and jolted Drizzt,
who pushed from the other side.
The demodand fell dead, half in and half out of the Taros Hoop, and the stunned drow
rolled limply to the side and out, tumbling into Pook’s room, beneath Catti-brie.
Wulfgar paled at the sight and hesitated, but Drizzt, realizing that more creatures
would soon rush through, managed to lift his weary head from the ɻoor. “Close the
gate,” he gasped.
Wulfgar had already discerned that he could not shatter the glassy image within the
hoop—striking at it only sent his warhammer’s head into Tarterus. Wulfgar started to
drop Aegis-fang to his side.
Then he noticed the action across the room.

“Are you quick enough with that shield?” Pook teased, wiggling the crossbow.
Intent on the weapon, Bruenor hadn’t even noticed Drizzt and Catti-brie’s grand
entrance. “So ye’ve one shot to kill me, dog,” he spat back, unafraid of death, “and one
alone.” He took a determined step forward.
Pook shrugged. He was an expert marksman, and his crossbow was as enchanted as
any weapon in the Realms. One shot would be enough.
But he never got it off.
A twirling warhammer exploded into the throne, knocking the huge chair over into the
guildmaster and sending him sprawling heavily into the wall.
Bruenor turned with a grim smile to thank his barbarian friend, but his smile washed
away and the words died in his throat when he saw Drizzt and Catti-brie lying beside
the Taros Hoop.
The dwarf stood as if turned to stone, his eyes not blinking, his lungs not drawing
breath. The strength went out of his legs, and he fell to his knees. He dropped his axe
and shield and scrambled, on all fours, to his daughter’s side.
Wulfgar clasped the iron edges of the Taros Hoop in his hands and tried to force them
together. His entire upper body ɻushed red, and the veins and sinewy muscles stood out
like iron cords in his huge arms. But if there was any movement in the gate, it was
slight.
A demodand arm reached through the portal to prevent the closing, but the sight of it
only spurred Wulfgar on. He roared to Tempus and pushed with all his strength, driving
his hands together, bending the edges of hoop in to meet each other.
The glassy image bowed with the planar shift, and the demodand’s arm dropped to

the, ɻoor, cleanly severed. Likewise, the demodand that lay dead at Wulfgar’s feet, with
half its body still inside the gate, twitched and turned.
Wulfgar averted his eyes at the horrid spectacle of a winged demodand caught within
the warping planar tunnel, bent and bowed until its skin began to rip apart.
The magic of the Taros Hoop was strong, and Wulfgar, for all of his strength, could
not hope to bend the thing far enough to complete the job. He had the gate warped and
blocked, but for how long? When he tired, and the Taros Hoop returned to its normal
shape, the portal would open once again. Stubbornly the barbarian roared and drove
on, turning his head to the side in anticipation of the shattering of the glassy surface.

How pale she seemed, her lips almost blue and her skin dry and chill. Her wounds
were vicious, Bruenor saw, but the dwarf sensed that the most telling injury was neither
cut nor bruise. Rather, his precious girl seemed to have lost her spirit, as though she’d
given up her desire for life when she had fallen into the darkness.
She now lay limp, cold, and pale in his arms. On the ɻoor, Drizzt instinctively
recognized the dangers. He lolled over to the side, pulling his cloak out wide, shielding
Bruenor, who was quite oblivious to his surroundings, and Catti-brie with his own body.
Across the room, LaValle stirred, shaking the grogginess out of his head. He rose to his
knees and surveyed the room, immediately recognizing Wulfgar’s attempt to close the
gate.
“Kill them,” Pook whispered to the wizard but not daring to crawl out from under the
overturned chair.
LaValle wasn’t listening; he had already begun a spell.

For the ɹrst time in his life, Wulfgar found his strength inadequate. “I cannot!” he
grunted in dismay, looking to Drizzt—as he always looked to Drizzt—for an answer.
The wounded drow was barely coherent.
Wulfgar wanted to surrender. His arm burned from the gashes of the hydra bite; his
legs seemed barely able to hold him; his friends were helpless on the floor.
And his strength was not enough!
He shot his gaze to and fro, searching for some alternate method. The hoop, however
powerful, had to have a weakness. Or, at least, to hold out any hope, Wulfgar had to
believe that it did.
Regis had gotten through it, had found a way to circumvent its power.
Regis.
Wulfgar found his answer.
He gave a ɹnal heave on the Taros Hoop, then released it quickly, sending the portal
into a momentary wobble. Wulfgar didn’t hesitate to watch the eerie spectacle. He dived
down and snatched the pearl-tipped scepter from Drizzt’s belt, then leaped up straight

and slammed the fragile device onto the top of the Taros Hoop, shattering the black
pearl into a thousand tiny shards.
At that same moment, LaValle uttered the last syllable of his spell, releasing a mighty
bolt of energy. It ripped past Wulfgar, searing the hairs on his arm, and blasted into the
center of the Taros Hoop. The glassy image, cracked into the circular design of a spider’s
web by Wulfgar’s cunning strike, broke apart altogether.
The ensuing explosion rocked the foundations of the guildhouse.
Thick patches of darkness swirled about the room; the onlookers perceived the whole
place to be spinning, and a sudden wind whistled and howled in their ears, as though
they had all been caught in the tumult of a rift in the very planes of existence. Black
smoke and fumes rushed in upon them. The darkness became total.
Then, as quickly as it had begun, it passed away and daylight returned to the battered
room. Drizzt and Bruenor were the ɹrst to their feet, studying the damage and the
survivors.
The Taros Hoop lay twisted and shattered, a bent frame of worthless iron with a
sticky, weblike substance clinging stubbornly in torn patches. A winged demodand lay
dead on the ɻoor, the severed arm of another creature beside it, and half the body of yet
another beside that, still twitching in death, with thick, dark ɻuids spilling onto the
floor.
A dozen feet back sat Wulfgar, propped up on his elbows and looking perplexed, one
arm bright red from LaValle’s energy bolt, his face blackened by the rush of smoke, and
his entire frame matted in the gooey webbing. A hundred little dots of blood dotted the
barbarian’s body. Apparently the glassy image of the planar portal had been more than
just an image.
Wulfgar looked at his friends distantly, blinked his eyes a few times, and dropped ɻat
on his back.
LaValle groaned, catching the notice of Drizzt and Bruenor. The wizard started to
struggle back to his knees, but realized that he would only be exposing himself to the
victorious invaders. He slumped back to the floor and lay very still.
Drizzt and Bruenor looked at each other, wondering what to do next.
“Fine to see the light again,” came a soft voice below them. They looked down to meet
the gaze of Catti-brie, her deep blue eyes opened once again.
Bruenor, in tears, dropped to his knees and huddled over her. Drizzt started to follow
the dwarf’s lead, but sensed that theirs should be a private moment. He gave a
comforting pat on Bruenor’s shoulder and walked away to make sure that Wulfgar was
all right.
A sudden burst of movement interrupted him as he knelt over his barbarian friend. The
great throne, torn and scorched against the wall, toppled forward. Drizzt held it away
easily, but while he was engaged, he saw Pasha Pook dart out from behind the object
and bolt for the room’s main door.

“Bruenor!” Drizzt called, but he knew even as he said it that the dwarf was too caught
up with his daughter to be bothered. Drizzt pushed the great chair away and pulled
Taulmaril off his back, stringing it as he started in pursuit.
Pook rushed through the door, swinging around to slam it behind him. “Rassit—” he
started to yell as he turned back toward the stairs, but the word stuck in his throat when
he saw Regis, arms crossed, standing before him at the top of the stairway.
“You!” Pook roared, his face twisting and his hands clenching in rage.
“No, him,” Regis corrected, pointing a ɹnger above as a sleek black form leaped over
him.
To the stunned Pook, Guenhwyvar appeared as no more than a ɻying ball of big teeth
and claws.
By the time Drizzt got through the door, Pook’s reign as guildmaster had come to a
crashing end.
“Guenhwyvar!” the drow called, within reach of his treasured companion for the ɹrst
time in many tendays. The big panther loped over to Drizzt and nuzzled him warmly,
every bit as happy with the reunion.
Other sights and sounds kept the meeting short, however. First there was Regis,
reclining comfortably on the decorated banister, his hands locked behind his head and
his furry feet crossed. Drizzt was glad to see Regis again, as well, but more disturbing to
the drow were the sounds echoing up the stairs: screams of terror and throaty growls.
Bruenor heard them, too, and he came out of the room to investigate. “Rumblebelly!”
he hailed Regis, following Drizzt to the halfling’s side.
They looked down the great stairway at the battles below. Every now and then, a
wererat crossed by, pursued by a panther. One group of ratmen formed a defensive
circle, their blades ɻashing about to deter Guenhwyvar’s feline friends, right below the
friends, but a wave of black fur and gleaming teeth buried them where they stood.
“Cats?” Bruenor gawked at Regis. “Ye brought cats?”
Regis smiled and shifted his head in his hands. “You know a better way to get rid of
mice?”
Bruenor shook his head and couldn’t hide his own smile. He looked back at the body of
the man who had fled the room. “Dead, too,” he remarked grimly.
“That was Pook,” Regis told them, though they had already guessed the guildmaster’s
identity. “Now he is gone, and so, I believe, will his wererats associates be.”
Regis looked at Drizzt, knowing an explanation to be necessary. “Guenhwyvar’s
friends are only hunting the ratmen,” he said. “And him, of course” He pointed to Pook.
“The regular thieves are hiding in their rooms—if they’re smart—but the panthers
wouldn’t hurt them anyway.”
Drizzt nodded his approval at the discretion Regis and Guenhwyvar had chosen.
Guenhwyvar was not a vigilante.
“We all came through the statue,” Regis continued. “I kept it with me when I went out

of Tarterus with Guenhwyvar. The cats can go back through it to their own plane when
their work is done.” He tossed the figurine back to its rightful owner.
A curious look came over the halɻing’s face. He snapped his ɹngers and hopped down
from the banister, as if his last action had given him an idea. He ran to Pook, rolled the
former guild-master’s head to the side—trying to ignore the very conspicuous wound in
Pook’s neck—and lifted oʃ the ruby pendant that had started the whole adventure.
Satisfied, Regis turned to the very curious stares of his two friends.
“Time to make some allies,” the haffling explained, and he darted off down the stairs.
Bruenor and Drizzt looked at each other in disbelief.
“He’ll own the guild,” Bruenor assured the drow.
Drizzt didn’t argue the point.

From an alley on Rogues Circle, Rassiter, again in his human form, heard the dying
screams of his fellow ratmen. He had been smart enough to understand that the guild
was overmatched by the heroes from the North, and when Pook sent him down to rally
the fight, he had slipped instead back into the protection of the sewers.
Now he could only listen to the cries and wonder how many of his lycanthrope kin
would survive the dark day. “I will build a new guild,” he vowed to himself, though he
fully understood the enormity of the task, especially now that he had achieved such
notoriety in Calimport. Perhaps he could travel to another city—Memnon or Baldur’s
Gate—farther up the coast.
His ponderings came to an abrupt end as the ɻat of a curving blade came to rest on
his shoulder, the razor edge cutting a tiny line across the side of his neck.
Rassiter held up a jeweled dagger. “This is yours, I believe,” he said, trying to sound
calm. The saber slipped away and Rassiter turned to face Artemis Entreri.
Entreri reached out with a bandaged arm to pull the dagger away, at the same time
slipping the saber back into its scabbard.
“I knew you had been beaten,” Rassiter said boldly. “I feared you dead.”
“Feared?” Entreri grinned. “Or hoped?”
“It is true that you and I started as rivals,” Rassiter began.
Entreri laughed again. He had never ɹgured the ratman worthy enough to be
considered a rival.
Rassiter took the insult in stride. “But we then served the same master.” He looked to
the guildhouse, where the screaming had ɹnally begun to fade. “I think Pook is dead, or
at least thrown from power.”
“If he faced the drow, he is dead,” Entreri spat, the mere thought of Drizzt Do’Urden
filling his throat with bile.
“Then the streets are open,” Rassiter reasoned. He gave Entreri a sly wink. “For the
taking.”

“You and I?” Entreri mused.
Rassiter shrugged. “Few in Calimport would oppose you,” the wererat said, “and with
my infectious bite, I can breed a host of loyal followers in mere tendays. Certainly none
would dare stand against us in the night.”
Entreri moved beside him, joining him in his scan of the guildhouse. “Yes, my ravenous
friend,” he said quietly, “but there remain two problems.”
“Two?”
“Two,” Entreri reiterated. “First, I work alone.” Rassiter’s body jolted straight as a
dagger blade cut into his spine.
“And second,” Entreri continued, without missing a breath, “You are dead.” He jerked
the bloody dagger out and held it vertical, to wipe the blade on Rassiter’s cloak as the
wererat fell lifeless to the ground.
Entreri surveyed his handiwork and the bandages on his wounded elbow. “Stronger
already,” he muttered to himself, and he slipped away to ɹnd a dark hole. The morning
was full and bright now, and the assassin, still with much healing to do, was not ready
to face the challenges he might come across on the daytime streets.

ruenor knocked lightly on the door, not expecting a response. As usual, no reply came
back. This time, though, the stubborn dwarf did not walk away. He turned the latch
and entered the darkened room.
Stripped to the waist and running his slender ɹngers through his thick mane of white
hair, Drizzt sat on his bed with his back to Bruenor. Even in the dimness, Bruenor could
clearly see the scab line sliced across the drow’s back. The dwarf shuddered, never
imagining in those wild hours of battle that Drizzt had been so viciously wounded by
Artemis Entreri.
“Five days, elf,” Bruenor said quietly. “Do ye mean to live yer life in here?”
Drizzt turned slowly to face his dwarven friend. “Where else would I go?” he replied.
Bruenor studied the lavender eyes, twinkling to reɻect the light of the hallway beyond
the open door. The left one had opened again, the dwarf noted hopefully. Bruenor had
feared that the demodand’s blow had forever closed Drizzt’s eye.
Clearly it was healing, but still those marvelous orbs worried Bruenor. They seemed to
him to have lost a good bit of their luster.
“How is Catti-brie?” Drizzt asked, sincerely concerned about the young woman, but
also wanting to change the subject.
Bruenor smiled. “Not for walkin’ yet,” he replied, “but her ɹghting’s back and she’s not
caring for lyin’ quiet in a bed!” He chuckled, recalling the scene earlier in the day, when
one attendant had tried to primp his daughter’s pillow. Catti-brie’s glare alone had
drained the blood from the man’s face. “Cuts her servants down with her blade of a
tongue when they fuss over her.”
Drizzt’s smile seemed strained. “And Wulfgar?”
“The boy’s better,” Bruenor replied. “Took four hours scraping the spider gook oʃ him,
and he’ll be wearin’ wrappings on his arm for a month to come, but more’n that’s
needed to bring that boy down! Tough as a mountain, and nearen as big!”
They watched each other until the smiles faded and the silence grew uncomfortable.
“The halɻing’s feast is about to begin,” Bruenor said. “Ye going? With a belly so round,
me guess is that Rumblebelly will set a fine table.”
Drizzt shrugged noncommittally.
“Bah!” Bruenor snorted. “Ye can’t be living yer life between dark walls!” He paused as
a thought suddenly popped into his head. “Or are ye out at night?” he asked slyly.
“Out?”
“Hunting,” explained Bruenor. “Are ye out hunting Entreri?”
Now, Drizzt did laugh—at the notion that Bruenor linked his desire for solitude to

some obsession with the assassin.
“Ye’re burning for him,” Bruenor reasoned, “and he for yerself if he’s still for drawing
breath.”
“Come,” Drizzt said, pulling a loose shirt over his head. He picked up the magical mask
as he started around the bed, but stopped to consider the item. He rolled it over in his
hands, then dropped it back to the dressing table. “Let us not be late for the feast.”
Bruenor’s guess about Regis had not missed the mark; the table awaiting the two
friends was splendidly adorned with shining silver and porcelain, and the aromas of
delicacies had them unconsciously licking their lips as they moved to their appointed
seats.
Regis sat at the long table’s head, the thousand gemstones he had sewn into his tunic
catching the candlelight in a glittering burst every time he shifted in his seat. Behind
him stood the two hill giant eunuchs who had guarded Pook at the bitter end, their faces
bruised and bandaged
At the halɻing’s right sat LaValle, to Bruenor’s distaste, and at his left, a narrow-eyed
halfling and a chubby young man, the chief lieutenants in the new guild.
Farther down the table sat Wulfgar and Catti-brie, side by side, their hands clasped
between them, which, Drizzt guessed—by the pale and weary looks of the two—was as
much for mutual support as genuine affection.
As weary as they were, though, their faces lit with smiles, as did Regis’s, when they
saw Drizzt enter the room, the ɹrst time any of them had seen the drow in nearly a
tenday.
“Welcome, welcome!” Regis said happily. “It would have been a shallow feast if you
could not join us!”
Drizzt slid into the chair beside LaValle, drawing a concerned look from the timid
wizard. The guild’s lieutenants, too, shifted uneasily at the thought of dining with a
drow elf.
Drizzt smiled away the weight of their discomfort; it was their problem, not his. “I
have been busy,” he told Regis.
“Brooding,” Bruenor wanted to say as he sat next to Drizzt, but he tactfully held his
tongue.
Wulfgar and Catti-brie stared at their black friend from across the table.
“You swore to kill me,” the drow said calmly to Wulfgar, causing the big man to sag
back in his chair.
Wulfgar flushed a deep red and tightened his grip on Catti-brie’s hand.
“Only the strength of Wulfgar could have held that gate,” Drizzt explained. The edges
of his mouth turned up in a wistful smile.
“But, I—” Wulfgar began, but Catti-brie cut him short.
“Enough said about it, then,” the young woman insisted, banging her ɹst into
Wulfgar’s thigh. “Let us not be talking about troubles we’ve past. Too much remains

before us!”
“Me girl’s right,” spouted Bruenor. “The days walk by us as we sit and heal! Another
tenday, and we might be missing a war.”
“I am ready to go,” declared Wulfgar.
“Ye’re not,” retorted Catti-brie. “Nor am I. The desert’d stop us afore we ever got on
the long road beyond.”
“Ahem,” Regis began, drawing their attention. “About your departure ...” He stopped
to consider their stares, nervous about presenting his oʃer in just the right way. “I ... uh
... thought that ... I mean ...”
“Spit it,” demanded Bruenor, guessing what his little friend had in mind.
“Well, I have built a place for myself here,” Regis continued.
“And ye’re to stay,” reasoned Catti-brie. “We’ll not blame ye, though we’re sure to be
missing ye!”
“Yes,” said Regis, “and no. There is room here, and wealth. With the four of you by my
side ...”
Bruenor halted him with an upraised hand. “A ɹne oʃer,” he said, “but me home’s in
the North.”
“We’ve armies waiting on our return,” added Catti-brie.
Regis realized the ɹnality of Bruenor’s refusal, and he knew that Wulfgar would
certainly follow Catti-brie back to Tarterus if she so chose. So the halɻing turned his
sights on Drizzt, who had become an unreadable puzzle to them all in the last few days.
Drizzt sat back and considered the proposition, his hesitancy to deny the oʃer drawing
concerned stares from Bruenor, Wulfgar, and particularly, Catti-brie. Perhaps life in
Calimport would not be so bad, and certainly the drow had the tools to thrive in the
shadowy realm Regis planned to operate within. He looked Regis square in the eye.
“No,” he said. He turned at the audible sigh from Catti-brie across the table, and their
eyes locked. “I have walked through too many shadows already,” he explained. “A noble
quest stands before me, and a noble throne awaits its rightful king.”
Regis relaxed back in his chair and shrugged. He had expected as much. “If you are all
so determined to go back to a war, then I would be a sorry friend if I did not aid your
quest.”
The others eyed him curiously, never amazed at the surprises the little one could pull.
“To that end,” Regis continued, “one of my agents reported the arrival of an important
person—from the tales Bruenor has told me of your journey south—in Calimport this
morning.” He snapped his ɹngers, and a young attendant entered from a side curtain,
leading Captain Deudermont.
The captain bowed low to Regis, and lower still to the dear friends he had made on the
perilous journey from Waterdeep. “The wind was at our backs,” he explained, “and the
Sea Sprite runs swifter than ever. We can depart on the morrow’s dawn; surely the
gentle rock of a boat is a fine place to mend weary bones!”

“But the trade,” said Drizzt. “The market is here in Calimport. And the season. You did
not plan to leave before spring.”
“I may not be able to get you all the way to Waterdeep,” said Deudermont. “The winds
and ice will tell. But you surely will ɹnd yourself closer to your goal when you take to
land once again.” He looked over at Regis, then back to Drizzt. “For my losses in trade,
accommodations have been made.”
Regis tucked his thumbs into his jeweled belt. “I owed you that, at the least!”
“Bah!” snorted Bruenor, an adventurous gleam in his eye. “Ten times more,
Rumblebelly, ten times more!”

Drizzt looked out of his room’s single window at the dark streets of Calimport. They
seemed quieter this night, hushed in suspicion and intrigue, anticipating the power
struggle that would inevitably follow the downfall of a guildmaster as powerful as
Pasha Pook.
Drizzt knew that there were other eyes out there, looking back at him, at the
guildhouse, waiting for word of the drow elf—waiting for a second chance to battle
Drizzt Do’Urden.
The night passed lazily, and Drizzt, unmoving from his window, watched it drift into
dawn. Again, Bruenor was the first to his room.
“Ye ready, elf?” the eager dwarf asked, closing the door behind him as he entered.
“Patience, good dwarf,” Drizzt replied. “We cannot leave until the tide is right, and
Captain Deudermont assured me that we had the bulk of the morning to wait.”
Bruenor plopped down on the bed. “Better,” he said at length. “Gives me more time to
speak with the little one.” “You fear for Regis,” observed Drizzt.
“Ayuh,” Bruenor admitted. “The little one’s done well by me.” He pointed to the onyx
statuette on the dressing table. “And by yerself. Rumblebelly said it himself: There’s
wealth to be taken here. Pook’s gone, and it’s to be grab-as-grab-can. And that Entreri’s
about—that’s not to me likin’. And more of them ratmen, not to doubt, looking to pay
the little one back for their pain. And that wizard! Rumblebelly says he’s got him by the
gemstones, if ye get me meaning, but it seems oʃ to me that a wizard’s caught by such a
charm.”
“To me, as well,” Drizzt agreed.
“I don’t like him, and I don’t trust him!” Bruenor declared. “Rumblebelly’s got him
standing right by his side.”
“Perhaps you and I should pay LaValle a visit this morning,” Drizzt oʃered, “that we
might judge where he stands.”

Bruenor’s knocking technique shifted subtly when they arrived at the wizard’s door,
from the gentle tapping he had laid on Drizzt’s door, to a battering-ram crescendo of

heavy slugs. LaValle jumped from his bed and rushed to see what was the matter, and
who was beating upon his brand new door.
“Morning, wizard,” Bruenor grumbled, pushing into the room as soon as the door
cracked open.
“So I guessed,” muttered LaValle, looking to the hearth and beside it to the pile of
kindling that was once his old door.
“Greetings, good dwarf,” he said as politely as he could muster. “And Master
Do’Urden,” he added quickly when he noticed Drizzt slipping in behind. “Were you not
to be gone by this late hour?”
“We have time,” said Drizzt.
“And we’re not for leaving till we’ve seen to the safety of Rumblebelly,” Bruenor
explained.
“Rumblebelly?” echoed LaValle.
“The halfling!” roared Bruenor. “Yer master.”
“Ah, yes, Master Regis,” said LaValle wistfully, his hands going together over his chest
and his eyes taking on a distant, glossy look.
Drizzt shut the door and glared, suspicious, at him.
LaValle’s faraway trance faded back to normal when he considered the unblinking
drow. He scratched his chin, looking for somewhere to run. He couldn’t fool the drow, he
realized. The dwarf, perhaps, the halɻing, certainly, but not this one. Those lavender
eyes burned holes right through his facade. “You do not believe that your little friend
has cast his enchantment over me,” he said.
“Wizards avoid wizards’ traps,” Drizzt replied.
“Fair enough,” said LaValle, slipping into a chair.
“Bah! Then ye’re a liar, too!” growled Bruenor, his hand going to the axe on his belt.
Drizzt stopped him.
“If you doubt the enchantment,” said LaValle, “do not doubt my loyalty. I am a
practical man who has served many masters in my long life. Pook was the greatest of
these, but Pook is gone. LaValle lives on to serve again.”
“Or mighten be that he sees a chance to make the top,” Bruenor remarked, expecting
an angry response from LaValle.
Instead, the wizard laughed heartily. “I have my craft,” he said. “It is all that I care
for. I live in comfort and am free to go as I please. I need not the challenges and
dangers of a guildmaster.” He looked to Drizzt as the more reasonable of the two. “I will
serve the halɻing, and if Regis is thrown down, I will serve he that takes the halɻing’s
place.”
The logic satisɹed Drizzt, and convinced him of the wizard’s loyalty beyond any
enchantment the ruby could have induced. “Let us take our leave,” he said to Bruenor,
and he started out the door.
Bruenor could trust Drizzt’s judgment, but he couldn’t resist one ɹnal threat. “Ye

crossed me, wizard,” he growled from the doorway. “Ye nearen killed me girl. If me
friend comes to a bad end, ye’ll pay with yer head.”
LaValle nodded but said nothing.
“Keep him well,” the dwarf ɹnished with a wink, and he slammed the door with a
bang.
“He hates my door,” the wizard lamented.
The troupe gathered inside the guildhouse’s main entrance an hour later, Drizzt,
Bruenor, Wulfgar, and Catti-brie outɹtted again in their adventuring gear, and Drizzt
with the magical mask hanging loose around his neck.
Regis, with attendants in tow, joined them. He would make the trip to the Sea Sprite
beside his formidable friends. Let his enemies see his allies in all their splendor, the sly
new guild-master figured, particularly a drow elf.
“A final offer before we go,” Regis proclaimed.
“We’re not for staying,” Bruenor retorted.
“Not to you,” Regis said. He turned squarely to Drizzt. “To you.”
Drizzt waited patiently for the pitch as the halfling rubbed his eager hands together.
“Fifty thousand gold pieces,” Regis said at length, “for your cat.”
Drizzt’s eyes widened to double their size.
“Guenhwyvar will be well cared for, I assure—”
Catti-brie slapped Regis on the back of the head. “Find yer shame,” she scolded. “Ye
know the drow better than that!”
Drizzt calmed her with a smile. “A treasure for a treasure?” he said to Regis. “You
know I must decline. Guenhwyvar cannot be bought, however good your intentions may
be.”
“Fifty thousand,” Bruenor huffed. “If we wanted it, we’d take it afore we left!”
Regis then realized the absurdity of the offer, and he blushed in embarrassment.
“Are you so certain that we came across the world to your aid?” Wulfgar asked him.
Regis looked at the barbarian, confused.
“Perhaps ’twas the cat we came after,” Wulfgar continued seriously.
The stunned look on Regis’s face proved more than any of them could bear, and a
burst of laughter like none of them had enjoyed in many months erupted, infecting even
Regis.
“Here,” Drizzt oʃered when things had quieted once again. “Take this instead.” He
pulled the magical mask off his head and tossed it to the halfling.
“Should ye keep it until we get to the boat?” Bruenor asked.
Drizzt looked to Catti-brie for an answer, and her smile of approval and admiration
cast away any remaining doubts he might have had.
“No,” he said. “Let the Calishites judge me for what they will.” He swung open the
doors, allowing the morning sun to sparkle in his lavender eyes.

“Let the wide world judge me for what it will,” he said, his look one of genuine
contentment as he dropped his gaze alternately into the eyes of each of his four friends.
“You know who I am.”

he Sea Sprite cut a diɽcult course northward up the Sword Coast, into the wintry winds, but Captain Deudermont and
his grateful crew were determined to see the four friends safely and swiftly back to Waterdeep.
Stunned expressions from every face on the docks greeted the resilient vessel as it put into Waterdeep Harbor, dodging
the breakers and the ice ɻoes as it went. Mustering all the skill he had gained through years of experience, Deudermont
docked the Sea Sprite safely.
The four friends had recovered much of their health, and their humor, during those two months at sea, despite the
rough voyage. All had turned out well in the end—even Catti-brie’s wounds appeared as if they would fully heal.
But if the sea voyage back to the North was diɽcult, the trek across the frozen lands was even worse. Winter was on the
wane but still thick in the land, and the friends could not aʃord to wait for the snows to melt. They said their goodbyes to
Deudermont and the men of the Sea Sprite, tightened heavy cloaks and boots, and trudged oʃ through Waterdeep’s gate
along the Trade Way on the northeastern course to Longsaddle.
Blizzards and wolves reared up to stop them. The path of the road, its plentiful markings buried under a year’s worth of
snow, became no more than the guess of a drow elf reading the stars and the sun.
Somehow they made it, though, and they stormed into Longsaddle, ready to retake Mithral Hall. Bruenor’s kin from
Icewind Dale were there to greet them, along with ɹve hundred of Wulfgar’s people. Less than two tendays later, General
Dagnabit of Citadel Adbar led his eight thousand dwarven troops to Bruenor’s side.
Battle plans were drawn and redrawn. Drizzt and Bruenor put their memories of the undercity and mine caverns
together to create models of the place and estimate the number of duergar the army would face.
Then, with spring defeating the last blows of winter, and only a few days before the army was to set out to the
mountains, two more groups of allies came in, quite unexpectedly: contingents of archers from Silverymoon and Nesme.
Bruenor at ɹrst wanted to turn the warriors from Nesme away, remembering the treatment he and his friends had received
at the hands of a Nesme patrol on their initial journey to Mithral Hall, and also because the dwarf wondered how much of
the show of allegiance was motivated in the hopes of friendship, and how much in the hopes of profit!
But, as usual, Bruenor’s friends kept him on a wise course. The dwarves would have to deal extensively with Nesme, the
closest settlement to Mithral Hall, once the mines were reopened, and a smart leader would patch the bad feelings there and
then.

Their numbers were overwhelming, their determination unrivaled, and their leaders magniɹcent. Bruenor and Dagnabit
led the main assault force of battle-hardened dwarves and wild barbarians, sweeping out room after room of the duergar
scum. Catti-brie, with her bow, the few Harpells who had made the journey, and the archers from the two cities, cleared
the side passages along the main force’s thrust.
Drizzt, Wulfgar, and Guenhwyyar, as they had so often in the past, forged out alone, scouting the areas ahead of and
below the army, taking out more than their share of duergar along the way.
In three days, the top level was cleared. In two tendays, the undercity. By the time spring had settled fully onto the
northland, less than a month after the army had set out from Longsaddle, the hammers of Clan Battlehammer began their

smithing song in the ancient halls once again.
And the rightful king took his throne.

Drizzt looked down from the mountains to the distant lights of the enchanted city of Silverymoon. He had been turned
away from that city once before—a painful rejection—but not this time.
He could walk the land as he chose, now, with his head held high and the cowl of his cloak thrown back. Most of the
world did not treat him any diʃerently; few knew the name of Drizzt Do’Urden. But Drizzt knew now that he owed no
apologies, or excuses, for his black skin, and to those who placed unfair judgment upon him, he offered none.

The weight of the world’s prejudice would still fall upon him heavily, but Drizzt had learned, by the insights of Catti-
brie, to stand against it.

What a wonderful friend she was to him. Drizzt had watched her grow into a special young woman, and he was warmed
now by the knowledge that she had found her home.
The thought of her with Wulfgar, and standing beside Bruenor, touched the dark elf, who had never experienced the
closeness of family.
“How much we all have changed,” the drow whispered to the empty mountain wind.
His words were not a lament.

The autumn saw the ɹrst crafted goods ɻow from Mithral Hall to Silverymoon, and by the time winter turned again to
spring, the trade was in full force, with the barbarians from Icewind Dale working as market bearers for the dwarven
goods.
That spring, too, a carving was begun in the Hall of Kings: the likeness of Bruenor Battlehammer.
To the dwarf who had wandered so far from his home and had seen so many marvelous—and horrible—sights, the
reopening of the mines, and even the carving of his bust, seemed of minor importance when weighed against another event
planned for that year.
“I told ye he’d be back,” Bruenor said to Wulfgar and Catti-brie, who both sat beside him in his audience hall. “Th’ elf’d
not be missing such a thing as yer wedding!”
General Dagnabit—who, with blessings from King Harbromme of Citadel Adbar, had stayed on with two thousand other
dwarves, swearing allegiance to Bruenor—entered the room, escorting a ɹgure who had become less and less noticeable in
Mithral Hall over the last few months.
“Greetings,” said Drizzt, moving up to his friends
“So ye made it,” Catti-brie said absently, feigning disinterest.
“We had not planned for this,” added Wulfgar in the same casual tone. “I pray that there may be an extra seat at the
table.”
Drizzt only smiled and bowed low in apology. He had been absent quite often—for tendays at a time—lately. Personal
invitations to visit the Lady of Silverymoon and her enchanted realm were not so easily refused.
“Bah!” Bruenor snorted. “I told ye he’d come back! And back to stay, this time!”
Drizzt shook his head.
Bruenor cocked his in return, wondering what was getting into his friend. “Ye hunting for that assassin, elf?” he could
not help but ask.

Drizzt grinned and shook his bead again “I’ve no desire to meet that one again,” he replied. He looked at Catti-brie—she
understood—then back to Bruenor. “There are many sights in the wide world, dear dwarf, that cannot be seen from the
shadows. Many sounds more pleasant than the ring of steel, and many smells preferable to the stench of death.”
“Cook another feast,” Bruenor grumbled. “Suren the elf has his eyes fixed on another wedding!”
Drizzt let it go at that. Maybe there was a ring of truth in Bruenor’s words, for some distant date. No longer did Drizzt
limit his hopes and desires. He would see the world as he could and draw his choices from his wishes, not from
limitations he might impose upon himself. For now, though, Drizzt had found something too personal to be shared.
For the first time in his life, the drow had found peace.
Another dwarf entered the room and scurried up to Dagnabit. They both took their leave, but Dagnabit returned a few
moments later.
“What is it?” Bruenor asked him, confused by all the bustle.
“Another guest,” Dagnabit explained, but before he could launch a proper introduction, a halɻing ɹgure slipped into the
room.
“Regis!” Catti-brie cried. She and Wulfgar rushed to meet their old friend.
“Rumblebelly!” Bruenor yelled. “What in the Nine Hells—”
“Did you believe that I would miss this occasion?” Regis huffed. “The wedding of two of my dearest friends?”
“How’d ye know?” Bruenor asked.
“You underestimate your fame, King Bruenor,” Regis said, dropping into a graceful bow.
Drizzt studied the halɻing curiously. He wore his gem-studded jacket and more jewelry, including the ruby pendant,
than the drow had ever seen in one place. And the pouches hanging low on Regis’s belt were sure to be ɹlled with gold and
gems.
“Might ye be staying long?” Catti-brie asked.
Regis shrugged. “I am in no hurry,” he replied. Drizzt cocked an eyebrow. A master of a thieves’ guild did not often leave
his place of power; too many were usually ready to steal it out from under him.
Catti-brie seemed happy with the answer and happy with the timing of the halfling’s return. Wulfgar’s people were soon
to rebuild the city of Settlestone, at the base of the mountains. She and Wulfgar, though, planned to remain in Mithral Hall,
at Bruenor’s side. After the wedding, they planned to do a bit of traveling they’d had in mind, maybe back to Icewind Dale,
maybe along with Captain Deudermont later in the year, when the Sea Sprite sailed back to the southlands.
Catti-brie dreaded telling Bruenor that they would be leaving, if only for a few months. With Drizzt so often on the road,
she feared that the dwarf would be miserable. But if Regis planned to stay on for a while ...
“Might I have a room,” Regis asked, “to put my things and to rest away the weariness of a long road?”
“We’ll see to it,” Catti-brie offered.
“And for your attendants?” Bruenor asked.
“Oh,” stammered Regis, searching for a reply. “I ... came alone. The southerners do not take well to the chill of a
northern spring, you know.”
“Well, off with ye, then,” said Bruenor. “Suren it be me turn to set out a feast for the pleasure of yer belly.”
Regis rubbed his hands together eagerly and left with Wulfgar and Catti-brie, the three of them breaking into tales of
their latest adventures before they had even left the room.
“Suren few folk in Calimport have ever heared o’ me name, elf,” Bruenor said to Drizzt after the others had gone. “And

who south o’ Longsaddle would be knowing of the wedding?” He turned a sly eye on his dark friend. “Suren the little one
brings a bit of his treasure along with him, eh?”
Drizzt had come to the same conclusion the moment Regis had entered the room. “He is running.”
“Got himself into trouble again,” Bruenor snorted, “or I’m a bearded gnome!”
